But hey, at least no dirty immigrants are getting anything either! /sThat's just baseless scaremongering.&gt; Black has trouble catching up to the card advantage green and blue flourishes in without it.

? "Only a fool thinks he'll face my armies but once" - Kaervek&gt; Again, isn't that an argument for anti-trust or even bans on foreign-produced GMO material, rather than a flat GMO ban, then?

We need to have a general GMO ban to give some specifically approved GM organisms permission to be used. Whereas a blanket permit would only allow us to ban something after it has caused problems, and then we still have to clean up the mess. 

So far the improvements of GM have focused on selling more pesticides, not improving production or reducing pesticide use...The problem there is that Hass was a bad businessman. He had the patent, he could have used it in any way he wanted but he outsourced it because he didn't want to deal with the business aspect - the way to do it would be to own orchards himself and don't sell grafts, enough to get a head start on the competition before they leak anyway in some manner.

What would have allowed him to research was a research grant, not more powerful patents.&gt; GMO is already used in many countries and helped solve problems.

Not really, there aren't that many examples of GMO's solving problems. Mostly they just encourage pesticide use of certain brands. We can still approve those specifically as an exception to the general ban anyway.&gt;If they decide to fuck you over, you can always ignore the licence.

Not in a country with rule of law, unless you can prove specific criminal intent. But if they have such a dominant position they don't need to be criminal to abuse it.

&gt;If they raise prices through the roof, non-GMO products will be competitive again so that will also not be a problem.

Creating an oligopoly of the few big companies that can afford to do GM research will not increase competition.

&gt;because the more competitive product might become as expensive as the current product. Don't you see how that is counter-productive?

If the competition is sufficiently marginalized they can get away with prices that are substantially higher than necessary, higher than the current ones even. When a new competitor tries to start up, they temporarily lower prices to strangle it in the cradle, and then their prices go up again. Not to mention the risk of formal or informal cartels and price gouging if only a few big players control the market.Augustin loves it. Cheaper to cast, harder for your opponents to rebuild their board.&gt; Couldn't Denmark just reduce taxes on the regular population and find something else to tax? 

That's what a car tax is for. At least you can choose not to get a car as opposed to income tax.&gt;The automobile has become the European cash cow.

Automobiles generate more externalized costs to society than they yield in tax income.&gt; a full blown set of the right wing economics of the worst kind. 

Ah, right wing politics: reduce social spending -&gt; more crime and unemployment -&gt; blame immigrants and taxes -&gt; win the elections -&gt; reduce social spending etc.If a company has an unserved customer base they can get credit. Lack of money to invest has never stopped businesses to expand in a world where the banking system can create credit out of thin air.That all assumes that companies would voluntarily drop prices or give raises even thought that's directly counterproductive to their main goal: making profit.

Those lower taxes have to be paid for by cutting redistributive policies, so people will *not* be able to buy more, since they're either laid off by the government or see their benefits reduced.

The alternative is more effective: put money in the hands of people. The market will offer something that they can spend it on, and that will create employment and so on.Why does the size of the group disagreeing with you matter? Are you that much beholden to the herd mentality? Are you so eager to conform to the norms of your peer group?But that's not relevant, you said that "others do it too" was the reason why you were comfortable with it. It's a know behavioural trait of people, the herd mentality - [people will stay in a room that is getting filled with smoke if the others do it too](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KE5YwN4NW5o).You still can. The quota are about processing, not about asylum granted.Strange, I've had that assumption for a long time.[Summaries exist](http://trade.ec.europa.eu/doclib/docs/2015/august/tradoc_153674.pdf), and while being uncomfortably vague, it's clear that they are still about issues that are already in force with the US (tariff reduction etc.), and that aren't as controversial.Just like Marxist or capitalist theory is part of economics, but it's not a discipline in itself - or shouldn't be, for unbiased practicioners.&gt; However there is roughly 100% chance an ISDS clause will be included in them, which seems to be one of the main sticking points.

They're very vague about it. In any case it doesn't matter: if TTIP's ISDS clause is what raised the awareness about the undesireability of ISDS in general, then it should be applies to other treaties too - even existing ones, then we'll see how easy those are to change in the need of changing insights.

In addition, there appears to be no "reduction of non-tariff barriers" by "mutual recognition of standards", which would at least prevent direct pressure to lower standards.

&gt;Also, if EU and US emissions regulations were standardized that would mean much less R&amp;D/retrofitting costs for German car manufacturers.

I agree. But to do that appropriately we would need a common legislative organ, much like we created the EP to do the extensive standardization across the whole of the EU. So I'm not opposed, but I need the correct democratic safeguards, the other two powers to balance that legislative power. The EU has that legitimacy, ISDS does not.

But what is in the treaty is not even standardization - it's mostly just mutual recognition of standards. So it will have none of the advantages, and all the disadvantages.





&gt;Oh, ok! It might not last forever, so let's flood our countries with murderers, rapists, and thieves. Awful logic. It's more than likely these people will not change thanks to their cultural background.

Well, we let you stay and you are a racist thug, so what gives?National parties also have to make difficult concessions at times. I don't see the difference.

Especially for such wide-ranging legislation like TTIP - if the issue was more limited and constrained to some limits between which anything would be acceptable, I could see it as condonable... but in this case there could be *anything* in the treaty "because free trade and non-tariff barriers". So we have to be able to scrutinize everything.&gt; True, but the yield per acre in calories is much, much, higher for grains than it is for the kinds of vegetables that you would need to eat a healthy and enjoyable vegan diet. 

And? Animals don't eat only grains either, and stuff like soy is fit for human consumption directly.

&gt;The calculations are much more complicated than shown in this propaganda piece if you account for this.

The laws of thermodynamics alone ensure that you lose energy in the plant-to-meat conversion process. That's a no-brainer.Companies will choose the least stringent standard, which by definition is worse that what the other side wants.&gt; Which is why I support funding refugee camps in the region and giving monetary relief to the neighboring countries.

Adequate provisions there would reduce the amount of people to move on. So why not do that already?

&gt; I do not support them coming to Europe illegally and causing trouble.

Asking for asylum is legal. Most do not cause trouble. The crime rate is not higher than the normal population.

&gt;Many of the people coming to Europe atm are economic migrants that plan on staying here and not returning to their country. Those are not refugees. 

Nice crystal ball do you have there.

&gt;In the worst cases we can grant refugee status from the local refugee camps for those that are deemed to need it the most.

The 10, 10000 or 10 million that need it the most?

&gt;Those who cannot afford 10.000 euros to pay a human trafficker to come to Europe. Those are the real refugees in the camps in Jordan and Turkey. 

I don't see what the difference is. War is war, the rich are not immune to bombings and bullets.



Nothing I said contradicts that. I've supported a tax shift from labor to wealth for a long time, and that would take care of that problem.It is better to bring up the specific evidence, otherwise you're just making an argument from authority.

It is, however a valid answer to other appeals to authority like "a scientist says", "my priest says", "some scientists say" etc.That's like complaining that there aren't enough women in "The name of the Rose", or that there aren't enough Caucasians in Zang Yhimou's movies.Why should every movie have to reflect the average demographics of the society it's being produced in? You don't expect 20% of movies to be about children under 14, or 15% about people over 65 either.&gt;No, but if you make a movie that takes place in America, it should represent America. 

No, not at all. If someone wants to make a movie revolving around a black basketball team, why shouldn't they be able to? No individual movie can be said to be racist on numerical criteria. You could say that people of group x are underrepresented as actors, but then it still remains to be seen where the bottleneck is: screenwriters, available actors, hiring bias, etc.&gt;  German culture is quite different from Greek culture, so there isn't really a pan-European culture. 

There is, but it's one of the layers of culture rather than excluding other culture.&gt; Radical feminists believe the main locus of the oppression of women is society, and so reforming society is the best way to emancipate women (this is what makes them 'radical': their belief that change must be outside of legislation, that the foundations of society are sexist in a way that cannot be amended by legislative change). 

I don't see how that would contradict that 
some of the best feminists are men" and that a lot of women "just as guilty of discriminating against women".

&gt;. It wouldn't really make sense to say 'some slaves are just as guilty of discriminating against slaves as their owners are'

Why not? If it's about social behaviour then the slaves that eg. are overseeers of other slaves are actively contributing to perpetuate slavery. If it's about legal status, that fits better your description of "liberal feminists".

&gt;The other, related reason a lot of radical feminists might have a problem with Emma Watson's comments is that they come off as appeasement: 'Hey, we shouldn't demonise feudal lords, some of them treated their serfs really well!'

Only if they assume that men *intrinsically* are oppressors and are incapable of not being oppressors. Which proves the point that radical feminism is sexist.&gt; Feminists are not a united front

That's the problem really. They aren't, indeed, and yet most of them will take personal offense if they notice someone criticizing feminism in general.

&gt;It's a message of False inclusion, because it elevates the minor struggles of men and diminishes the True struggles of women:

Welcome to the oppression olympics!

&gt;In other words, Emma Watson's argument hinges on finding commonality where there really isn't.

Tell me, why would men support a movement that apparently has nothing in common with them and belittles their problems, even if they are related with the nominal concern, equality? If feminism is just an interest group for women that doesn't care about men, I cannot see any good reason why men would support it. 

Emma Watson is trying to build support for equality across all genders. You are trying to divide people by pitting them against others as enemies.

&gt;In addition, this approach bolsters a very male-first perspective

It's patently absurd to say that men too are negatively affected by rigid gender roles is somehow "a very male-first perspective". It sounds more like jealously and whining to claim the exclusive attention, a sort of hypochondria or Von M\u00fcnchhausen-by-proxy.

If you really cared for equality you'd approve of broadening its support base instead of confining the benefits to just one gender.https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SCUM_Manifesto

Valerie Solanas still is respected among many feminists, despite promoting the idea of eliminating men and having attempted murder herself. Just imagine the shitstorm about someone writing a book called "The Society for cutting up Jews" or "The Society for cuttting up niggers".&gt;I'm not saying there aren't feminists that hate men (and I honestly don't think that's strange at all) but unless there's some real facts pointing towards that man-hating feminists are likely to murder (or similar) a man because of that - I don't see it as a big problem. 

So you don't see misogyny as a problem either unless they're actively murdering women?

&gt; There's plenty of statistics of men having an over-representation as perpetrators in crimes of violent and sexual kind though. So if there's any group you should criticize for violence and hatred I'd say that's a pick as good as any. 

Strange, isn't it. If men do something undesireable, it's in-born, if women do something undesireable, it's because they're oppressed.You cannot point just at any film with no or few black actors and use it as proof for that though.

Quite possible that it's True on average. That still doesn't allow you to say that it's categorically racist for any specific film to have a cast that doesn't exactly match up with the demographics of the USA. It's not possible to revoke it retroactively. Besides, public opinion *is* pretty much shifted against it now, so that should seal the deal then, right?&gt;Oh please... spare me that. I totally admitt that the attitude of a lot og French-speakers may have played a role but to say that whithout that NVA would be a sideshow... is grossly exagerated I think. 

I don't think so. People were quite willing to turn a fresh page on a lot of things after WW2. If Brussels was manifest proof that bilingual Belgium was possible and succesful, the remnants of the VU would just have been absorbed by the other parties and that was it. Now there's still an unfinished conflict that has to be resolved one way or another.

&gt;And the agressive attitude of a lot of Flemings who aren't even Brusselers and allow themselves to make derogatory comments about the city, the inhabitants etc... because they think nobody understands them can be quite shocking as well in my opinion. 

*Onbekend maakt onbemind.* 

There's no doubt both of these tendencies reinforce each other, and they are supported by historical resentment, which takes a while to go away. It's only going to go away slowly, as more examples of harmonious cohabitation will continue to overwrite the negative historical experiences.&gt;Many jobs aren't necessary, but still have a benefit to society, that's what I mean. 

Is there a strict distinction? There are jobs that are more and jobs that are less necessary. The issue at hand is that it's pointless to refuse to use computers just because you'd have to fire a couple of typists for every computer you use.

&gt;About your other point, I think that a society should work towards full employment. Otherwise you are going to have to decide who must work and who doesn't, and that seems like a shitstorm waiting to happen.

There are plenty of alternatives: lower the standard work week or introduce basic income. Let people decide themselves if they want to work more than that.How did you get to know them?&gt; I agree that we need to discourage people from making this dangerous trip. Therefore we need a puchback policy

There are other ways to discourage people to make the trip, for example providing better transport options or other options to ask asylum.

&gt;(the ECHR can suck my balls, what are they going to do, fine the whole EU?)

You can't selectively apply human rights. That would undermine them.

&gt;and we need, in all European countries, a different social security statute for newcomers.

Having different categories of people with different rights will only cause more problems - Apartheid isn't fun.

&gt;Above of that we need to invest more money in the refugee camps in the neighbouring countries, so that they can have more devent lives there. And last but not least, we should exert pressure on the Gulf States to also take in more refugees to decrease the burden on Turkey, Lebanon and Jordan.

I agree.
The comment I replied to spoke about a single movie.

Even for films as a whole, there's no particular reason to expect and exact demographic match. Films are about unusual events, anyway.&gt; Not familiar with "The Name of the Rose"

After Umberto Eco's book, it's basically a detective in a medieval cloister, which is by definition not accessible to women.

&gt;China does not have the same race issues as western nations but it does have a lot of ethnic prejudices 

I don't see why those would be qualitatively different. It's the same problem with some different historical context.

&gt;You example of white people not being in a Chinese movie about Chinese people is a disingenuous example (and a little ignorant about ethnic issues in China in general). Black people (in the US) are Americans why aren't they in American movies?

Because those movies aren't about the Chinese, or about the Americans - they are about the specific subject of the film. They're not documentaries and do not claim to be an accurate repesentation of reality.

By that reasoning, why use the country as yardstick? Why not the world? Or the city where the movie is situated? Or the personal history of the author? It's all rather arbitrary. &gt; Sure it does. It increases competition because the usual food sources will become available if the monopoly acts like a monopoly. Or, as I said above:

No. GMO technology with its high research costs acts as a barrier to entry in the market. That's even ignoring the effects of being the established dominant player in a market.

&gt;As long as GMO companies keep the prices lower than the current ones, they should be fine. As long as they do that, the consumer wins. I honestly don't see the problem.

No, there are much more barriers to entry to that market than eg. starting a hot dog vending booth. Once the competition is sufficiently crushed they can loosen their price discipline and yet remain the biggest.

&gt; Food is such a large market that you cannot possibly strangle out competition

Food is not the market, seed is. Monsanto alone controls 1/3 of that market in the whole world. It just requires a single cocktail party in the sector for their CEO's to come to an informal agreement to keep the price competition to a minimum.

&gt;Farmland is very cheap these days

Gee, why do we need GMOs then? Wasn't it the only thing between us and certain starvation according to pro-GMOers?No. That allows you to say that it's *possibly* racist.

In fact, it may just accurately portray that black people aren't as common in the layers of society that get to do interesting things in films. As such it is very accurate and reflects existing racism *because* it's accurate. That's quite something different from being racist because it's not accurate enough.

Frankly, what you're advocating is that movies should portray society as it *should* be rather than as it is... you're actually saying that movies should be propaganda pieces to promote the image of a society that we find preferable. I'll leave in the middle whether that's a good tool to reduce racism, or whether that's acceptable on its own if we disregard the goal.&gt;Slovenia is above Poland in per capita, but Poland, being the far larger country with far more resources can handle more people.

Nobody said GDP per capita was the *only* factor.

&gt;Greece isn't even an issue here.

Well, it is. Greece has been forced to take care of a lot of immigrants on top of its current problems, despite being poorer. So that's certainly relevant if the argument is going to be "we're too poor to take care of refugees".

 &gt;This mess was created by the West playing let's draw random borders, then playing topple that dictator and finally playing everyone's invited, except they're not, but come first, we'll find an answer later. This is not our problem, and we have no intention of letting you make it our problem.

Well then, why would the West have to care about the problems of having lived in communist client states or through genocidal internecine wars? The Yugoslavian wars caused 672000 people to ask for asylum in the (then) EU-15 in 1992 alone. For comparison: in 2014 there were about 284000 asylum applications, *only 4/10 of that number, and they will be distributed over more countries*.

So tell me again: why shouldn't we offer the same assistance to people in the same situation now, just like we did 23 years ago?That does not mean they are allowed to reduce the whole field to their bias.That's a great research question. As I said, there are plenty of possible bottlenecks.&gt;Citation needed.

There are plenty of topics in this subreddit alone about feminism, and invariably someone brings up that "Not All Feminists Are Like That"... and then proceed to imply that the OP is sexist for not supporting feminism *in general*. The people who call themselves feminist and genuinely acknowledge that there are other people who call themselves feminist whose antagonism and hostile rhetoric is counterproductive, are few and far between.

&gt;Flippant and useless comment.

I agree with that assessment of what you have written. /s

In other words, there is no reason to assume that acknowledging that the other gender also experiences disadvantages from gender stereotypes will undermine your cause. On the contrary, it will strenghten it because it is yet one more piece of evidence that more equality would benefit all, and there is more injustice than just 

&gt;Because of moral principles, democracy, and equality, rather than any self-serving view such as "helping feminists will also help me." 

Why would supporting a group that aims to further the interest of just one specific gender help equality? Grand claims about equality and justice for all are not believable when problems that men face - even gender-specific problems - are belittled by feminists.

&gt;White, land-owning men had the most to lose from the abolition of slavery, but it was still the Right Thing To Do.

Why do you assume that all men are in a position of power, and all women aren't? Why would a male wage laborer support slaverey abolishment (which will flood the market with people who are going to compete with him directly, and he already is poor), if the abolitionists treat him the same as a slave owner just because he's white?

&gt;If you don't like "male-first perspective," then substitute it with a "me-first perspective." All I'm trying to say is it's an argument that appeals to the listener's selfish motives rather than any overarching themes of justice.

Funny, that's just what I think when I hear feminists ridicule any problem men might have just to claim that women are the real victims here and they should get all the attention.

The point is not that it won't benefit *me*. The point is that it won't benefit equality to support feminists, because they aren't willing or able to tailor their policies to the real problems, it's just a crusade against men, and the spoils will all go to women. Despite all claims to the contrary, feminists who talk like that fail completely to apply "patriarchy hurts men too".&gt;I don't support making jobs more inefficient, just getting rather low-skilled people jobs. For example those I saw in my city: collecting garbage, counting traffic - and these are only small examples. 

Counting traffic can be done more efficiently - and more pleasantly - by installing sensors. Collecting garbage already happens, just like most useful jobs. They already happen, and if they didn't,  they're problably not worth doing to start with.

&gt;And I won't support basic income as long as there are hard-working people that still are paid quite badly. And I think that there is still part-time work if you want to work less. 

Basic income would be for everyone, so it would also increase the income of hardworking people. It would also strenghten their bargaining positions.Why don't you lie down on that comfy sofa over there, and tell us about your father.I play for fun.Am I the only one who thinks Stromae is quite overrated? He made one and a half palatable song that would have been modern in the 90s ("alors on danse" sounds pretty much like "push the feeling on" by the nightcrawlers (except the latter is better)), that's it. &gt; The thing here seems that whenever someone points out the bad stuff about refugees it's always like "oh you racist! it's just a few among the thousands that are bad!".

What happens is that people bring up a *single* bad incident and then draw conclusions like "they're *all* just economic immigrants" "they should deport them *all*". If the plant grows larger, it will require more fertilizer. TANSTAAFL - also see Liebig's law of the minimum.&gt;GM food is required if the world is going to be fed

Nonsense. We already produce enough, and that's in a situation where a huge continent like Africa is in shambles and doesn't produce anywhere near its potential with current technology. Distribution is the problem.

&gt;not to mention other benefits like reducing global warming by using less resources.

More output requires more input. You can meddle a bit with the synthesis process, but you're going to need to input the raw material you want to output as food.

The only "benefit" companies were willing to produce so far is an adaptation that makes people buy more of their pesticide. That encourages agricultural practices that leave the soil bare, increasing erosion and destroying valuable farmland.
Well obviously, as long as we want our farmers to make more than African ones.

Besides, I'd rather have 1001 heirloom varieties of salad all over Europe than Iceberg salad+(tm) everywhere, no matter how much profit the company can make with it. The takeaway idea from the map is that the border between Dutch and German is quite arbitrary though, and heavily relies on political borders.Their dialect would just be a Limburgish dialect if the borders were different.[Here's three stages of precision for the benelux](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/8/82/Languages_Benelux.PNG).That makes no sense. "I am not currently able to support a child" is one of the possible reasons for abortion. It's a very sensible reason, and it's a solid decision because it prevents children growing up in poverty. You can't 

&gt;Why do men have to be stuck with child support while the women can abort?

Simply give men the same time window to abstain from parenthood then.

&gt;the money will go to social fund to help others.

We already do that, it's called taxes. People who don't have children, don't get a deduction and pay more.

&gt;But child support isn't your choice, it's your responsibility when you chose to have sex and conceived a child.

Abortion can be used as a last chance to correct accidents or simply malfunctioning contraception. Name any sensible reason to not want children, does that become less sensible if a condom came off the assembly line with some small defect? If I know my children will have an inheritable genetic disease that is guaranteed to make them handicapped for life, why should I be punished for doing what is necessary to avoid having children?In the long run I agree with you. However, at this point we have a chance to see what life is like without earth standards. That would be a tremendously important data point, perhaps we get to see a different type of DNA in action, or life using a different metabolism... or perhaps it's just like what we have here, and then it's evidence in favour of panspermia hypotheses.

It's a unique, irreproducible experiment. Let's not use the results to wipe our ass because it's slightly more convenient.

Additionally, *when* we start with experiments of earth life on Mars, we'll benefit the most from them if we have monitoring equipment all over the planet. So that's one more reason to send data gathering robots first, map the place, and only start experimenting then.

Those few decades won't make a difference for human habitation anyway, if you somehow count on a Martian ecosystem to provide enough surplus oxygen and other services to allow humans to live off them...That's like saying "it doesn't matter if we burn down our neighbour's house, there are millions of houses in the country anyway".How exactly do you think screwing up the only habitable place known to man is going to benefit humankind?An otherwise unremarkable infection that makes people produce scrambled DNA in their gametes could spread and keep spreading, while still guaranteeing extinction or at least breakdown of civilization.&gt;One nuke wouldn't be enough to destroy a country, let alone the world. You'd need thousands of nukes. And even that wouldn't be enough to wipe out all humans. There would be some survivors, perhaps millions, and they would eventually rebuild.

&gt;Even engineered diseases won't do it, because some people live in remote places. Or a few people with different immune systems due to rare genes and mutations might be immune and spread their genes. For millions of years we have been fighting all kinds of viruses that are highly evolved to attack us.

That still is enough to reset humanity to a low tech society.Could you give any remotely plausible scenario where WWIII is caused by the presence of refugees?Their motivation is irrelevant, as long as their arguments are good. It's simply unnecessary and an ad hominem argument that will not further the discussion. If they're wrong, demonstrate it. If they're factually right, they're right, even if their motivation is wrong.I smell troll.Sure, but it's not random.I don't see "keeping Belgium together" as a goal in itself. We have to make sure the Belgian citizens have a good life - the existence of Belgium merely is a tool to achieve that end, and if we think another tool would be better to achieve that we should change tools.&gt;Well, men are for a fact murdering women so it's obvious there's a problem.

Why are you suddenly generalizing to *all* men? Apparently you assume that all men are mysogynic and all murders of women are because of mysogynic reasons? Then why is the same - there are women murdering men - not good enough proof for the equivalent?

&gt;I think you might have missed the entire ideas of feminism, because rarely does the idea of things being in-born come forth. The basic ideas of feminism often center around how both men and females are affected by societies and is formed through that. So men having violence in-born is your words, not mine.

You just said yourself that men as a group should be criticized for violence and hatred!&gt;Yes, she's respected among many - but also despised by many as well.

As long as the latter group defends the practices and viewpoints of the first, I'm going to treat them as a single one.

&gt;The problem here is that people (men) doesn't seem to be able to tell fiction from reality. 

Well, neither could she apparently because she's convicted for attempted murder.

But I'm glad that we can consider the writings of feminists henceforth as *fiction*. It clears up a lot.That's not a given - our local neonazi party is on good terms with the Jewish community. The enemy of their enemy is their friend, apparently.Of course it's allowed. It's still just one among many racisms, and the Jewish population isn't that large, so there's not much attention for it.... So they go live even closer to ISIS? That doesn't make sense.That makes no sense. Homicide rates in Israel are double of those in eg. Austria or the Netherlands. And Israel has 20% Arab population, so if they're the problem that's not a solution either.

The alternative explanation - there's self-reinforcing scaremongering going on in Jewish communities and social networks, supported by the Israeli government for demographic reasons - is much more plausible.&gt; As an American Jew I will say I would be more cautious going to Europe now than maybe I was 5 or 10 years ago. It just seems that local gov'ts in countries like Sweden and Norway are actively encouraging anti-semitism by a culture of silence when the racism stems not from far right movements but from far left movements and the politicking for the immigrant vote ( who are from Islamic oriented societies).

Those are your feelings. What are the facts?

&gt;.I remember a few years ago I went to Istanbul and I had a chance to spend friday night at the heavily guarded Synagogue there...I had to hand over my passport, go through reinforced blast proof doors JUST to get into the sanctuary. This is not the kind of society I would want to live in and you will see a movement of European Jews ( some of who are my relatives) go to Israel. 

... Israel, where every single person is forced to serve in the army? That makes no sense. Not at all.A good card is a card that serves its purpose. Surely it's not the most efficient, but that's besides the point for my purposes. Capsize often is what keeps the deck in the game, so it works. Of course I can splurge a thousand dollars more and put all the "good" cards in it, but what's the point?God damn it OP, don't remove your text, we weren't done yet.&gt; I'm establishing the distinction between radical and liberal feminism, not mounting a total critique where every sentence is aimed at contradicting OP's view

And yet that is the premise of the discussion, so you'd have to formulate another purpose.

&gt;The comparison here doesn't line up well, because the equivalent position would be something like a conservative female politician who votes against paid parental leave legislation or something similar, but that's, to my mind, not what Emma Watson was referring to when she was talking about women being sexist. I might be wrong, though, it just seemed like she was talking about women being sexist in an everyday, mundane sense.

Including being sexist to the disadvantage of women (for example a female HR manager discounting the abilities of female job candidates), which places them in the same position as the slaves overseeing slaves.

&gt;Regardless, the overseer is hardly all that morally culpable in that situation: they likely received the position due to good behaviour and are rewarded for it. That's a rational choice, and taking up the position isn't the problem, it's the institution of slavery itself. 

Good, then that must also apply to non-slave overseeers. They, too, are just doing their job after all for a reward. For our topic, that means that men shouldn't be personally singled out for criticism as the perpetrators and beneficiaries of "patriarchy". And yet that's what feminism does habitually.

&gt;I don't see where you got the word 'intrinsically' from. Men qua people? Of course not. Men qua men, everything else in society being equal? Perhaps

That's your view. There's plenty of feminists spouting crap like "the world would be a better place if ruled by women" and "the male objectifying gaze".

&gt;Sexism is not an intrinsic evil

Case in point. Holy shit, can you imagine the shitstorm among feminists if eg. Obama would say "sexism is not an intrinsic evil"? He'd be lynched and quartered.

&gt;A lot of radical feminists, and myself, would think that the far greater evil and act of sexism would be to attempt to obstruct the emancipation of women through labelling it 'sexist' (in the same way, for example, the seizure of land and redistribution of it might be labelled 'racist' by the white landowners it hurts, but is a necessary act to destroy the far more racist system that created those estates).

Well, it *is* racist to disown white landownwers because they're white. A movement concerned with equality would redistribute based on ownership, not on skin color.

You illustrate the basic fallacy of feminism: they say that A: women are oppressed and therefore B: it's justified to take advantages from others and give them to women. But B is never scaled to A! It's just a blanket justification to grab whatever privileges they can. Whereas a True equality movement would strive to work towards equality, rewriting laws and practices to work more equitably rather than trying to obtain advantages to compensate real or imagined oppression.

&gt;Additionally, I doubt you really consistently believe that those kind of claims are sexist. For radical feminists, men are no more inherently oppressors than men inherently have more testosterone than women (it's perhaps a generalisation, but it's still generally True). Would you consider the claim 'Men have more testosterone than women' to be sexist? Why not? Because it's the same kind of claim, at least for radical feminists

Holy shit, I was born with more testosterone so I am inherently an oppressor? Next you're going to say blacks are inherently dumb because they're born with more melanin, or Jews are inherently cunning and manipulative because of their genetic heritage.

You're really proving my point... trying to bring up pseudoscientific justifications to declare an entire population group "dangerous" and consequently whitewashing constraining them as a kind self-defense.
&gt; You can't automate everything, that's neither cost-effective nor efficient nor possible

I'm not saying that. You were saying "create low-skill jobs" but the jobs that are automated are the ones most effectively automated already. "Creating low-skill jobs" by preventing that is not efficient... and if it's work we didn't consider necessary beforehand either, then why do it at all?

&gt;And no, low-skilled people don't get more income because of basic income

Yes, yes they do - and relatively more than others too.

&gt;there is somebody who is paying all these taxes - people who are actually working. 

Well, if you insist on having a non-proressive tax system that only taxes labor and not wealth... that's your problem. In a progressive system that advantage is higher. But even in a fixed rate system the rich pay in much more than the poor ever could, so the poor will get out more than they put in, or effectively enjoy a sizable tax reduction.Yes, but not necessarily in the movie industry itself. If, hypothetically, due to indirect reasons like a bad socioeconomic position of the black population, there are less black candidate actors, and the studios are perfectly race-blind while selecting, that would still result in relative underrepresentation of blacks in movies. It requires research to determine where the bottlenecks are exactly. And we need to know that to combat it effectively.&gt; That is not True. The G20 agreed to financial reforms. Most countries have harmonized them in accordance with these agreements. The EU pushed the target from 2010 to 2020 but all the reforms are following proper democratic channels. 

And those are very broad guidelines to a specific subject in an emergency situation, so it's still somewhat acceptable. That does not contradict that the increasing regulation at international level requires supervision and accountability by representatives, and a permanent legislative and juridical organ is the best way to provide that. It also gives the bonus of being able to change the laws flexibly in response to situations.

&gt;Do you have a source for this? AFAIK this was largely the case with pharmaceuticals because US/EU processes are substantially similar (although even they were open to changes IIRC). But that certainly was not the case for everything, unless something has changed since I last researched it.

This is an example where the commission wanted mutual recognition, but public pressure changed it into scientific collaboration: http://www.euractiv.com/sections/health-consumers/commission-changes-ttip-position-cosmetics-313967

[Former commissioner De Gucht: I would like to see a set of horizontal rules to guide regulatory co-operation \u2013 and what I mean by that is we should ultimately strive for the mutual recognition of our regulations across a broad range of sectors. In my mind, this is the most efficient way to connect our two systems to allow our businesses to operate more effectively across the Atlantic.](http://europa.eu/rapid/press-release_MEMO-13-835_en.htm)

[On the stance of the commission: "The leaked commission papers show that it is pushing for the mutual recognition of banking and finance rules that would enable market players to do business across the Atlantic under the laws that apply in their own jurisdiction. ... The Irish MEP went on, "The US authorities are actually the ones who have so far resisted this idea, as they rightly fear it will make it more difficult to regulate banks and tie regulators hands on future reforms.
"US banks, on the other hand, will happily endorse the commission's approach, which seems designed to please the European banking sector in the first place," suggested Childers. ](https://www.theparliamentmagazine.eu/articles/news/meps-wary-commissions-approach-ttip-negotiations)

Again, ISDS is not a a standard rule, and can mean anything. If their competence is to assess whether the procedures in the treaty have been followed as defined, without possibility for fining, their influence is small, if their competence is to assess what is "fair", and with the ability for punitive measures, then their influence is huge.I'd rather say that the Lower German dialects could have followed a standardization trajectory that lead either to Dutch or German, and the political border determined which side they went - it was not predetermined at 1000 AD which areas would become which language. This is distinct from the French side, where there was a clear difference between Germanic and Romance. It doesn't contradict that Prussia used strong assimilation pressure for the areas where the ordinary standardization didn't produce homogenous results... but the limits of that approach were still determined by the border.&gt; Yeah, I'm not saying Solanas didn't do anything wrong - as you said she did try to kill a person. On the other hand, Roman Polanski probably raped a child but that doesn't make the Polanski-fans pedophiles now does it? 

Well, they would be if Polanski's main work was child porn...

&gt;Also, it's pretty funny that you consider one feminist work to be the same as all feminist works.

I don't. I just provided an example of feminists - a feminist ideologue with a large following even - committing extreme deeds against men.You cannot maintain the same technological knowledge with less people, let alone less people actively using it. Papers rot and crumble, computers rust and break down. After a rather short while all that is left are weird alloys nobody knows how to manipulate or reproduce. A computer without a society to provide internet, electricity or replacement parts is just a toy that will break down soon.Well, or the Germans :p Could have gone either way.&gt; If A=1 and B=0.8, and we have moral principles that state something like "A and B should be as equal as possible," then I should advocate for a bonus to B. If I could increase it by 0.2, I should. If I have to subtract 0.1 from A and add it to B so that both are 0.9, then we should probably do that too, even if it's uncomfortable or difficult. The point is that overarching moral principles (democracy, equality, justice, etc.) should trump self-interest.

That's where it breaks down: the promoted policies aren't measured: they might as well take 0.3 from A and give it to B. Not to mention that they didn't bother to measure or quantify the starting position. It's just a vague notion of "women are oppressed" which justifies almost anything whether that helps a specific gender imbalance in that sector or is just some kind of revenge action in the assumption that two wrongs make a right.

Secondly, they *can't* be measured simply because the advantages and disadvantages are specific to each gender and can't be easily scored on a point scale. On that basis I disagree with all policies which just give one gender some advantage without analysis how that fits in the bigger picture.

&gt;I did qualify my slavery point with the phrase "land-owning.

And I specifically countered with an example of a non-land owning man. 

&gt;Even then, I guess you could make the argument that poor men had the most to lose from the legalization of slavery: a whole new labor force would enter the market and compete with them for low-skilled labor.

And that's exactly why we shouldn't support measures that do more harm than good just because they make people feel good about themselves, for example releasing the animals on a fur farm: it disrupts the local ecosystem and all these animals died stressed and miserably anyway. Likewise you can't expect a landless laborer to support the abolition of slavery if you *explicitly trivialize* his concerns about the shock to his employment opportunities if abolition happens.

&gt;Back to men and women. I absolutely believe you can find examples of some men lacking power and some women having more, but by and large, non-gender factors being equal, in general it doesn't operate that way. White men make more money than white women. 

The gender gap actually disappears mostly if you correct for part time work, non-monetary benefits, risk, etc. Not to mention that childless women under 30 make more than childless men at the same age.

&gt;Black men make more money than black women. Women are more likely to be poor. There are fewer female CEOs than male CEOs. And so on.

And yet white women still make more than black men, and in the end, the wealth of your parents is still the major determinant to your fate in life: wealth is the main privilege, and the rest is a sideshow.

I can easily provide some counterexamples: men have shorter life expectancies, are more likely to be victim of violence, more likely to be incarcerated, more likely to commit suicide, face harsher sentences, are less likely to get into higher education, more likely to die in occupational hazards, etc.

So how does that prove that women are oppressed and men are not? All genders get the short end of the stick in some way. People who strive for equality just acknowledge that and strive to solve specific issues in a way that improves equality, instead of engaging in a ridiculous dick measuring/beauty contest about who is the most oppressed gender and claiming preferential attention based on that status.&gt;You're reading your own thoughts into this. I said specifically: "men are for a fact murdering women" and never there did I use the word "all" so the fact that you're bringing that up feels irrelevant.

If you don't qualify, "men" means men in general. Even then, why would some men murdering women mean that there is a misogyny problem? Then why is the same - there are women murdering men - not good enough proof for the equivalent?

&gt;And once again, no - I did not say that. I said specifically: "IF you'd want to call out one group for hatred" which means, if we're going to call out one group for hatred, why not theoretically do that to males?

Being a man is not a choice. Being a feminist is.

Did I say that it wasn't racism? Y

ou just can't call it racist without data to back it up. One, that's prejudice. Two, it won't allow us to combat the problem effectively.&gt;  never once even mentioned the size of any group and my arguments had nothing to do with a herd mentality.

You said: "There's no reason to believe that people who oppose feminism due to the way it "is practiced" are a large portion of the opposition in the first place."

So, why does it matter how **large** that group of people is?

So your argument actually is "you can always do a coup later if you make some shitty laws now, so just do what I say".Stressing competitiveness and expensive high tech solutions *will* result in consolidation, standardization and mass production. Because that's how they wring the last few cents out of the production methods.No, not at all. You need a lot of people with working knowledge of technology organized in supply chains. You can't just look up in a book how to build a skycraper or produce silicon chips.&gt;I do believe that humans would be able to rebuild. Not all the knowledge about modern civilization would be lost. Our descendants wouldn't have to reinvent engines and printing presses and electricity. It might take a thousand years.

It depends how far down they fall. Plato noted that down in his Kritias and Timaeus dialogues where they complained that Athens had been destroyed before, and only the illiterate herders in the mountains survived.

In fact, I think it would take longer to recover now, because all our tech is quite specialized. It's reasonable to assume people can figure out the function of an abacus or printing press if they find one, but how are they going to figure out the function of a computer and digital press, even if they find - by miracle - an undamaged set?

&gt;Even if it took a million years, that's nothing on the time scales we are talking about.

If that's True, then it's too early to speak of a Fermi paradox - we're not measuring for long yet.
No, afterwards. If standard A and standard B are declared equivalent, then they will pick the standard set that is least stringent, effectively forcing the strict set B to conform to the lax set A.And yet feminism puts the blame on the shoulder of men, and exonerates women, even though men are born into the system just like anyone else and women perpetuate it too.This is important context.Dolphins might be intelligent, but they have no hands, so they're very limited in tool-use. They're much less likely to create a technological civilization.&gt; Maybe the alien jellyfish are just happy chilling in the ocean and don't want to explore outside their amish community.

Perhaps that's True proof of *intelligent* life."Even now, Bleys and I could find Shadow Ambers where each of us ruled, and spend all of time and eternity ruling there. But this would not be the same, for us. For none would be the True Amber, the city into which were were born, the city from which all others take their shapes. " Roger Zelazny - Nine Princes in Amber.... Because "compete with commercial mass media" has been written in their evaluation methods. They're obliged to get x amount of viewers - quantity above quality.Well, they were copypasting from Belga before too.One of their objectives is to get a certain number of viewers, and another to attract a diverse audience. That pretty much necessitates them to compete with commercial channels for viewers.
I think "it's good for us" is part and parcel of environmentalist thought. The common good includes us, indivdually, too.&gt; Yes, and men in general isn't the same thing as all men. If I say that I generally don't like Asian food it doesn't mean I dislike all Asian food.

No, but if you say "Asian food" it could well be considered categorical. So, I assume you want to say "some". Even then, why would some men murdering women mean that there is a misogyny problem? Then why is the same - there are women murdering men - not good enough proof for the equivalent?

&gt;Since there's such an overabundance of men committing murder, rape and similar stuff towards women compared to women committing the same things towards men - I don't think they're equivalent, though obviously bad in both cases.

Is that statistic proof of misogyny? I don't think the larger prevalence of crime in the black population proves that black people are predisposed for crime or have some crime-supporting ideology.&gt; Solanas' main work isn't attempted murder, it's a text - just as Polanski's main work isn't the pedophilia. But if we're going to connect Solanas' acts to fans of her work, why not do the same thing with Polanski's fans?

Come on, SCUM  was the acronym for "society for cutting up men" and that's pretty much what she tried: killing a man. 

&gt;And if it's just about the artwork about killing men evoking readers to do the same,

Solanas herself insisted that her work was dead serious.

&gt;Also, you didn't give an example of feminists committing extreme deeds against men - you mentioned one feminist who did one thing against one man.

Moving the goalposts, aren't we? You have your example of a well-know, published feminist who promotes eliminating men and attempted murder on three. And she is not even hushed up, but still popular among many feminists. That's like someone who was a KKK member and shot several blacks, severely wounding one, now being lauded as inspirational figure for eg. the Tea Party.

In addition, of course the frequency is different. Women have less to gain from physical confrontations, so they use other means to exploit their privileges, for example the automatic assumption that they are the victim in physical confrontations, or manipulating men to pick fights on their behalf.



AdditionallyThat assessment is open for interpretation, and the Commission is known to be on the side of looser interpretation, favouring the comfort of the industry rather than the strictness of the standard. Public scrutiny will force them to be more careful.

But what happens if afterwards we decide it to be necessary to instate more strict standards? The legislation would either be ineffective, as companies just would declare to use the other regulatory environment, or actually a boycott of our own industry, since they would move away to the US. Neither is acceptable.Makes sense.Well, in that case, why do you care that it's used to house people in the mean time? In fact it's better for the building to be heated and cleaned during the winter.&gt; This policy is not compatible with any sane definition of freedom.

So according to you these people should freeze on the streets while there are empty, unused buildings right there? How is that *sane*?&gt;It's a path to pure communism when you redistribute property based on "need".

Next you're going to say that everyone will get all the resources necessary to make something of their life? The horror!If there are homeless people *and* empty buildings at the same time, then the market has failed to distribute resources efficiently, and we must correct it.Small businesses don't have big unused properties.Relatively speaking, it was. Even the dirty industrial smokestacks of the time produced less pollution in aggregate than we do today.Unsurprisingly you're cooking up a bunch of nonsense to obfuscate the issue. Feel free to keep deluding yourself that anyone who criticizes you is either a retrograde caveman or an irrelevant minority. Don't be surprised if your echo chamber becomes dank though.

And yet farmers are badly paid and under high pressure. That's what more unrestrained competition will do: put a downward pressure on wages, or make Europe completely dependent on food imports. Neither is a good situation.&gt; Russia is bombing any and all suspicious groups in Syria, America has special forces mixed in with these groups. Some country's of the middle east side with America and some side with Russia. Now if it comes down to picking sides, currently Europe is already divided over the byproducts of events in the middle east for the last number of years e.g. migrants crisis, war on terror and what ever else. Europe's elite will side with America some will try to stay neutral others may revolt and support Russia(not likely but possible)

Nothing of that changes with or without refugees.

&gt;If you have any sense in your head you will realize that we are a Hair\u2019s breadth away from WWIII.

If you have any sense in your head you will wear purple stocking on tuesdays. No, there is no WW3 coming up. At worst it's going to be a proxy war, and why would that result in WWIII? Nobody has anything to gain by that.

&gt;Now the migrants could be 99.9999% all perfectly normal safe sound awesome funny happy peaceful people, but if an isis member sneaks in and bombs a school, Europe will arm up over night and we will march on syria and isis.

I doubt we will, the same reasons why we don't do it now already will still be valid then (cost, nothing to gain, much to lose). Even if we do, it's still no WWIII.


Feel free to formulate a coherent argument based on that analysis.Their competence is always determined by the treaty though.People have priorities. They'll burn libraries to keep warm if it comes down to that. They'll let computers crumble if the alternative is slowing down their conquest plans. Unless you have some kind of monastic order who abstains from wealth and power, there's no way people will divert resources from other goals to care for weird old stuff nobody can use anymore. We only have a tiny part of the 
Roman literature and non-fiction treatises too, and they had much less technology to preserve.&gt;The US is open to including financial services in TTIP, but European banks have to be brought up to the new US standard, not US banks being brought down to the current EU standard. This is a perfect example of the trade deal putting upward pressure on standards.

Only because one of the participants pushes for it. This is not inherent to such a treaty. But if, in the future, they want even higher standards, they will have no bargaining power anymore to push for it. And that's why mutual recognition is a bad idea. If the treaty would *oblige* all partners to adhere to the most strict standard any partner wanted to introduce, it would be an upward pressure. But it's not.It's really laughable to think that a TV is useful without electricity and someone who sends programs..

Everything depends on the level of destruction of course, but let's just go to the "trade stops" level for some reason: no more mechanized agriculture, no more fertilizer. Instantly a lot of places are overpopulated. Population will have to switch to agricultural labor for a large part. Food will be scarce. Scientists have trouble getting funding now, they will have trouble getting *food* then. Anyone who doesn't produce food is just another mouth to feed and must justify his existence in some other way. No matter how you slice it, a lot less people will be able to spend their time on technology. The ones that do will be needed to scramble for survival. A lof of technology will go unused, and turn into scrap through time. Another fraction is useless without support or networks. The people who know about it will either be conscripted in agriculture, in the army to fight about the scraps that are left, and be unavailable. The rest will simply not be able to use that knowledge due to lack of resources, so most of it will die within the first generation. The new generation will only know a fraction what the previous one knows, and unless they manage to set up a methodology to maintain their knowledge with technology that works with the existing resource base, more will be lost every generation.[Contrary to common sense, experiments demonstrate that giving free money to people actually works, and is more efficient than having a large administrative apparatus to check on them. A small experiment involving 13 homeless men took place in London, May 2009. All these people had been sleeping on the streets for between 4 and 45 years. That spring, a local charity decided to run a social experiment offering them a personalized budget of 3,000 pounds in cash, with no guidance. The men could decide how to spend the money. There was no allocation system for the resources, no any assessment of their needs, help services were optional. No questions. No requirements. *The results exceeded expectations! Eleven men out of thirteen found accommodation, talked positively about their lives and started making some plans for the future. None wasted their money on alcohol and drugs.*](http://blog.fundrazr.com/liferazr/why-we-should-give-free-money-to-the-homeless/)

Another article with more examples: https://decorrespondent.nl/541/Why-we-should-give-free-money-to-everyone/20798745-cb9fbb39

And if that still disturb you, it's not money. It's a roof over their head. Tell me how they're going to abuse that.We exhausted the easily accessible ores and fuels. We can't do the same stepping stone development cycle again.

In a million years a lot can happen. We could evolve to be dumber herd animals, or solitary nomadic predators again.. Or we could just go extinct due to a nasty climate hiccup or meteorite. Anything could happen.Homeless people can and do get support if they ask for it - or even just accept it - in most western European countries. Those that don't have psychological problems or don't want to be dependent for some reason.Last time I checked they did, feel free to provide data.He could dig holes before noon and fill them again in the afternoon, and that would be very hard work, but he isn't entitled to admiration because of that. I explained you why I think he's overrated. We both are allowed to like or dislike his music.&gt; Are you genuinely claiming that the EU is known for its lax standards?

With regards to banking, they apparently are the laxer side in the negotiations. The commission is known to be quite in favour of deregulation, see https://www.reddit.com/r/europe/comments/3mop4n/french_minister_ttip_talks_are_not_transparent/cvljfdg

&gt;The laxer standard would then cease to be equivalent.

The treaty would be dead letter if anyone can opt out of it selectively at a whim. That would effectively mean that any country can stop products from other countries entering by simply changing a variable 0,1%. That's simply not how those treaties work.
Why do you think that the EU is somehow exempt from market mechanisms?&gt;It does not automatically do that no, however it does not prevent members from increasing standards.

The countries that do that will not be able to forbid goods with lower standards from being sold, since they recognized them as being equivalent, so they have no way to enforce it. It will only result in production moving away from them.

&gt;The US and Canada have been members of a fairly all encompassing trade deal for a couple decades. Both have increased financial regulation, environmental protections, and other regulations during this time.

And both have dropped legislation under pressure of the "this will harm the economy! think of the competition!" chorus. This idea already circulates, they'll be strengthened.

&gt;Especially "public good" regulations that are virtually always exempted.

AFAIAC *all* regulations are for the public good. So that's just whitewashing for the fact that they indeed do prevent some regulations.

&gt;My main criticism is it does not seem like any of these concerns apply to any other trade deals. The Canadian trade deal was finalized and the only outrage I saw in here was from people who thought it was TTIP. And the Vietnam deal being finalized actually was praised. Seems like a lot of doom and gloom relating to one deal (likely it will be very similar to Canada's) while everyone else gets a pass.

Not all free trade deals have the same content. The Vietnamese one, for example, is mostly just about reducing tariffs, something which already is in force with the USA. Free trade is not some objective, unambiguous characteristic - the implementation makes a lot of difference.

In addition, political attention is a limited resource. Clearly a deal with the USA will have more consequences than one with Canada or Vietnam. If TTIP is the treaty where we succeed in raising awareness for the negative effects of practices that are included in free trade treaties, then that's a good thing AFAIAC. It's not because we didn't manage to stop the negative practices in previous treaties, that we have to let all treaties pass unmodified. It may even become sufficient to revise and improve existing treaties.

IMO a country should simply dictate its standards to *any* seller, inside or outside the country: if they don't comply, they can't sell there. If that results in less imports, it's their problem, and free trade has nothing to do with that. That way you wouldn't need free trade treaties because everyone already has the same right to sell there, just comply with the standards. (IMO This also extends to areas like wage policy and social contributions or carbon tax etc. - countries should be able to levy an equivalent tax if that tax hasn't been levied in the source country yet.)&gt; Most materials lying around in this scenario could be recycled

Not without the appropriate technology and industrial support network.

&gt;which in many cases probably would require less knowledge and energy than getting them from the ground.

You can't just have some fragments of knowledge. That's the difference between using an old car to build a doghouse, and producing a new car.

&gt;Besides, there's probably quite an amount of materials just laying in warehouses and refineries around the world at any given moment which could provide a good base to build on.

That really isn't anywhere close to a functioning economy, and not enough to build a self-sustaining one. You'd be surprised anyway, with just in time delivery, how little that is.

&gt;As for fuels, again, there's a ton of refined fuel already in circulation which wouldn't be used

It's absurd to think that you're going to sustain an entire technological civilization with the gas that is left in the pipelines and fuel left in the tanks of vehicles.

&gt;options such as wood, charcoal, biogas and even wind turbines and solar concentrators wouldn't require people to dig for hard to reach oil.

It takes time and resources to set those up, and they're actually inferior to fossil fuels - they aren't as concentrated energy sources, and less flexible. They simply don't allow that much bootstrapping, you still would need to make heavy cuts into non-essential services, and that inevitably includes a lot of high-tech.

&gt;Also as far as I know, there's plenty of coal left still that isn't necessarily hard to reach.

The low-hanging fruit is gone. No imports, so no oil-based machinery. Those machines are mostly useless scrap, or will be soon as there is not enough fuel and they'll rust away.

Honestly, it would be a huge, disruptive effort of decades just to reorganize the economy today to run on local resources exclusively ASAP, without other restrictions. But then you're trying to do it in the aftermath of catastrophic destruction...I never said he didn't put hard work in his performances. But so does Eddy Wally. Hard work doesn't automatically guarantee quality or entitle one to admiration.I think you may underestimate how much industry and transport-related pollution increased with the advent of consumerist society and the personal automobile after WW2.&gt; Regulated competitiveness with anti-monopolistic legislation is the solution. Not blindly objecting progress on some nonsensical anti-science fear mongering.

Neither is blind approval of anything someone with a lab coat cooks up. I think putting the burden of proof of safety on the ones who come up with new things is a good way to approach the issue, just like we should have put the burden of proof of safety on the shoulders of the sellers of asbestos, nicotine and DDT. 

&gt;We have a much higher variety and abundance now than ever before because of technological advancements in agriculture

That's just nonsensical. Fruit is getting standardized, heavily in favour of easy transportability and storage, rather than taste, health or adaptation to local growing circumstances. Heirloom species are having trouble everywhere and require special attention to be preserved.

&gt;just because there are some potential drawbacks doesn't mean we need to aspire for a return to sustenance farming.

I never advocated a "return to sustenance farming". It seems you're fearmongering and blindly painting anyone who dares disrupt the circlejerk as a retrograde caveman.

&gt;Demand quality control, demand legislation to fight excessive agro patents, don't call for anti-GMO, that's just stupid.

If we ban it first we can give specific permits later. If we allow anything we can only ban things that have already caused damage afterwards, and then we still need to clean up the mess.&gt; You're completely missing the point. They're not going to use to TV. Rather, when they want to make something like a TV again they don't have to invent it from scratch.

Unless they're copying exactly what we have done, they won't have the same networks, standards etc. It'll take more effort to figure out in which environment those apparatuses functioned than to just build some new ones that function in *their* society and networks.

&gt;On a similar note, technology gives a huge edge in battle, farming, etc. so there would be an incentive not to just send your smarted three or four dudes off to die.

Only if you can reasonably apply it. A hundred pikes *now* are more useful than a riot gun maybe ten years in the future, or a satellite guided missile if you have no working satellites anymore. You don't only need three wizards, you also need an industrial production system, and if you don't already have it, you simply can't spare the time to build it. Then you're better off using melting the copper wire of your electronics down to to make bronze swords and breastplates. And pity if it's misapplied.&gt; Who said we need that ?

That's what you do when you have conditional support mechanisms that you're only entitled to if you're sick, unemployed, etc. Then you have to have an administration that checks whether people are really sick, unemployed etc. and that's money that's not being used for helping people.

&gt;Did they execute ? Do they have jobs now ? That's the important part..

Read the articles. There are plenty of succesful examples that gave better results than the standard approach and were actually cheaper because there was less administrative overhead..&gt; I don't. However the EU will never become fully dependent on food imports.

Food prices are made at the margin. Underproducing 5% already means we'll be suffering much more from price spikes in the case of undersupply of the global market. If we don't supply 100% of our food consumption, I consider us dependent. Trade is still possible, but we must at least produce something edible.



Trade is still possible, I said. Just producing something edible suffices.&gt; Also, there was a great article here a few weeks ago about solar in Pakistan. They were saying that large solar farms in desert areas require a lot of cleaning to have maximum efficiency and that it uses a lot of water, in already dry environments, making solar compete with agriculture.

As it happens, nuclear power plants require a lot of water too - they even get shut down in France in the summer from time to time. Now what?&gt;Did you know that solar panels are made with the energy from coal in China?

There is no natural law that requires that. If you would refine uranium ore in China it would use the same dirty energy.

China provides a lot of stuff due to artificial weakening of their currency and lax environmental regulation. That's a matter of trade, not environmental policy. If they would produce cars instead they'd still pollute.

The only thing you have proven is that China's industrial production standards are quite shitty. No shit, Sherlock.Who are you arguing against? I don't think that anyone says that we should build more coal plants. In Cherbobyl, Bejibg, Lobdon, Bew York or abywhere else.&gt;Environmentalists urged to ditch their historical antagonism and embrace a broad energy mix

If nuclear energy proponents would actually argue for a mix of energy sources instead of "give all funding to nuclear energy, renewables are for wimps" then that would be nice.

&gt; Right now nuclear is just asking for the same subsidies that "green" energy sources get.

Renewables are just asking to catch up with the same subsidies that nuclear has been getting the last 50 years and as part of the WW2 budgets while they got nothing all. *Then* we can make a fair comparison.

But let's not forget the real issue: worldwide the most energy subsidies still go to fossil fuel.Then why do they only urge environmentalists and no one else? Clearly they simply want less renewables and more nuclear energy.&gt; That way they will keep coming, this doesn't discourage them the least.

So you don't want to avoid people taking risks, you want to avoid them coming.

&gt;A pushback is not an infringement on their human rights. Italy had been doing it for years, until the ECHR started making a problem of it. Australia is still doing it.

If the court of human rights makes a problem about it, then it's an infringement on human rights. That's why we have the ECHR.

&gt;This is not Apartheid. Once the migrants receive Belgian nationality, they can have the same rights. There's a difference between human rights and civil rights.

If you have two groups of people living on the same territory in the same society but they have different rights, then that's Apartheid. Especially given that they will have significantly less rights.That's the cause indeed. Greens frequently criticize the open and hidden subsidies to fossil fuels eg. in transport policy though - I have yet to see nuclear promotors do that. They typically seem to target renewables and have no problem with fossil fuels.&gt; I don't know that anyone's arguing for "give it all to nuclear".

I frequently encounter people who do exactly that. 

&gt;I have heard a similar argument come out of the renewables camp, but hey.

That would still bring us closer to a healthy mix while the buildout lasts.

&gt;My whole argument is, lets build everything that we can demonstrate is safe, stable, very low carbon, and appropriate to the task. That includes nuclear (and in some cases, like intercontinental transport and shipping, is exclusive to it). For electricity, its wind, hydro, and nuclear. For desalination, and ocean deacidification, its wind, wave, solar, and nuclear. For fuel synthesis, its solar CST and nuclear. Sure, nuclear's in a lot of those spots, but only because its reliable and flexible.

It's not flexible. It's a big chunk of energy in one place that takes ages to construct and keeps causing trouble long after it has been useful. 

Its virtue, compared with renewables, is that it's weather-independent. So that's a reason to keep some around. But even constructing new ones will take twenty years, and then you have a nuclear plant with technology that is twenty years old, and likely will be 70 years behind the times when it's finally decommissioned. Renewables are faster to construct and faster to react to technological improvements.

I also think it's really weird to use nuclear for desalinization or deacidification: those areas are excellently suited for renewables, because there their only big downside, intermittency, becomes irrelevant.If you completely ignore the fact that their coughing comfort will be flooded by rising sea levels in the next century, sure.The best hydro spots are occupied already though, and in use where possible. I don't think hydro is contested particularly.&gt; I don't believe that the people in this scenario wouldn't figure out a way to make do with those less concentrated energy sources.

Make do? Sure. Just continuing on our merry way? Not quite. A lot will be lost, and we won't have the easy resources anymore to catch up again like we did first. It's far from a given.

&gt;Besides, a high level of technology isn't necessary for the population to increase, which would further speed up the progress. 

Plentiful energy and mineral resources are though. And the easily accessible ones are already used, and without the industry to process it en masse it's probably not cost-effective to apply it as population-increasing standard technology like we do with fertilizer and farming mechanization now, which will prevent positive feedback loops to have an actual industrial revolution this time.

&gt;Also, it's not like all books just magically disappear - pretty much everything pre-computers that hasn't been burned or rotted away will be filled with information about machinery, materials and so forth. They wouldn't be starting from scratch, neither information or technologywise.

Sure, there will be something, but the example of the Roman Empire shows that's it's disappointingly little. The library content lists that survived show a huge amount of works that we know existed, but are no longer available to us now, even after centuries of research trying to recover them; most of it is lost.No nuclear plant has ever been built without significant subsidies, implicitly and explicitly.

That has nothing to do with regulatory "hurdles", which are actually necessary for a certain level of safety.To cool they need to have ready access to water supply, water that isn't available to other purposes then.

They also need to shut down because the water doesn't cool enough anymore, if it's too hot already.And do you consider those numerous examples evidence for misogyny? If yes, than this is also sufficient evidence for misandry. If not, then you can't use that violence to support "society is misogynistic".Tell me more.If the number of limbs is in any way related to effectiveness, then I, for one, welcome our new cephalopod overlords.Well if it boils down to a matter of *taste* whether there's widespread misogyny or not, then I think it's not really a good practice to found an entire movement on that premise, and lambast people for not having the same taste in analysing society.Perhaps he couldn't walk, but he could still stand upright.Check out "God, the Devil and Bob".It's more like "ur security sucks lol". It's rather benevolent hacking, if a bit childish.&gt; What does offending supposedly backward Muslim beliefs accomplish?

You talk like they were offending them on purpose. They were criticizing them, and some muslims thought that was offensive. Taking offense is a *choice*.&gt; The remedy for insulting speech is to fight back with more speech. Not murder.

Except if a pineapple insults you.Pretty much.And now the French nuclear industry was involved in the Olkiluoto plant in Finland too, and they're grossly over budget and over time. It seems they have unlearnt how to do it.So what? It'll just be a proxy war, at worst. Vietnam was bad, but not a world war. A world war is where the continued existence of most countries is in question, or are involved in direct attacks against another large coalition.Of course there are, if only the implicit guarantee that the state will clean up the mess if anything bad happens in the future, long after the shareholders have had their profit, and the explicit legal guarantee that they're not liable for damage caused above a certain threshold. Additionally, subsidies earmarked as "research" actually are used to provide services to the nuclear industry.

[Nuclear energy: still not viable without subsidy](http://www.google.be/url?url=http://earthtrack.net/files/uploaded_files/nuclear%2520subsidies_report.pdf&amp;rct=j&amp;q=&amp;esrc=s&amp;sa=U&amp;ved=0CBMQFjAAahUKEwiDwPWO_anIAhWBWxoKHcf1D0g&amp;sig2=6X0mP9AotuhAz15eIpSPow&amp;usg=AFQjCNEBavam_TpdrTxPljceCsy5IT45ww)We don't elect mayors. We elect a city/local council. The council, in turn, appoints a mayor to serve as the local executive power, who is confirmed by the Regional executive power as their representative too. The job of a mayor, as part of the executive power, is to execute the laws, not to make them. If he doesn't do his job he can be refused/dismissed, just like any other civil servant in the city administration can be dismissed for not doing his job.Well, if it's about historical agression, then fuck France...You seemed to imply that by claiming that the elections would need to be declared void.&gt;  to home country.

Hard to prove where they come from without papers.Peace in the Middle East would be strong enough.Most fossil fuel subsidies still go to fossil fuels, and most energy use is fossil. If they want to increase share of nuclear, then displacing fossil fuels is the most sensible choice rather than displacing renewables.

Right now it just seems that they want to nip a competitor in the bud rather than reduce emissions.And how is that a reason to deny asylum to those who actually are entitled to it?&gt;I am politically None in today's society without acting in the extreme. My vote doesn't matter at any level of government. 

That's correct, and that's how it should be. If the vote of an individual would decide things, we'd live in a dictatorship.

So to change anything you have to build support and organize. If you want to change society you have to be social in some way. People need a visible group that where they can find support for their ideas. If they're just an individual vs. the authority figures in City Hall, they'll feel intimidated. That's natural. They'll feel a lot less intimidated if they feel supported by like-minded people. To make that possible people at the very least have to speak in favour of alternatives.

Local issues are the easiest because they're less abstract. You name a few very specific problems ( I'm currently in a very small town where the roads destroy cars, the ubiquitous four-way-stops cause daily car crashes, and small businesses fail or can't start due to legacy government.): have you spoken to other people about them? Do they agree? Can you convince them? Have you come out in public to promote solutions? Are there political candidates considering them? If not, have you considered running yourself or supporting someone who would? These are all things you can reasonably do. For example, replacing the most dangerous crossroads with a roundabout. That's a very specific goal, with a clear objective and visible measure of success, well-supported by evidence and in the interest of everyone. That is easy to campaign on.&gt; They just don't get reported on as much because it goes against the agenda.

So, it's a conspiracy?&gt; Why is the gun control crowd only vocal after mass shootings then?

Because that's when a single gun makes a lot of victims - impactful events demand taking a clear stance if you care anbout an issue at all. The rest is more a statistical issue and that is more what fuels the long-term effort.Yep, that's pretty much it.The reason being it happened in a country on the other side of the planet.&gt;Its giving a privileged group more privilege at the expense of a less privileged group to describe it sufficiently.

Gender privilege is not an amorphous mass that can be tallied and compared. Gender privilege consists of very specific stereotypes that make it harder and easier for people to do specific things. People want different specific things, and it's when they want different things than their gender is expected to want that there is a problem for these people. You can't just say that all men get 10% more what they want then women in every aspect of their life. Some may, some may not, depending on what they want - and they most likely want some things that are in their stereotype, and want other things that don't fit in their stereotype. Gender stereotypes are not uniformly beneficial to people of a specific gender or even uniformly beneficial to a given person of that gender.

&gt;But it does undermine rape by giving disproportionate attention to a statistically small number of crimes while also ignoring the fact that other crimes had similar False report rates. It would be like over emphasizing False theft reports over actual theft despite the fact theft occurs far more often. Not only does it undermine actual rape, it can also lead to an environment which rape victims are treated skeptically, something which makes it much harder for them to report the rape.

The difference is that an accusation of theft doesn't ruin your reputation and career that much. It's also something that has material proof, while rape generally ends up being a word against word situation, and the fact that people don't communicate rationally and objectively while courting each other doesn't help.I don't see why you need to declare either one the victim and the other one the oppressor. Both men and women suffer in different ways from restrictive stereotypes. The problems of one gender don't invalidate the problems of the other gender. They also are all specific issues that need to be solved in their own right without impacting the other gender, or to be solved by recalibrating social norms for both genders on the standard of equality... not trying to make something right by introducing another wrong as compensation.Well, some people care a lot. Others don't talk about it.It's completely free actually, you pay the health insurer for administrative services and some additional coverage. If you join the public health insurance fund (HZIV) you don't need to pay any membership fees, and are eligible for all the legally mandated reimbursements.&gt;Most likely the guy would respond the way you would respond. 

Definitely not. This is the main source of problems between the sexes: assuming they think the same and react the same.Get physically close. The rest is social lubricant.Soylent yellow.&gt; Is wind or solar really much of a replacement for coal? One is more or less guaranteed output, the other is not.

Renewables are a good match for battery vehicles: most are in the parking lot most of the time, ready to absorb cheap excesses of renewable electricity on the net.Only the cost of the batteries is holding them back right now. Either a lighter or a cheaper battery would make them cheaper than regular cars. The engine is less complicated, so cheaper to construct, easier to maintain and the fuel is cheaper too.The operational range isn't a problem for 75% of people, who only use their car for trips well below the range. The batteries are the main problem indeed, but that's the only problem there is. Electric cars are superior to conventional ones on every other area.&gt;The alternative would be moving humans out of polluted areas.

Humans create pollution.Sure, it's just the legal minimum. But it's good to know that the extra services of private health insurers are optional. People tend to overlook the legal option. Especially people who complain about the government and say that it should be privatized. Well, it already is... People can effectively choose a better performing administration if they're not happy with their current one. I had a job there for half a year once, so I know they're easily overlooked (1% of all insured people in Belgium).

&gt; This thread is a good example of that. Some of the MRA's in this thread have only made me question their integrity more. They seem more interested in discrediting and suppressing rather than teaching as indicated by the mass down votes and nit picking sources.

Citing sources is not just a token of good will: if your view is based on incomplete or otherwise inadequate sources, it would be wise to reconsider it.

&gt;The Opt out option would give that choice strictly to the man, as it would make it exceedingly difficult for a woman to raise a child alone if the man opts out.

As opposed to completely impossible for the man to raise a child alone if the woman opts out. So it would *still* end up being in favour of the woman due to physical restrictions on gestating a child.

&gt; It would effectively make the choice into; have an abortion, put the child up for adoption, or live in poverty if you are not already wealthy.

Yes. And why would that justify conscripting a man into fathering a child he never had any intention or promise to father? 

The choice is still up the woman to decide what she wants to do in that situation. I don't see why a man should be forced to bear the consequences of a decision the woman makes.

&gt;I explain the problem with this in the OP. This argument effectively states that removing the discrimination women face reduces the pay gap. Women are socialized away from certain career paths (usually ones that make more money) just as an example.

The opportunity to change that lies with the parents (and perhaps education, but women are already overrepresented in education, on both sides of the classroom, so probably not). And then you have issues like women generally preferring men as partners who have higher status and make more than them... that really is up to them to change.

It's not a matter of outright discrimination like is often implied (eg. "women get paid less for the same job" - by and large they get paid the same for the same jobs, *if you include immaterial advantages like flexible work hours, safety or short commutes in the comparison*). So quota and the like aren't going to change anything for the better; on the contrary, more women will have to be picked from a smaller pool of candidates, so you're going to end up with women being less capable on average than men, confirming bad stereotypes.

Little girl + That which was taken = Rain of TearsRefresh the distinction between deflation and inflation.It might have been, but right now most of the damage has been done - they've fallen under the prosperity level of Slovakia and Lithuania by now. They may as well keep enjoying the benefits of being in the Eurozone in the future now.He must have, to be able to pull off taking someone's place like a he did, IMO.You can be loyal without being lawful, easily. Given that Shojo connected with Belkar by virtue of being Chaotic, it stands to reason that our Halfling Haruspex is going to shift on the good-evil axis while firmly retaining chaoticness as the cornerstone of his identity. Let's not go overboard and even consider pulling him to good. Changing one step is huge already, and even characters like V aren't good, just neutral.&gt; it won't be released for another 2-4 days.


&gt; posted 6 days ago

:(Only this year though. Last year only a third of the refugees in 1992 (the Yugoslavian wars) arrived.&gt; EU has never been in the big 3, that's absolutely ridiculous claim. 

Economically, they absolutely are. Militarily too, albeit without coordination. Still nobody ain't going to poke a stick in it unless they're suicidal. Politically not of course, too much infighting. &gt;The risk for the rEU is that the UK, once out, tries to go for a fundamental renegotiation encompassing Switzerland, Norway and Turkey.

Then why would the UK suddenly be willing and able to function in a group of countries?Sure, most people do.No, I asked for a *plausible* scenario.Okay, I see it's corrected now.

&gt;Separate point; the debt has to be paid in Euros, not drachma, and Greece can't do much to set the exchange rate, especially since confidence in the currency would be low.

If they're going to default, they're not going to pay it back anyway.Timeo Danaos, et dona ferentes..

The current situation as it is, in the EU, is that a quarter of the electricity production already is nuclear-based. That's plenty already - it seems that nuclear has had no problem establishing itself. Meanwhile renewables face their own nimby opposition. So instead of demanding support from environmentalists (while dismissing their arguments against nuclear as mere "negative stigma"), they could simply start supporting renewables on their own, if they really think a mix is a good idea - nuclear already has double the presence of scaleable (non-hydro, which is strictly geographically limited) renewables in the EU electricity production mix.

I don't see what they hope to accomplish with that anyway. It's not like we're expanding renewables at full capacity: the lack of funding and commitment is the constraint, not the lack of viable options. An increase of nuclear construction without an increase in energy budgets will just lead to less renewables, more nuclear. Why would environmentalists support that? The nuclear sector is perfectly capable of lobbying for extra money on their own, and environmentalists really don't have any political power or budgets they don't know what to do with.

Lastly, nuclear plants take decades to construct (and are traditionally over time and over budget, yet another reason why environmentalists aren't happy with such a cuckoo chick in the energy budget). They're simply too sluggish and cumbersome to make much difference on the needed timescale. I doubt the industry is capable of maintaining the current generation capacity, let alone expand.The movement in general does so. Criticism is often waved away as "male privilege", regardless of the quality of the argumentation. I've seen it too often. You personally have been very civil though.&gt;So you're saying that if numerous examples and statistics can serves an example for something - then one single event is definitely proof of the opposite?

You asked for an example, I gave one. It counters any claim that feminism would be free of extremism or misandry.

&gt;Do you project the acts and views of an artist onto their fans in all cases or is it just when it concerns feminists?

I do so cases where the person and their ideas are lauded as an important figure in the movement decades later still. You'd think that they at least would have the decency to be a bit embarrassed by the events and find better examples to uphold ...&gt; If you want to organise safe and easy transport, you should be prepared to accept 4 million refugees (and those are only Syrians, who knows how many Iraqis, Afghans and others want to make use of your service). It's not that I don't want them here, we're just not prepared to take in millions. My solution limits the inflow of migrants and discourages people to make a dangerous trip.

And incidentally makes the trip *even more* dangerous.

&gt;Which human rights are infringed by a pushback? 

Free movement, asylum etc.

&gt;And the ECHR doesn't have its priorities in check. Why don't they do something about Russia and Turkey, who are also member states of the ECHR?

The ECHR depends on the states in question executing its decisions. [They can and do condemn Russia](https://cpj.org/2004/05/european-court-of-human-rights-condemns-russia-in.php), but they don't have an army to enforce that.

&gt;Kids and adults have different rights. Employees and self employd have different rights. By your logic we already have Apartheid.

People grow up automatically to become adults, and then are entitled to the same rights. People can choose to be employed or self employed; people would not be able to choose refugee or normal citizen status. If it's not a choice, but a forced category based on origin, and intended to perpetuate that separation, then it's definitely Apartheid.&gt;What is a coughing comfort?

The comfort you get from electricity in smoggy air.

&gt;And yes, I do completely ignore the rising sea levels in the next century.

How convenient to ignore the parts of reality that you don't like while making the decision which power source to support.

&gt;And even if I didn't, hyro-electric plants would help that problem, not hurt it.

You were saying that you want more coal power, not hydro power.


Feel free to justify why you think that all of the geopolitical actors suddenly would start acting directly against their own interests by starting a world war.

It's also *possible* than an eartquake and tsunami maps up all the combatants and deposits them as neat pile in the middle of Fallujah... but it's not plausible enough to take into account.Electricity outlets are in every house, while gas stations are not. Simply making electricity available on parking lots, not even superchargers, would already be a huge boon - and overkill for most commutes anyway, for those charging at home suffices. The big limiting factor is the price/size/weight of the battery, an electric vehicle is cheaper in construction, maintenance and fueling otherwise than an ICE.Keep correcting.Electric cars can charge at home, something ICE's can't do. That's enough for most commutes already. If you really need to travel long distance then you'll be better off with an ICE for now (few people do)... or you could just apply the correct safe rest times on long travels and let your car recharge at that point.He's Dagobert Duck's evil twin.Trump *is part of* the money that buys cronies.&gt; The rise of british colonised countries (US, Canada, Australia, New Zealand, India) eventually made English the Lingua Franca.

... after WW2.Well...

[The 2013 National Arts Index revealed art spending made up just 0.28 percent of the government\u2019s non-military budget in 2011, with local government spending also dropping by 21 percent over that time. The percentage of American households donating private funds to the arts also declined by almost 9 percent...here is a list of 10 countries that fund citizens to pursue artistic endeavors.](http://www.alternet.org/culture/culturally-impoverished-us-nea-spends-140th-what-germany-doles-out-arts-capita)Well, no. If the people asking for quota were primarily concerned with equality, they'd ask for quota in dirty and dangerous jobs too... after all, much more people work there and are affected than on boards of directors and similar.Female is more normal as adjective. Using "woman" as an adjective is as weird as using "female" as a substantive.&gt; I don't think you understand what is happening. Say a Polish politician wants a law passed but its politically unpopular. He goes to the British politicians and asks them to vote for it in EU parliament. Polish voters have no control over British politicians and the Polish representative can say "well we tried, but were overruled".

That only works when there actually is a majority in the EP for it - and it will apply to all of Europe, not just Poland. That doesn't make sense.

It does happen that they play the victim instead of taking responsibility for what they vote on and do on the European level, but the only way to stop that is not a clear separation of powers - we already have that - it is for their voters to pay attention and call them on their bullshit.&gt;In spite of the source of the article, this is not a Euro-centric message or issue. Worldwide, the picture is completely different with nuclear providing 13% of the world's electricity and 67% coming from fossil fuels.

And by far the largest part of renewables comes from hydro, something that is geographically constrained and won't expand much more. That paints quite a different picture.


&gt;Take the money from the fossil fuel pile and put it into the nuclear pile.

Then why do they need involvement of environmentalists at all? Those have trouble enough promoting their own core agenda without taking on a stepchild. The nuclear club is free to pilfer funding from coal plants and build nuclear plants instead... and there are plenty of countries where the environmentalist movement is sadly almost powerless. Go ahead and replace all the coal plants there with nuclear - it's not the environmentalists stopping that.

&gt;Nothing has to come out of the renewable pile like you say unless you assume fossil fuels as an inevitable constant.

Budgets are constant. Nuclear proponents often argue to fund "real" energy plants, i.e. nuclear, instead of renewables. They're free to set the right example and actually stop dismissing renewables as irrelevant.&gt;In spite of the source of the article, this is not a Euro-centric message or issue. Worldwide, the picture is completely different with nuclear providing 13% of the world's electricity and 67% coming from fossil fuels.

And by far the largest part of renewables comes from hydro, something that is geographically constrained and won't expand much more. That paints quite a different picture.


&gt;Take the money from the fossil fuel pile and put it into the nuclear pile.

Then why do they need involvement of environmentalists at all? Those have trouble enough promoting their own core agenda without taking on a stepchild. The nuclear club is free to pilfer funding from coal plants and build nuclear plants instead... and there are plenty of countries where the environmentalist movement is sadly almost powerless. Go ahead and replace all the coal plants there with nuclear - it's not the environmentalists stopping that.

&gt;Nothing has to come out of the renewable pile like you say unless you assume fossil fuels as an inevitable constant.

Budgets are constant. Nuclear proponents often argue to fund "real" energy plants, i.e. nuclear, instead of renewables. They're free to set the right example and actually stop dismissing renewables as irrelevant.&gt;In spite of the source of the article, this is not a Euro-centric message or issue. Worldwide, the picture is completely different with nuclear providing 13% of the world's electricity and 67% coming from fossil fuels.

And by far the largest part of renewables comes from hydro, something that is geographically constrained and won't expand much more. That paints quite a different picture.


&gt;Take the money from the fossil fuel pile and put it into the nuclear pile.

Then why do they need involvement of environmentalists at all? Those have trouble enough promoting their own core agenda without taking on a stepchild. The nuclear club is free to pilfer funding from coal plants and build nuclear plants instead... and there are plenty of countries where the environmentalist movement is sadly almost powerless. Go ahead and replace all the coal plants there with nuclear - it's not the environmentalists stopping that.

&gt;Nothing has to come out of the renewable pile like you say unless you assume fossil fuels as an inevitable constant.

Budgets are constant. Nuclear proponents often argue to fund "real" energy plants, i.e. nuclear, instead of renewables. They're free to set the right example and actually stop dismissing renewables as irrelevant.Well, do you think that a law should be passed in the UK if the Scots don't like it but the rest of the UK does? It's called a parliamentary majority. Cornwall doesn't get veto rights within the UK either.That's nonsensical. You're advocating for direct democracy and then immediately propose *less* democracy by installing unaccountable technocrats.

There's nothing wrong with parliamentary democracy. The problem is that we don't have a proper one on the EU level: most decisions are taken or vetoed by the Council of states, and the Commission members are put there as representatives of their states (though at least they have to be approved by the EP since recently, we're making progress). Curtailing the influence of individual states is the key to increasing efficiency - many much needed changes are halted by one or two countries (EP single meeting place, stricter fishery policy, tax info exchange etc.).The EU institutions are quite explicitly providing room for even the smallest of nations, as can be seen in eg. the language policy - even the tiny ones get full translations. The EU is gradually taking over more functions of the state, but the whole premise is to accomodate multiple nations in a single political structure, to better defend their interests.Wales or Scotland used to be considered sovereign too. What should and should not be sovereign is a matter of organization, not natural law.&gt;It's not a joke at all. National democracy was the best model of governance we have ever come across in the history of humankind.

Then why did the UK spend so much time as an Empire?... Nation-states were fit for a certain period in history. Now they aren't anymore. Hell, even the UK is the *United* Kingdom - a conglomerate of formerly sovereign parts that joined together to better defend their interests.

&gt;Meanwhile European governance has been a disaster.

Precisely because it still functions as a meeting of nation-states rather than as a single political entity. The EU budget is only 1-2%, the Parliament is very much constrained in its operation, and most decisions can be vetoed by individual countries. That's a failure of too much influence of individual countries, not too much EU.

&gt;Nations are organic things that grow up over long periods.

National homogeneity is a myth. Most of it was enforced manu militari to conform to the "one state, one nation" ideal of the 19th century. Most European states had a period where they forced standardization and tried to assimilate minorities forcibly.

&gt;I don't see the reason to force us into now being European unnecessarily.

You won't. The EU provides every option for nations to have their own policies. If Cornwall ever becomes independent enough, Cornish will become an official language of the EU too. That's why nationalists like Scottish or Catalan independentists are nevertheless eager to join the EU - apparently they feel their nationhood isn't threatened at all as EU member.

&gt; Sorry I wasn't clear. What I mean is if you believe that the distance between a constituent and a representative politician should be small, in order to be more in touch with the needs of the population, then what is hypocritical about being against the EU bureaucracy?

Then why have any higher political unit than a village council at all?You can't have an independent economic policy if you can't change the economic laws independently.Yes, you do. The body rules you need to agree on becomes so large over time and needs to be updated so frequently that you naturally need a legislative body to do that work, a judicial body to resolve conflicts and an executive body to execute it all.&gt;They could possibly negotiate with the EU and get the Switzerland treatment\u2014bilateral agreements to just allow some things, but not otheres.

The relations EU-CH are being streamlined too, though. The Swiss even gave up their banking secrecy.&gt;It depends on what you mean by significant. It is not significant at all compared to solar and wind.

Then why are there plenty of renewable projects without subsidies, but no nuclear ones without?

Every nuclear project at least has the implicit guarantee that the state covers damage above a certain treshold. That is an implicit subsidy, and the insurance to cover that risk is quite expensive, as it can bankrupt most insurance companies. So they'd be hard-pressed to even find that funding on the free market.

&gt;Nobody objects to reasonable safety regulations but just like the Obama administration has made it nearly impossible to build a new coal plant in the U.S., it is nearly impossible to build a new nuclear plant.

If the safety regulations are reasonable, and it's almost impossible to build a new plant, then that's because those plants are too unsafe. We shouldn't take it for granted that it should be possible to build nuclear plants.

&gt;The effect of subsidies is difficult to gauge, as some are indirect (such as research and development). A May 12, 2008 editorial in the Wall Street Journal stated, "For electricity generation, the EIA(Energy Information Administration, an office of the Department of Energy) concludes that solar energy is subsidized to the tune of $24.34 per megawatt hour, wind $23.37 and 'clean coal' $29.81. By contrast, normal coal receives 44 cents, natural gas a mere quarter, hydroelectric about 67 cents and nuclear power $1.59."[102]

The group calculates that, "if nuclear operators were fully insured against the cost of nuclear disasters like those at Chernobyl and Fukushima, the price of nuclear electricity would rise by at least \u20ac0.14 per kWh and perhaps as much as \u20ac2.36, depending on assumptions made".[16]

Take note of the unit differences for comparison!&gt; The EU needs to tidy itself up in anycase and make up its mind

Yes to the first, no to the latter. The EU should do what is useful, and it's up to political scientists and historians to put a suitable name on it afterwards.They are the actual representatives of the population. They should be able to get feedback from their constituents, raise concerns and amend the treaty now, not in some rushed procedure later.Wrong. Parliament is the legislative power in most countries. The Government is delegated by the Parliament to exercise the executive power, which may include updating minor details on some regulations or not.&gt; The EP aren't suppose to have a say on what's inside TTIP. 

In that case, fuck TTIP. We have the EP to deal with EU-wide legislation, so let them do their job.And then there are other renowned things that are grown artifically in the Netherlands..&gt; Can you imagine what the impact would be on Germany if France were able to push a pro-nuclear power position across the whole EU (with support from other EU member states) against the wishes of Germans generally? It wouldn't end well for the proposal or the EU. Yet it seems fine for governments to do exactly that to their own people?

Well, right now France is able to prevent Europe from having the EP meet in one place by using its veto in the Council. That cuts both ways... but in the first case it's a European majority of the population being able to take a step forward, and in the latter its a single country preventing everyone else from moving forward. I prefer the first method to resolve such disagreements (that are *inevitable* anyway).There is a big difference between avoiding traits that are universally and officially recognized as disabilities on one hand, and selecting on *any* traits. I'd say that parents even have the duty to do what they can to avoid the first  but the latter is a bridge too far, because it's susceptible to fads. Fads are okay, but not if the gene pool will irrepairably changed forever after because of them. Even just selecting against inheritable diseases is not straightforward though. For example, sickle cell anemia is anemia and bad, but it also protects against malaria to some extent. So, should it stay or should it go? The deciding factor probably is whatever the parents would do if it was a curable syndrome.

Additionally, it would require perfect knowledge of genetics to practice such selection safely. I'm pretty sure that stadium is a long way off. 

&gt;To be honest, skin color is a poor way to decide the attractiveness of a mate.

I wouldn't reduce race to skin color. [As you can see in the case of albinoes](http://www.africaw.com/images/albino-african-lady.jpg), people look quite different even when that single variable is changed.

I like straight noses and red hair on women. That makes it pretty hard for an African woman to score those points. Does that make me racist? 

I think attraction is pretty much out of our control. What is not out of our control is the way we think about people (for example, the association of black people and low status), so if a woman is generally less attracted to black people because she thinks of them as low status, that may be caused indirectly by racism, but it's not racist in itself. She may simply have other preferences for looks, even if she thinks of black people as equal in every way. What would certainly be racist if people are attracted to people of another race, but refuse to accept it like they would with someone of a non-discriminated race (for example a guy only having sex with black women in the format of prostitution).Which is rather exceptional in Europe, that's the point: a single institution combining executive *and* legislative power is rather questionable from a democratic POV. That's why the EP should get legislative initiative.&gt;They get to see and vote on the end results, when its actually finished. Judging an unfinished product now when its unfinished is not a good idea, especially when everything within the document is still subject to change.

The EP is the legislative organ of the EU. They should have full competences in writing it. Why should the general population have to wait to propose amendments and influence the whole structure and selected lobbyists not? Are they second rank citizens?

&gt;So I'd rather wait until its finished.

You can always ignore it if you don't want to know. Other people do.Them joining Schengen certainly wasn't. In any case, the EU is getting tired of Swiss exceptionalism and are urging them to clean up their act and get rid of the mess of bilateral treaties.

&gt;By 2010 Switzerland had amassed around 210 trade treaties with the EU. Following the institutional changes in the EU (particularly regarding foreign policy and the increased role of the European Parliament) European Council President Herman Van Rompuy and Swiss President Doris Leuthard expressed a desire to "reset" EU-Swiss relations with an easier and cleaner way of applying EU law in Switzerland.[9] In December 2012, the Council of the European Union declared that there will be no further treaties on single market issues unless Switzerland and EU agree on a new legal framework similar to the EEA that, among others, would bind Switzerland more closely to the evolving EU legislation.[10] Jos\u00e9 Manuel Barroso, the President of the European Commission, later affirmed this position. However, a second referendum on Swiss EEA membership isn't expected,[3] and the Swiss public remains opposed to joining.[11]&gt;Teah, but the Scottish and Welish wanted to lose their sovereignty. At least here European union was sold as trade union not as Federation. 

Wales has been conquered and revolts suppressed, repeatedly.

Scotland also hasn't signed up for every significant change or undertaking of the last century or two when they joined. Should they have held a referendum for every major law?

&gt;The difference is that in trade union every state is under the trade union is considered sovereign, and should have final say on laws that mainly effect internal matters, precisely so that politicians can't use it to by bass national democracy, or so that their trade partners cannot push laws on them. 

And that's exactly why there should be a legislative organ directly mandated by the citizens through elections, instead of intransparent backroom dealing by delegates of delegates of governments like it happens now in the Council. If you go beyond very basic trade rules, rules that actually need to be updated when eg. new science changes known facts, then you need a legislative organ to monitor it all.Answer: because they're conquered or otherwise forced to acquiesce to the villages that have a more effective way of asserting their interests, by banding together in a single political unit for example.&gt;The question is whether minority parties would have a harder time advancing their agenda than as factions of a two-party system.
E.g., assume the Green/Tea party has extreme views compared the D/R party. Would they be more successful at advancing their agenda with ~5% of the seats in the legislature each, or would they have more luck threatening 10% of the support of the party they're aligned with in a two-party system?

Well, in a proportional system, if there are two parties with 45% of the seats and one with 6% of the seats, then that one party can let the other two bid to lend them their seats to form a majority. They're likely to get away with having a minister more than they should have had if judging by their percentages, or with relatively more legislation that adresses their core issues. That is counterbalanced by the fact that such a situation where they do have leverage isn't guaranteed. Then it's four long years of oppositon. 

But that opposition is kind of an anchor for the bigger parties: if the opposition of a single issue party starts to grow, the big parties slightly change their policies in that direction to prevent their voters from leaking any further. That way, small parties that get votes will still see their concerns addressed by the main/centrist parties, but in a non-extreme and gradual way.

All in all I think a proportional system is a better temperature gauge for the wishes of the electorate than a bipartisan system.&gt; So if I create the next fad app and pull in $300,000,000 this year before it fades away to nothing, I only get to keep $10,000,000 of that and politicians get the other $290,000,000? But if I get a job paying me $10,000,000/year for 30 years, I get to keep the entire $300,000,000? Your attempt at fairness doesn't really seem all that fair.

Obviously you create a company that cashes in the proceeds from the app and pays you a yearly wage. You would also drop the price of that app rather than charging money for it if it doesn't end up with you anyway, benefiting everyone... and you would benefit from similar low-priced products, so you would gain more buying power too.

Of course there has to be some way to get rid of accidental excess income, I would prefer just to split it out over the population by default.So you think that people all over the planet should be able to accumulate unlimited money? Isn't that arrogant?&gt; Let's also consider for a second how wealthy the West is for a second. You've talked a lot in this thread about how little the poorest actually have, but if you step back a bit and think for a second, you'd realize that the system we have, which supposedly fucks over the poor, actually is doing better for the poor than any system ever implemented ever has. There is no (like, actually zero) starvation, extremely low infant mortality, near 100% literacy, etc. No society has ever been able to claim to have eradicated the symptoms of poverty like we have, and it could very well be that our system produces the benefits for the poor precisely because it encourages investment and growth for the investor. In fact I would submit to you that that is exactly the case and that eating the rich, so to speak, is a recipe for ultimately harming the economy, and therefore the poor. When the economy fell in 1929, by and large it was the already poor who suffered the most, not the rich. I want you to consider that you are threatening the underpinnings of our economy which is already doing better for the poor than any economy ever has.

Generally the countries with less income inequality and higher taxes do even better, so that's an argument to indeed continue on that track.

&gt; The bottom 10% of the US are not doing bad. They fare as well as the top 10% of Italians. 

If you come to that conclusion, your reasoning is faulty. Seriously. Trailer trash in the USA vs a spacious appartment in Rome with a vacation house in Tuscany? Hello?&gt; You can in fact start losing money if you hit a certain threshold. 

Well, no. It's always capped.&gt; You concede that the cap encourages the entrepreneur to stop after he's made $10 million? After all, why continue working for $0 when you can play golf or skydive instead? Do you think we'd all be better off if entrepreneurs stopped after they earned $10 million in a given year? 

I don't think the people that earn billions are entrepreneurs and innovators. Most of them are businessmen and owners of shares. Some of them may also be innovators. But there are plenty of innovators who don't end up with the money their inventions make, just because they aren't very good businessmen (cue Tesla vs Edison feuders). So it wouldn't hurt if some of these businessmen would quite and leave the playing field for other people to earn their share of the pie. The innovators, meanwhile, will keep innovating because that's what they like to do... and they'll find a suitable businessman to market them if they like, or just make it available for free. Why not? It earns them recognition and status, and they are maxed out on money already anyway.

&gt;Or they have a strong passion for what it gets them. For example, someone who very effectively changes diapers because they want their child to be healthy. Similarly, some people will excel at unpleasant jobs because they have a strong passion for what it gets them, e.g.: money.

They can still compete for status. I'm willing to gamble on the fact that most innovative people won't turn into couch potatoes who watch TV all day at the moment they can't get more brag points on their bank account. Their status depends on their products, not their money. In any case, they would still need to maintain their yearly income of whatever the cap is. Do you really think that's going to cause them to throttle their efforts of innovation so they just make enough to stay under the cap?

Why not? He still gets to keep the maximum. He's effectively rewarded as one of the best.&gt;The point is that everyone wants different things, and you and I shouldn't get to stand in the way of them

But that's exactly why they shouldn't be able to accumulate access rights to an ever-growing share of the global wealth. That money is money other people can't use. Why are their desires/investments less important?

&gt;We definitely need to work on getting working people out of poverty, but the solution to this is raising the floor for year people, not lowering the ceiling for everyone.

Well, if such a cap were active then the excess money could be given to the employees instead. That would spread it out. Or it could be taxed and used for basic income. Or if the cap were defined based on the median wage, their own wage would rise if they gave their employees a raise...&gt; Understood. But isn't that 10 million also subjective? A lot of people are doing a lot of things with more than 10 million and the'yd probably have a lot of arguments why they want/need that money and shouldn't have it forcefully taken from them.

Then they can put it in independent non-profit companies that realize that goal.

&gt; By the way, let me introduce you to my wife. She is our company mail courier. It is her responsibility to go to the post office and pick up our mail on any day that the US Postal services is unable to deliver it. For her services, we compensate her at an annual salary of $10,000,000/year.

The IRS would like to have a word with you. Seriously, you didn't think no one ever thought of furthering his private interests in other ways than through his own paycheck?

&gt;Also, how many companies do I get? Can I make $10,000,000 from each of them? Or if I have 10 successful businesses am I only permitted to make $1,000,000 each.

It's a personal limit presumably.

&gt;Finally, what about shitty years? Sure, I made $30,000,000 last year (and only got to keep $10,000,000), but this year we screwed up on a bunch of huge projects and we're looking at losses of close to $100,000,000? Is the government going to cover $90,000,000 of that loss? Because, if not, we're just going to have to shut down an put my 4,500 employees out of a job. Because while I'd love to keep them employed and keep my business going, I just flat-out don't have $90,000,000 to put into it because the government has take $250,000,000 in "taxes" from me over the past 10 years.

You weren't going to pay employees from your *private* wealth anyway. The company will have a cash stash or can take out a loan if desired.[Exactly. Look at this graph..](http://www.businessspectator.com.au/article/2013/7/31/financial-services/myth-pay-performance)You can give raises. If the cap is based on median wage, that will also increase the wage you get.&gt; if it can't be paid out as someone's wages

It can, just not the same single person.&gt; It's the mechanism that separates the ownership (shareholders) from being personally responsible for the corporations mistakes or debts, or anything of that nature. 

You can still separate that without calling them persons.&gt;Falling for the classical zero sum game nonsense.

It's not because *some* wealth is accumulated by producing added value that *all* wealth is - forcing other people to pay you by owning the right assets would also concentrate wealth in your hands without producing significant value. It could be anywhere between 1% and 99%.&gt;Related question: we haven't seen similar refugee waves during the Iraqi invasion in 2003, the Afghanistan war, or any token African conflict whatsoever. What is happening here?

[There were three times as much refugees from Yugoslavia in 1992 than last year.](http://nos.nl/op3/artikel/2055928-hoeveel-vluchtelingen-komen-er-nou-echt-bij-in-europa.html)I just saw you sprint headlong into ad hominem territory. I'm turning around.[It's public if you go through the image at google images.](https://www.google.be/search?q=relation+ceo+pay+company+performance&amp;safe=off&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ved=0CAgQ_AUoAmoVChMIqrf3zPityAIVAokaCh0PlQvD&amp;biw=1173&amp;bih=816#imgrc=Fm4tFWQT5vW4nM%3A)

[Just the image](http://www.businessspectator.com.au/sites/default/files/styles/full_width/public/pay%20for%20performance%20myth.png?itok=PD6Y0ePY).In this system, it's worth at most 10 million for him personally. The company can still safeguard that money for him and pay him 10 million every year for 30 years. 

Besides, no one's work is worth 300 million. You only acquire that amount of money by owning rights and stuff.&gt; How will this actually help anyone?

The money would instead have to go to investments, wages or lowering prices rather than private wealth. All of these are more directly and certainly beneficial to everyone than private wealth.

&gt;Also consider that someone making $10 million in a given year isn't necessarily going to be doing that regularly. Again, most people making that much aren't earning a salary. They might be making $20 million one year and losing money the next.

In that case their company will keep the money as reserve and pay him 10 million every year.

&gt;They might be losing money on their pet company for years before they finally make it big.

Repaying debt to a person is not income for that person.

&gt;So why is Warren Buffet still investing? Why do rich CEOs keep working? Clearly they value that additional income, or else they wouldn't do it. If you take away something of value you are taking away incentive, pure and simple.

Clearly they're in it for more than the money, because more money isn't going to translate in a meaningful change in their lifestyle.

&gt;It's also not to work or not, or to invest or not. People will adjust their investment calculus based on the tax code. They're not going to stop investing or stop working altogether, but they will invest or work less (and certainly invest in a more risk-adverse manner). Why risk more money or work harder if it won't get you anything back?

What else would they do with that money?&gt; A maximum wage would serve no purpose and you would just compensate that wealth to someone in other manners such as giving stock, extra benefits packages, and the like. 

That's obviously counted as personal compensation, check with the IRS.&gt;I'm not talking about a company, I'm talking about a person who creates an app that exposes in popularity and is worth $300 million. If that person wants to sell their creation the most they can take is $10 million.

They just create a personal company that they own and control, give the copyright to the company and let the company manage it - companies don't have a cap in the OP's proposal, just persons. That's a really basic bookkeeping operation. Creating a separation between your personal wealth and a business is the main purpose of having a company to start with.

&gt;This is flat out False. Define "owning rights and stuff".

There are very few people who get to charge that amount for a specific service. For most people who make this amount it's an accumulation of dividends, copyright revenue, royalties, owning companies etc. In other words, somehow obtaining a share of work that other people do. It's rather debatable whether their compensation should be that high if they're not directly involved in the actual product.The actual threshold is up for debate. Defining it as x*median wage solves that problem. Even if we were to impose equal income for everyone, then some people would still enjoy it more than others because they spent it more wisely. Don't worry, competent people would still be rewarded more.But by doing so you also dictate the one and only right policy.There was/is/will be technological innovation before the USA, outside the USA and without the USA.Average income for the top 10% in Italy is [50000 \u20ac](http://revolting-europe.com/2011/12/06/rising-gap-between-rich-and-poor-in-italy-new-figures-show/). You can buy a very pleasant house in Tuscany for [165000\u20ac](http://www.gate-away.com/property_detail.php?id=83019). That's quite affordable for them.

&gt;Hell the top 10% in the US don't even have vacation houses.

Not if they want other things more, but they certainly can afford them. Stop fooling yourself. The point is that we're going to force people anyway - absentee ownership rights completely depend on people being forced to respect them by the state, just as much as taxes - or for that matter, minimum and maximum wages - are enforced. So we might as well force the optimal outcome.There is absolutely no evidence for that. There's a vague correlation, but no proof of causation, let alone about the direction of the causation. The USA enjoyed unthreatened access to the resources of an almost untouched continent. That alone is a benefit no one else enjoys. They also established military, economical and political dominance, putting themselves at the center of the world economy by leveraging that geographical position. Neither of those requires a particularly superior tax policy. Not to mention that tax rate policy in the USA has been all over the place, strongly suggesting that a more fundamental trend at work.So you don't think property should be enforced worldwide either? That it should just be an option?Stop being so specious, show some class. And don't dally 'til kingdom come, that's an *order*.Then we should also count government services received as a boon...

But I don't think it's hard to see that being high class in Italy is qualitatively a lot better than being trailer trash in the USA. So their calculation is lacking in some way.It's not the ACV/CSC that manipulates, it's the OP that editorializes the title. Anyone who reads the article can see that it's just a calculation error - an anecdotal one to start with. There isn't even a trend observed.&gt; This is why you always get things in writing. After the visit/phonecall/whatever:

Email to leave a trail, a phone call to get it done.There is more to the job description of MP than a mere *buttonpusher*.&gt;They actually are not supposed to make any decisions at this stage of negotiations.

Nonsense. They have to be able to inform themselves. They should, for example, be able to get feedback on the juridical implications of this or that clause or passage. To do that you need to at least read it through, refer back to it, make notes, and send excerpts to other people. Making that impossible infringes on their legal task as legislative power.

If it's a "take it or leave it" offer of hundreds of pages of small print, then I say leave it. I don't see why companies should be compensated for a change in policy. If the government changes the tax policy and raises taxes, do all citizens get a compensation too?

It's not a free trade deal. Free trade is not some objective, measurable characteristic. What TTIP aims for is to reduce regulatory differences primarily by mutual recognition of standards... i.e. "what is good enough for you is good enough for me". In practice, that means that American companies can sell American products produced with American standards in Europe and vice versa. This sounds good, until you realize that they'll get the choice between two standards, and they will choose the least stringent... So we effectively get the least safe, the least healthy, the least efficient etc. product standards of the EU and the USA everywhere in both regions. Worse, if we later want to increase our own standards the other standards will remain legal, so companies will effectively be able to ignore any tightening of standards that is not simultaneously implemented in the USA and EU. Needless to say, that will result in a grinding halt to the improvements in product standards, and more likely a reduction as countries compete to attract industry.

Potentially we had the same problem in the EU, but we dealt with that by organizing a complete set of governmental instituations: legislative (a parliament instead of inflexible treaties that overrule national law), executive (Commission instead of ad-hoc meetings between heads of state) and judiciary (courts instead of ISDS). So it's possible to overcome, but it has to be done properly."You don't need to see the sales contract beforehand, dear customer. You'll get the chance to read it for five minutes before signing."Well, not the EU. Some European companies. And benefiting is relative... they just can leverage some advantage of scale, which inevitable means more layoffs.&gt;Why should we say no to something we know next to nothing about?

Because we know next to nothing about it.Hanging on in quiet desperation is the English way!&gt; TTIP will not overrule, repeal or amend EU legislation. The EU's 28 member countries and the European Parliament would have to approve any changes to EU laws or regulations in order to liberalise trade.

This is simply wrong. If the treaty says "Both EU and USA standards on milk are good enough for each other", the EU rules say "there can't be dioxine in milk" and the USA rules say "a little bit of dioxine doesn't matter", then USA companies can sell milk with dioxine here, and an attempt to put warning labels on the boxes would be sued and won as discriminatory.

&gt;ISDS makes it possible for a foreign firm to apply for compensation if a government seizes its assets or passes a law which only applies to foreign firms and makes their investment worthless. For example, a law banning a product made in a foreign-owned factory whilst not banning products made by domestic companies.
ISDS does not stop governments passing laws, but where new laws discriminate against foreign firms it allows them to bring a claim for compensation.

Wrong. ISDS also allows companies to sue governments for policy changes, even if they're not discriminatory or simply expropriation (expropriation is illegal in most countries anyway, so their local justice system offers ways to address that already).

[For example, tobacco giant Philip Morris is demanding US$2 billion from Uruguay over health warnings on cigarette packets; Swedish polluter Vattenfall is seeking over US$3.7 billion from Germany following a democratic decision to phase out nuclear energy; and Canadian company Lone Pine is suing Canada via a US-subsidiary for CAN$250 million after the Canadian province of Quebec imposed a moratorium on shale gas extraction (fracking) over environmental concerns.](http://corporateeurope.org/international-trade/2014/04/still-not-loving-isds-10-reasons-oppose-investors-super-rights-eu-trade)

[Despite the solid arguments by the defense, the ICSID tribunal ruled against Uruguay and decided to hear
Philip   Morris
\u2019
  demands,   disregarding   the   fact   that   the   bilateral   investment   treaty  between  Switzerland
and Uruguay -which the tobacco company used to base its claim-, unequivocally states in its Article 2 that
public   health   measures   cannot   be   challenged   by   investors   as   an   indirect   expropriation   of   their
investments.](http://www.redes.org.uy/wp-content/uploads/2013/07/Posicionamiento_Redes_eng.pdf)The treaty will be open to amendment later I presume, so that's pointless. There will still be contestation. Unless we don't get the chance anymore to amend it, in which case the only reasonable vote is NO.I'd *love* to cite problematic passages too. But that's not possible due to, guess what?Doesn't matter if I can't pay the John Hopkins doctor.&gt;I might have some dreams and ideas of starting my own business - but that would bring risk to my perfectly safe career, so i don't think i will ever follow it.

So the problem is that your income isn't safe enough yet. If you had nothing to lose you would try that business.&gt;Alot of americans cannot stand entitlement which is what we consider most of your worker protection laws. Vacation time should be earned for showing loyalty, not forced by the government.

This is just absurd. What are you, serfs under a feudal lord?Capitalism 101.You should. Make sure you've got a spare weekend to start out&gt; The Rebels use their AI fleet to push the last remaining Federation fleet to their last home base where they make a decisive comeback and win the war by destroying the Rebel Flagship and thereby throwing the Rebel army into chaos.

Well, it's hard to believe that a rebel army - that started out dispersed and marginal - was suddenly so centralized that they couldn't handle the loss of single ship. Unless it was the AI of that ship orchestrating the rebellion all along.Actually no, that goes completely against the spirit of the game.I don't see the difference with any other investment. If I build a clown shoe factory believing that clown shoes will be the next big thing in fashion, and that turns out to be wrong, then I have a useless factory. That's just a risk of doing business. Who are they going to sue then, the fashion world, for not guaranteeing a market for their product? If Vattenfall wanted the guarantee that their plants would be profitable they would have had to negotiate a contract with the government beforehand, or insured themselves against that risk at a private insurance firm.Corporate *personhood* is something very specifically American. Elsewhere it's considered a business tool, an organization form, not anything like something with personal rights.If they wanted to manipulate something they would do it consistently, for everyone. This is clearly just a bug - albeit one that should make them take it down for maintenance immediately, granted.
&gt;I never claimed that feminism would be free from extremism, so yes - that example proves that there's at least one single thing in the entire feminist movement that can be seen as that. Then I guess it's up to each and everyone to ask themselves if one single event is representative for the movement.

It does however give substance to the claim that "a lot fo feminists are just manhating".

&gt;John Lennon, Bob Marley, Woody Allen, 2Pac, Sean Penn, Roman Polanski, Chris Brown

None of these figures are upheld as key figures in a movement profiling itself as a guardian of ethics and morality.
&gt; In a way that is what they have done

They neglected to, so now they're trying to use general procedures to shove the responsibility for their unfortunate business decisions in the shoes of the taxpayer.

&gt;The difference between clown shoes and electrical power is that our society fails without it.

Irrelevant. It's about business decisions and who is responsible for them.

&gt;if you want to extend that responsibility to a company you also need to give them a guarantee that you will buy it 

Not in a free market.

&gt;Privately owned infrastructure requires formal mutual dependence. If you can't accept that you shouldn't allow private infrastructure.

They want to have the profits of the private market and the guarantees of being government-owned. That's not going to fly.

I said the parliament is the legislative power in most countries in response to the previous comment, and that is True. The fact that the heads of state of the EU are still trying to stop the evolution towards a mature parliamentary system does not contradict that. 


Here in Dutch we have those too, but the trend is to use only the male (shorter, more standard) form. The male form is becoming unisex, the female form falling out of use. So you get things like "mevrouw de burgemeester" (madam the mayor) even though the female form of *burgemeester* ought to be *burgemeesteres* or something.

All in all, that's a good thing I think. The less attention paid to gender the better.&gt; And from whence do the member states of the EU get their taxes from?

Employee wages and employee consumption, mostly. Not much from corporate profits or dividends.

&gt;And from whence does the EU get its budget contributions from? 

A part of VAT taxes, which are consumption taxes.I think that just shows that even if the number seems to be better, you can still be fucked if you are relatively poor. You should, one day.

One crucial distinction is made between the right to possession - the things you use - and the right to property - the things you are legally entitled to, but not necessarily use. That distinction is usually ignored in discussion about property, so you get the silly notion that there is no distinction between the right to the house you live in and the 5000 houses owned by a real estate magnate.On the other hand, if there are security guards around already, you may as well open the library for passive use.&gt; But it's not instigating violence. No reasonable person would think that her tweet would cause anyone to die.

Tweets are reflexive spur-of-the-moment ideas of impulsive people. If they go down that track based on impulse, it's quite plausible to think they would also do that in other circumstances, when it's not just text-based. Furthermore twittering that way makes it easier to think that way in the future. At the very least this should result in being called to court, just to make people think twice next time. This cannot go without consequences.

Additionally, you can't have diversity officers or whatever she is that call for killing a category of people. That's just absurd.She uses the same rhetoric. I don't think she came up with that on her own. Surely we must be critical of people even if they use terms that should be considered positive.&gt; Speak for yourself. YOU are going to use force.

So you don't think property and contracts should be enforced then?

Don't blame the thermometer, blame the fever.That depends to whose benefit we're globalizing entirely.Her father is half of her heritage. She has to come to terms with the half of her character that resembles his as much as with him. All these issues converge. It's the big unresolved issue in her life, of course it's important.Broken buildings can be reconstructed. Broken trust can't.She's mostly manifesting the part of her character that comes from her dad's side right now: formal dress suits that part. Flamboyance is locked up in the room right now.&gt;That single event give substance to the claim that "at least one feminist is just manhating"

The fact that she has a lot of supporters still, does.

&gt;(well, if you ignore the satiric writing that feminist is also known for)

Come on, she literally said herself that she was dead serious. Or was that satire too?

&gt;John Lennon was a key figure in the Flower Power-movement and the work he did together with Yoko Ono was basically all about world peace, love and understanding. Bob Marley is probably the most famous rastafari of all time, a religion claiming to strive towards all humans being equals.
But what you're saying is that as long as it's not within the context of a movement claiming to be all for equality - it's no problems that thousands of people worship rapists, murderers and abusers of different kinds?

They're primarily known as musicians, the rest is derived from that - and most people don't really care beyond knowing they enjoy stuff with that label when it's on the radio. Solanas, it's the other way around. Having produced nothing particularly noteworthy, her continued relevance is only due to her position as feminist figurehead.Of course that's just a hack, I'm sure they don't really know what could be wrong. If they really wanted to manipulate they would have done it otherwise than by *randomizing* the outcome.&gt; My point is that they neglected it because they obviously didn't need to. 

Of course they needed to. They just don't like taking that responsibility.

&gt;&gt;Irrelevant. It's about business decisions and who is responsible for them.
&gt;That is inhumane, or anarchistic to state. I won't go into that can of worms.

How is it inhumane to state that the specific product involved isn't relevant to the discussion about whose responsibility it is to deal with unsuccesful investments?

&gt;Implying it is possible to assume all infrastructure will give immediate returns. 

No, not at all. The company is free to invest in anything they want and derive profits from it. They're also responsible to deal with the losses if it turns out that their investment isn't profitable. Judging future demand is a key part of making smart decisions, and Vattenfall obviously assessed the risk that Germany would decide to stop buying nuclear-generated electricity as small... just like eg. someone opening a butchery judges the risk small that the entire city will suddenly turn vegetarian. But if vegetarianism effectively does grow in popularity all of a sudden, then that butchery will have proved to be a bad investment, and it's no one's responsibility but the owner to deal with that loss. If, conversely, barbecueing become more popular he would also rake in the profits.

&gt;Obviously the terms of the mutual dependency has to take profit into account, it is about enabling us to have infrastructure that the government is not competent to own. If either part is not getting what it expects it shouldn't agree to the terms.

Exactly, and Vattenfall agreed to a delivery contract that did not include a compensation in case of change of policy.


&gt;Well if Welish and Scottish don't want to be part of uk, I personally would let them hold referendum and quit being part of the union.

That's easy to say now, isn't it, after they have been beaten into submission and assimilated by force of law and arms?

&gt;Yes I agree with you: If this this the ways things are going to be, we do need legislative organ mandated by citizens. This is not how things have to be though, I'd much rather prefer if Eu didn't go to things beyond trade treaties.

I think it's inevitable. We'd better get on with it, so we have more time to figure out how to do it right.
&gt;You can rephrase it as, "Do you think we'd all be better off if investors stopped after they earned $10 million?", if you like.

No, that's wrong: they would be able to make 10 million per year, not in their lifetime.

&gt;Suddenly, people with money have less of an incentive to put that money to work. 

It's not going to make a difference in their lifestyle anyway, only in their bragging rights. That will only continue.

&gt;It would reduce the supply of businessmen.

It would *increase* it since more people would get the chance to be a businesman, rather than the big fishes sucking up all opportunities thanks to the advantage they enjoy due to the economy of scale big owners have. Where else are they going to go, anyway? The maximum earnings are the same everywhere then.

&gt;Also, the energy of businessmen makes the pie bigger: you don't want people sitting at home in their pyjamas, you want people being productive.

And that's why I want money to be spread around rather than accumulate in the hands of a few.

&gt;Two people producing stuff is more than one person producing stuff.

We have unemployment now due to lack of demand and investment capital. Spreading money around increases both.

&gt;Not sure how the above fits together.

Innovators and rich people are categories that only partially overlap.

&gt;It's not a choice they make in a vacuum, they're human-beings. So, maybe they love their family, but they work every hour that G-d sends to give their family everything. With the maximal wage, "everything" has a cap of $10 million, and understandably they scale back their hours in order to spend more time around the dinner-table. I don't think it's as simple as spite at not being paid enough, usually, it's just that you go from "the sky's the limit" to "$10 million's the limit". That's still a huge limit, but it's not equivalent.

If they really loved their family that much they would have scaled back much earlier. They're just in it for the status hunt. That won't change.Oh, I think they should have pulled the application at the first few reports. I'm not saying that you don't have the right to have your own ideas or that it is of high concern to you. I'm saying that the idea that vacation days should be earned by loyaltly reminds me of a feudal society where favours were earned by personal loyalty to the Lord.&gt; It proves the support for a man-hater, it doesn't prove other man-haters. If we're saying that people automatically becomes a man-hater for admiring Solanas we could just as well say people are woman-haters for loving John Lennon.

John Lennon did not write songs about what a good idea it was to beat women, nor did Polanski make child porn films. Valerie Solanas did write books about what a good idea it was to kill men.

&gt;That doesn't it make it less of a problem, the fact that these rapists are hailed as geniuses without their crimes even being brought up or criticized only makes the case worse for the fans admiring these people.

They're brought up frequently enough and they're not relevant to their body of work, but can be seen as unrelated human flaws. They're hailed as genius artists, not genius rapists. In the case of Solanas, she practiced what she preached so it's impossible to make the distinction.

&gt;And her position as feminist figurehead isn't because of her crime but because of her work.

Her work just happened to describe literally what she did in practice.

&gt;If Lennon and Marely is more known as musicians (which I obviously agree with) that still doesn't make it less of a problem, then you should probably encourage their fans to make their crimes more known.

The ones that admire Lennon and Marley as persons should definitely check their moral standards again, I agree with that.It's very windy at some coasts.&gt;Considering not even two years ago EU paid over two thirds of the price of every installed windmill, I call bullshit on that.

Guess how much subsidies nuclear gets?

&gt;Using capacity factor in context of inherently unreliable sources like wind power or solar power if laughable.

Well, no. That's exactly when you need it the most. It would be laughable not taking it into account... but they did.Both are enforced by the state.&gt; Yes, he did. This is taken from the track Run For Your Life (Rubber Soul, 1965): "Well I'd rather see you dead, little girl, than to be with another man. You better keep your head, little girl, or I won't know where I am" and "Well you know that I'm a wicked guy and I was born with a jealous mind and I can't spend my whole life trying just to make you toe the line" etc.

He wrote songs about a variety of subjects and persons. It would be strange if you couldn't fine one line that fit any random statement, including that. It's easily countered by just the title of "woman is the nigger of the world", to name just one example.

Solanas, on the other hand, centered her writings around SCUM and justified her murder attempt by claiming that Warhol was controlling her, much like SCUM is justified by claiming that men control women in society at large. The parallels are staggering, and that's really the main body of her work.

&gt;What defines "frequently enough" to you? Solanas is hailed as (when she is hailed) a genius writer and not genious in her specific act towards a man.

She explicitly writes about killing men, and affirms she means every word of it. SCUM was not written as fiction.

&gt;You said earlier that "Solanas herself insisted that her work was dead serious" and I'm curious to the source of that argument

"but Solanas denied that the work was "a put on" and insisted that her intent was "dead serious."" (Marmorstein, Robert, A Winter Memory Of Valerie Solanis, 1968)

Perhaps that's the crux of the issue: to what extent is feminist rhetoric a literary device, and to what extent is it serious? And who keeps track of the difference?

&gt;But they're not deserving of any kind of open criticism like people who happens to belong to an ideology in which some people hail a criminal writer? It's just up to themselves to check their moral stands, unlike feminists?

Anyone can criticize them, why not? I don't think anyone minds that Solanas is admired for the aesthetic qualities of her work, but that's not why she's admired, right?

Whales are vegetables.Well, it's worth trying out to see if they feel better, perhaps they have a mild intolerance.&gt;I know from everytime i destroy you in economics and you conviently dissapear that you are baised but defending this is just delusion.

Your spelling and punctuation is better than your argumentation.That makes sense. However, in that case I would keep the flagship in the middle of the fleet, not on the front lines.&gt;Nowhere near as much, but even if they did get as much, who cares?

No nuclear plants have ever been built without subsidies. A lot of renewable plants have been built without subsidies. If nuclear plants are so superior, why doesn't anyone dare to build them without substantial state support?

&gt;At least nuclear works when you need it.

Except if it's too dry. Or too hot. Or there are tears. Or there's an unexpected error and they need to check the whole thing. The nuclear plants in Belgium have been more offline than online in the last years..Sure, I can believe that.&gt;I meant stop after they earned $10 million in a given year.

You can't just stop earning in the middle of the year. That money is still available for the company to invest, to repay creditors, to raise wages, and to pay out dividends.

Even if they do, that business opportunity is open to someone else.

&gt;It won't make a difference to there lifestyle if there's a cap. It will make a difference to their lifestyle if there isn't a cap. 

After 10 million? No, not significantly. You're deep into diminishing returns territory by then.

&gt;They already get a chance to be a businessman, it's just that the chance doesn't translate into a career because somebody else realized the chance. It's like applying to an elite university: everyone has a chance, but only some people get in. John Hopkins doesn't become a slightly more selective university if one less student applies, instead it becomes a slightly less selective university. Similarly, less candidates applying to a job in the business world doesn't mean there's more supply (with respect to that job), it means that there's less.

There are a limited number of  good business opportunities. People compete for them. The number of people competing for good business *vastly* outnumber the good business opportunities. That's not going to change the realized number of opportunities.

&gt;We should stop large companies selling cheaper goods to consumers because of economies of scale? You would prefer that consumers paid more?

They don't. They could also lower their prices, for example, rather than paying the CEO more than 10 million. This will make prices even lower than now. Companies can still earn more than 10 million, you know.

&gt;Leisure time. 

Good on them. And good on the other people that now get the opportunity to replace them, gaining valuable experience and increasing the chance to start a successful business of their own.

&gt;What if the few have the money because they're competent? (Sure, not all, but many, and those many will be hit by the maximal wage too). 

If they're so competent they'll earn the maximum every year and be among the richest people on earth. Not good enough?

&gt;Can you break this down for me, please? 

There are, simultaneously, people that can't afford a service they need due to lack of money, and people who can't find employment due to lack of demand. That clearly is a market failure. Spreading money around would allow those people to solve each others' problem.

&gt;True, but then a maximal wage is salient. 

In which way?

&gt;Honestly, I don't really think you can sustain this. Your argument is that what really matters to people is status, and that status is not sensitive to monetary change. I just don't believe that the sole motivation for humans is status, to me the palette is clearly broader than one color.

I didn't say it was the sole motivation, but at that earning power you can hardly say that there is any physical comfort that they are lacking. Clearly  there are more motivators than just cash alone. Those will ensure that people keep doing effort even when 

&gt;Additionally, I don't believe that status is always unrelated to cashflow.

I didn't say that. There are plenty of ways to chase status without tying a cash award to it. Medals, noble titles, front seats at premi\u00e8res, fame, breaking a record, being the first to discover something, love, sex, religion, etc. are all motivators in their own right, which have spurred people to great efforts even if it *cost* them money rather than brought them profit.&gt;Because it is so heavily taxed

Seriously. They get free insurance and a truckload of "research" subsidies, and the effective guarantee that the shareholders will never have to deal with the True cost of cleaning up the waste. What more do you want? If anything they are undertaxed.

&gt;and today, the risk is too big. One scare and Germany decided to shut down.

I agree that the risk is too big. That's exactly why they should be phased out rather than phased in.thetaiyaki has a small dick, teeheeThe expected way to realize their increased profits is to merge with other companies, and then cut the redundant services to cut costs. That will not benefit the European companies in general, because wage costs are at least perceived to be higher.Hey, you went full ad hominem right away. I just play ball.Two wrongs don't make a right and raising public awareness takes time and effort. The concerns that started growing during CETA's negotiation, are only now maturing: one more argument for involving the public *right from the start* instead of trying to hide it in a committee. Canada seems a lot less threatening - rightly or wrongly- the point becomes clearer when applied to the USA.

Lastly, there is no such thing as a standard free trade treaty, despite persistent efforts of the pro side to paint them as interchangeable. There is no such thing as objectively free trade. For example, CETA contains a plain reduction of tariffs - there's little reason to disagree with that for anyone.

http://mercury.ethz.ch/serviceengine/Files/ISN/175090/ipublicationdocument_singledocument/a4e145f7-bda2-473b-9746-fe6aa132d770/en/PISM+Strategic+File+no+9+%2836%29.pdf

&gt;*Investor-State Arbitration*
According to the initial political agreement, CETA will include provisions on investor-state dispute
settlement (ISDS). This will take the form of a procedural mechanism allowing investors from Canada to
bring cases directly against EU Member States in which they have invested before an arbitration tribunal,
and vice-versa. This has proved controversial, particularly among Canadian commentators, some of whom
have dubbed CETA a \u201ccorporate bill of rights\u201d as a result.13 In November, 100 non-governmental
organisations signed a transatlantic statement calling for policy makers at all levels of government in Canada
and the EU to block the agreement until the investor-state arbitration element is removed.

&gt;In the case of TTIP, the benefits of ISDS are likely to be marginal, as fear of unfair treatment does not
discourage U.S. companies from investing in the EU or vice versa. Given early signs that the popular
reaction to ISDS in TTIP may be similar to the strong opposition elicited by its inclusion in CETA, and
suggestions that it could be particularly destabilising in the energy sector, it would be advisable to consider
omitting investor-state arbitration from the EU\u2013U.S. agreement entirely.

&gt;Given the strong public opposition to ACTA in Europe in 2011, the
European Commission has been at pains to highlight that CETA will reflect the fact that the European
Parliament rejected ACTA, and not contain internet provisions or criminal enforcement provisions.

&gt;That is doubtful that would happen on a large scale.

Then why bother if not much is going to change?

&gt;Although many US companies would like to shift their headquarters to Europe due to tax purposes. Insurance giant AON did not too long ago, despite being an American company for all intents and purposes. It does not only work one way. 

If companies are better able to evade taxes legally, that's a negative outcome and will result in either a higher tax burden on the rest of the population, or a cut in public services..No pedestrians on the highway, no fast driving in pedestrian zones. Makes sense.By lowering the taxes on labor, it becomes less expensive to hire people, so more people will be hired that would otherwise be too expensive.Both rightwingers. No surprise.&gt;Yet they can care less about the Canadian deal recently finalized behind closed doors. Or the Vietnamese one. Or the Indian one currently under negotiations.

[That's just plainly unTrue](http://www.canadianprogressiveworld.com/2014/09/28/130-civil-society-organizations-reject-canada-eu-ceta-deal/). Even if it was True, then two wrongs still don't make a right. Consenting to one free trade treaty does not automatically give consent to another: no two free trade treaties are the same, they all contain different clauses anyway.

CETA isn't approved yet, by the way.

&gt;People have already made up their mind about TTIP and are vocal. 

Well, let's show the texts under negotiation then so we can all catch up on the endless benevolence of TTIP.Fact is that a disruption of trade between the EU and UK would be relatively much more painful for the UK. &gt; Have you honestly reviewed all the position papers and textual proposals of the EU?

These aren't worth the paper they're written on: during secret negotiations they can drop anything they want and blame the other negotatiors for it. We need open negotiations to see whether these political promises are also held up in practice. In addition, while some of this sounds good, what will these terms mean in practice? How will these terms be interpreted? How will they be enforced? Even if the treaty exempts eg. health measures from ISDS, if the panel accepts a complaint about eg. cigarette restrictions, what can we do about it?

&gt;And the economic benefits that the EU wants to reach with them? 

The cake is a lie. They can write nice blurbs about "opportunities for small and medium enterprises", but ISDS cases cost *millions*. That's simply unaffordable for small enterprises, so it will tilt the playing field in favour of the big companies.

They speak of GDP growth and benefits "per family", but that's an average - just plain old trickle down rhetoric. The profits will be realized at company and owner level, not at family level. The profits that *are* realized will be due to cost savings companies can effect through mergers... and laying off redundant employees. Good for the company, bad for the average citizen. And we all know that labor rights in the USA are worse than in Europe, in general: what do you think companies will prefer if it becomes less relevant where the goods are produced?&gt;Not in a Social Democratic enterpreneurship climate. Basically, you lose almost all protections if you become an enterpreneur. 

So you want more protection? Why then deny it to others?Ad hominem, sigh.Sucks when you can't bribe the government to let your company pollute at will, doesn't it?link?I'm sure you have one, whether you should have one or not, or whether it's in the right place or not.&gt;This makes sense, but it also depends on (1) having a parliamentary system rather than a presidential one, 

Agreed, a presidental election can only have one winner by definition. That will stimulate the formation of big blocks.

&gt;and (2) only a single minority party gives either party up the 51% threshold. 

Sure, it depends a bit on the actually possible coalitions. Though some parties are ideologically closer than others, so eg. a center left party would find it easier to offer interesting legislation for a center or left minority party than a right wing one.

&gt;Thanks for this example, I don't think it's flipped my view, but it has made me realize that the issue is a little bit more complicated than I thought, and that's definitely a (\u2206) change.

You're welcome.As long as it works. And then you have to deal with the waste afterwards. That's a pure cost, so people have all incentives to sweep that under the rug, with all the consequences.That makes no sense. Can I bring my own servant and cook then, since I'm directly employing them anyway?&gt; First off, legally, child support is for the child, and most courts do not allow parents to sign away the child's rights completely. So, you know, we have that legal hurdle to start with.

No, we don't. Financial abortion would happen before there actually is a child, just like abortion isn't murder.

&gt;Biology is unfair. No reasonable person is going to make the case that a guy can make medical decisions for the woman because he doesn't want to pay for a baby.

Nobody does. The guy simply makes decisions about his own future and responsibilities. The woman is still free to make a decision about her own future, responsibilities and medical situation. You would have a point if we argued that a man should be able to force a woman to carry a child to term if he wanted to raise it but she didn't, but nobody is doing that. 

Conversely, you are making a case that a woman should be able to severely restrict the career and personal life options of a man because she doesn't want to pay for a baby alone. How is that reasonable?

&gt;So first off, what happens in those rare cases where a woman did not know she was pregnant until late in the pregnancy?

If the time for abortion has passed, then it's no longer an option for either parent.

&gt;What is to stop a woman from avoiding any doctors or anyone while she is pregnant in order to avoid the guy opting out?

Charges of fraud and ending up as the only parent of a child anyway.

Why do you assume the worst, anyway? If it really is that common for women to deceive their men, this is much needed legislation that will at least make that punishable.

In the normal case where that information is known, it just allows more people to opt out when they don't want to become a parent, and that will reduce the number of unwanted children.

&gt;Well, the woman has to have official notice of him doing this and opting out within the abortion window, which means that she has to be served with that paperwork, just like pretty much every legal thing filed against a person. Who pays for service?

A registered letter is not that expensive. It's a rather exceptional situation where the man disappear right between conceiving a child and discovering a pregnancy anyway.

&gt;What if the woman disappears to avoid service?

Then she's voluntarily denying someone else's right and the man retains the right to refuse the parental responsibilities that are forced upon him. Do note that the man has a limited time window to respond - we'll assume the default answer is yes - so it's in the woman's best interest to notify him properly and officially, because that means anything but an explicit no within the prescribed time window (I'd suggest a week and a day) will result in him taking up his parental responsibilities then. So for her the cost is a registered letter and printing a few standard forms. For him the cost is nothing to accept, only when he wants to refuse he will have to do what is necessary to notify her. Given the exceptional, unexpected and significant nature of this choice I'd require a higher standard and he should get a signed declaration from her that she has received his decision for financial abortion, and (just in case she refuses to cooperate) he should register that decision at an official administration, who will notify the mother again. I think it's a good idea to make it cost the same as a physical abortion even though it's just paperwork. That income can be used for planned parenthood campaigns.

&gt;What happens if there is a legitimate reason she disappeared, like she was kidnapped or hospitalized or something

The same as with physical abortion.

&gt;What court system should resolve this?

The same courts that deal with other family issues, obviously.

&gt;what happens if she needs help raising it? What happens if she's poor, or loses her job, or the kid gets sick and has major expenses? Do taxpayers now take on the financial burdens our government traditionally puts on the father? Is this a fair decision for taxpayers? How many people do you think would support this new kind of welfare? Should the government step up and take the place of the father because he "opted out"? Should the government refuse to pay welfare in these circumstances? Who is to blame if the child dies of starvation or something as a result of those policies? Is this something we as a society feel is an acceptable result?

The same as with other single mothers.I can help you with becoming poor.&gt; He should have thought about that before putting his penis in her vagina.

That's not a good reason to deny women the right to abortion either.

&gt;This will not be balanced by having the State give special rights to men to create generations of bastards.

It's not giving a special right, it's giving the same right that women have. They still don't have the option to have a child when the women doesn't want it, while the woman will still have the option to have a child when the man doesn't want it. It's still lopsided in favour of the woman, due to biological unfairness.

&gt;It sucks that being a parent of an unwanted child is inconvenient, but the child is alive. It exists.

No, at the time of abortion there is no child. Or otherwise abortion would be murder.

&gt;No one deserves the right to simply choose to wash their hands of a person they made

There is no person yet. Do you think abortion is murder?So you think abortion should be illegal, since that applies to women too?&gt;If responsibility for all things would fall all on the girl and the guy can get a girl pregnant on Monday and tapdance out on a Tuesday, Why the hell would she have sex with a random guy she just met at bar?

Why the hell would she have unprotected sex with a random guy she met at the bar and try to force him into being a parent? You're making the case in favour of financial abortion, just so men can protect themselves from crazy people who would consider that.

That's not a reason to deny abortion to women either. As it is, in the case of an unplanned pregnancy the man is completely powerless now. You're putting all the decision power in the hands of one person at the expense of the other.&gt; as the kind of people who would choose to abandon a child would probably not hesitate to do so to another if they are given carte blanche to do so.

It's only possible in the time window of abortion, so there is no child that is abandoned. Parenthood opt-out is not child abandonment like abortion is not child murder.

&gt;The other alternative is the other parent is left on their own. This essentially creates an increase in a number of social ills. Not all of these women will be able to afford legal abortions, and may try illegal options.

That's a problem with the affordability of abortions, nothing else. I don't have a problem with charging the man who does exercise his right to opt out an equivalent sum as an abortion costs, this money can be used to make abortion clinics more accessible, or the woman involved can have an abortion on his dime if that's the problem.

&gt;Others will carry to term and raise an unfit member of society. The experiences of the mother and child will likely be traumatic and lead to increases in crime and addiction.

That result isn't going to get better by forcing people to be a parent to children they don't want. That's the core problem for which this is a mitigation, and you are just ignoring it.
&gt;Minus the fact that she has to get an expensive medical procedure

I think it's a good idea to charge a man that wants to use that opt-out the same amount (the income can be used for safe sex campaigns). It's intended to be an equivalent right, after all.

&gt;that might be against her moral base

That's an individual decision, it's her own decision so noone else should be made responsible for the consequences of her moral preferences. The same would apply to a man that uses that right because he, for example, considers himself an unfit father for some reason (unstable income, disease problems, inheritable diseases, etc.).

&gt;assuming she lives in a place where she has access to an abortion.

That should be anywhere. Even if it isn't, currently men have no acces to that kind of abortion anywhere. Let abortion clinics register it, perhaps. Then equal access is baked in.

&gt;Or she has to have and pay for the pregnancy by herself. And then she and taxpayers have to support the child. 

That applies to any single mother who voluntarily gets a child without partner.


Under your plan one person gets to decide everything, and the other is effectively powerless. Parental opt-out for men would make that situation a little less one-sided. Do note that men still are not able to have that child if the woman doesn't want to. Women do have that option.&gt; When does she find out she's pregnant?

Physical abortion has the same problem.

&gt;Who is dad? Hopefully we know.

If we don't know it's impossible to enforce his parental duties anyway, and the issue is moot.

&gt;How long does it take to find him? If we can't find him, how long do we wait?

A registered letter to his legal address suffices. If no reply follows within the required period, he will have accepted *by default*.

&gt;What's fair here in balancing his opportunity to be heard with mom's need to make an informed decision? Are we prepared to say that dad's checkbook is at least as important as mom's ability to make an informed medical decision?

We don't require any medical, or moral, motivation for a woman to have an abortion. If a woman says "I want an abortion", she gets one, period. The same should apply to men. If a woman wants an abortion because she'd rather party in the weekend than care for children, or fears that she will get fat from the pregnancy, then she still can get an abortion. Conversely, a man might not want to become a parent because he considers himself unfit in some way, perhaps because of latent psychological problems, a demanding career - or the lack of stable income - or inheritable diseases. It's not up to us to judge their reasons - It's purely a right of self-determination, not a "medical decision".

&gt;Have you ever worked within the court system? Is it fast? Usually not. This is especially important, particularly in the context of over-burdened family court systems.

If we wouldn't conscript people into a parental role they don't wanted, I reckon family courts would have far less broken families to deal with.

&gt;Establishing paternity. What if dad disputes parentage? He might do so, especially if he's worried parental support could come into the equation regardless of his desire to terminate responsibility (i.e., shit happens, especially under present US case law regarding termination of parental rights vis-a-vis parental responsibilities. Dad might still want to play it safe.)

If he turns out not to be the father his opt-out is dead letter, and irrelevant. If he turns out to be, he will have opted out already. If he changes his mind he can still adopt the child afterwards - that's a one-way trip though.

&gt;What if mom disputes paternity once he exercises his right? How long will this take? If someone told me he wasn't going to support the child, I'd go for the legal jugular and try to establish he's not the person to be exercising that right at all (in other words, I'd want to establish he's not the father.)

I don't see the problem there. He's not going to take up the parental role anyway.

&gt;Now, squeeze all of this into the legal window for abortion.

If the time window for abortion has passed before the discovery the issue is a moot point. If the couple is in regular contact then this issue is trivial. If not, then that alone is a good reason to reconsider whether this potential child is going to get the care it needs, with or without child support from the father. Even then, the legal notification requirement could be as small as a registered letter to the father's legal address - no reply is assent by default, and refusing parenthood should happen within a week.. That is not a complicated procedure.

&gt;o be more than fair, assume mom knows or is fairly certain she is pregnant from the exact moment of conception, even though this is almost never the case, and it takes time to (1) think "Uh oh, am I pregnant?", and; (2) and then confirm this fact with a doctor (you can use pregnancy tests to further satisfy your suspicions, but I personally wouldn't begin a potentially protracted legal conflict without knowing for sure.)

It's not a protracted legal battle. She  just notifies the man just in case (hell, that's the only decent thing to do, whether it's just suspicions or not). If she turns out not to be pregnant after all, the whole issue is moot... and they'll both have a valuable warning about their intentions for their future relationship.

&gt;This is ignoring the fact that fundamental principles like bodily autonomy will disproportionately manifest in one party (the one carrying the baby) just because of the nature of pregnancy.

The woman still has 100% control over the pregnancy. She cannot be forced to carry a child if the situation were reversed (the man wanted the child and the woman not).So you make the opt-out window expire two weeks before the abortion limit, or one week after notification, whichever occurs sooner.&gt;forcing mothers to wait out dad's decision to pay for his kid lest it affect his wallet too much.

That's rather sexist. It's about money for both parties, at that point.

It's quite possible to require the man to notify his decision to opt-out in a very short time window after being notified of the pregnancy. She'll have certainty in a week if that's the legal limit.

&gt;a very busy court. 

This will reduce familial problems, because fatherhood now becomes a positive choice, rather than an unavoidable burden other people decided to saddle you with, without consulting you. You must know the psychological power of getting people to formally and officially confirm their intention.

And for the ones that *do* opt out of their parenthood... those were a divorce waiting to happen, or even worse, an unhappy family life where people feel trapped.&gt; This is really simple and most everyone here misses the fundamental problem with this debate. Your equating child support and pregnancy as if they're the same. Abortions are part of the constitutional right to privacy, and by extension, bodily autonomy. They are performed before there is a child in existence.

So would a parental opt-out be.

&gt; What's to stop all men from obtaining a "financial abortion" as a prerequisite even in cases where they want the child or don't know whether they want the child yet just so courts can't bleed them for money later?

They will not have any parental rights.&gt; but it immediately becomes moot when it turns out that enforcing said right inflicts undue cruelty on another

So women shouldn't have the right to abortion because that would inflict undue cruelty on the man if he wants to raise that child?&gt;The problem with this is that it ultimately hurts the child that the father shares responsibility in creating.

It's the woman's decision to continue the pregnancy or not. It's completely her decision, so it's her responsibility.

&gt; That child has no choice in who its parents are or what type of situation it is born into, and allowing a parent to get out of financially supporting this child ultimately hurts it when it has no choice in the first place about being put in this situation.

And allowing a female parent to get out of financially supporting her child doesn't hurt the man that had no choice in the matter whether there should be a child or not in the first place?&gt; Until men can give birth to a child this situation will never be completely fair since women can abort the child before birth. That being said, we should have a solution that hurts the least amount of people in these situations,

Indeed. And while we can't give the man the positive right to opt in to parenthood if he wants the child while the woman doesn't want to, we can only give him the negative right to opt out when he doesn't want the child and the woman does. And we should, because that solves at least half the injustice.

&gt;including the child.

No, there is no child yet. There will only be a child if the woman voluntarily chooses to have it, fully aware of the fact that it will only have one parent.

&gt;As for accidents happening, that's the responsibility of both people involved, meaning both the mother and father are responsible for a child that they create.

That's not a good argument to deny women the right to abortion either.

&gt; If it fails, the mother and father are both responsible.

And they both should be able to deal with that responsibility by choosing abortion.

&gt;If a man doesn't trust that a woman is truthful about her birth control then he can put a condom on or not have sex with her in the first place.

Again, the same argument is not sufficient to deny women abortion either.

&gt;The only exception to this is rape as one parent would be having a child against their will, but I don't know what the laws generally are regarding financial support for children conceived from rape. 

Women who rape a man can sue him for child support. As you see, men have absolutely no rights in that regard.

&gt;Birth parents are equally responsible for the children they create in other scenarios.

This decision happens *before* birth.

Irrelevant. They effectively gain the ability to opt out of parenthood. If a woman thinks a pregnancy will make her fat or she'd rather go out dancing on weekends then caring for some brats, then she can still get an abortion. &gt; One gives up their right to bodily autonomy when they consciously act in a manner that makes another human life dependent upon them.

So you think abortion should be illegal?&gt; The only conceivable (haha) reason that it would "not be good enough" is that you want the ability to have sex with someone without them knowing that you will abandon them and any resulting child if a pregnancy results.

No, this is a useful right if eg. you have both agreed to use contraception, but when an accidental pregnancy *does* happen, a conflict about what should be done arises. One of them wants to keep it anyway, the other doesn't.

&gt;Why not this timeframe?

Because both sexes should get a similar timeframe.That is not a good reason to deny abortion to women either.&gt; Yeah they do, in the same way women do. If the mother gives up custody to the father, she still has to pay child support, just like if the father gives up custody to the mother, he has to pay child support.

If a woman aborts a child, does she have to pay child support to the father?

&gt;Exactly. As it stands, neither parent can force the other to be solely responsible. Each parent can still be held responsible if they give up custody to the other. 

And they still can't in case of financial abortion. If a woman ends up having a child as single parent, it's because she chose to go through with the pregnancy after she was fully aware it would be as a voluntarily single mother.

&gt;It is perfectly symmetric.

No, it's not. The man doesn't have any power at all. The woman decides about the future of both him and the potential child. If she doesn't want to, he is forced not to have a child. If she wants to have the child, he is forced to support is. It's completely lopsided.&gt;  Abortion isn't a get out of jail free card. Those procedures cost time and money, 

I think it's perfectly reasonable to charge a similar fee for a parental opt-out.

&gt;and more importantly, they can lead to lifelong guilt or a permanent black mark on a woman's social reputation.

That's not different for men opting out.

&gt;Now that the onus of responsibility after a sexual encounter is pretty much all on them

Only if you assume that pretty much all men will opt out ASAP. That's quite sexist. Even if they do, do you really want those unreliable pigs to procreate or father children?

&gt;but a wasteland, where men - to a greater extent than has been seen in the West for a long time - feign (and sometimes truly give) emotional and financial commitments just to get what little poontang is out there for them. 

Yes, that's really misandrist.

&gt;? Even if they do come to pass - what's the incentive for men to use them?

Keeping matters into your own hands, less of a hassle, no legal requirement to answer in time. Or, basic human decency and responsibility. Men are humans too.

&gt; as women in real life sometimes do with their birth control. 

That's an argument in favour of an opt-out.



&gt;I doubt signing the paperwork for a financial abortion would have the same stigma. 

Simply let it happen at abortion clinics then. It's a nice source of extra funds for them too.

&gt;As a result, it's hard for me to see this playing out any other way that being hugely advantageous for the father at the expense of the mother and child (and then ultimately the taxpayer in the form of welfare costs)

The mother would officially be a voluntary single parent.Why do you think the mother has no responsibility at all? If she chooses to birth a child as a single parent, the resulting financial problems - if any - are her responsibility.Then there would be no option for women to have an abortion either, and there would not be an inequality.&gt; It's both parents' decision to have sex in the first place.

So either both or none should get the chance to opt out.

&gt;The man did have a choice when he decided to have sex in the first place.

The same can be said for the woman. Do you deny her the right on abortion too?&gt;Well, sure, it isn't, but then again, she's the parent going through the physical act of pregnancy, so her situation is different.

And that's why her right to abort would still override a desire on the part of the man to have the child anyway. She still remains 100% in control about her being pregnant or not.

&gt;Men don't have the option of abortion

The discussion is about whether they should.

&gt;With the option being argued for here, it does. 

No, because it happens in the same time window. We're not arguing for the right to abandon a child (even though that is what women get, too, in some places - not the issue).

&gt;Abortion ends the pregnancy, and the person is never made. Walking away from the child does nothing to effect the situation of the unwanted child, it simply protects one of the parents from the consequences.

No, there is no child. Just like physical abortion, it prevents parental responsibilities from coming into existence. That man is thereafter not different from any other guy the woman had sex with. Those others aren't getting the rights and duties of fatherhood either if she later decides to have a child on her own.&gt;entitlement much?
Girl has sex with a guy she's a crazy person. Guy has sex with a girl and get's her pregnant victim of a crazy person.
Guys do like to have unprotected sex. Just let you know.
And there are sometimes consequences to having unprotected sex.
but sure Women are crazy and men are simply victims. Roger.

Women have plenty of contraceptive options - that's completely under their control. I don't see why you would need to make the man responsible for their failure to use them. 

Anyway, if the woman wanted to use contraception, then why would it matter whether the guy opts out or not? She doesn't want a child anyway, and is most likely going to abort. If that random guy thinks it's a bad idea to let decisions like choosing life partners and having children depend on random hookups at the bar, that's certainly something I agree with and one of the more sensible reasons to have an abortion, male or female.I suggest to automatically ignore deltas in quotes.&gt; It's not cruelty and it's not undue.

Isn't it cruel to deny people the child they want by having it aborted?

&gt; It's unfortunate that a man can be hurt by her desire to exercise bodily autonomy but her right to bodily autonomy is paramount in this situation.

I agree. So cruel or not, that's not relevant to the issue at hand.

&gt;Whereas laws that would allow a father to lose parental rights while ceasing all financial responsibility hurt the unborn child in more ways than one.

There is no child. If a child will lack something in the future, it's solely due to the decision of its mother to have it while knowing there would only be one parent to support it.&gt; If it takes half an hour just to get out of the parking garage and another hour to get out of the city (at night that ordeal takes 5 minutes) you're doing something wrong.

Yep. You're trying to drive a car through a city full of people.

&gt;What they really should do is tunnel those fucking trams, make a decent metro network so commuters don't come into the center anymore, that way people who actually need to move around with a car can do so and not be stuck behind some fucking bus.

Providing a good alternative is a necessary part of the solution, but some people will not bite the carrot and have to be chased out of their outdated habits by stick.

All in all I'd prefer to have the stinky cars underground rather than the clean trams, though.There is no father if he has opted out. I don't see why a man who didn't want to have a child precisely because he thought they were in no position - financially - to raise a child properly should be forced to carry the consequences of a decision he opposed right from the start.

The position of the mother would be the same as a single woman who went to a sperm bank to get pregnant. There's no one else on the hook, it's her decision.&gt;That's not how the human body works.

This is not about the human body, it's about human legislation. That works how we want it to.

&gt;Nope. Since she has to carry the baby around for 9 months she can decide that she doesn't want to do so during this period. That's how human bodies work.

Doing so though prevents her from becoming a parent. Even though that is a side effect of abortion, she still has that right and if a woman has it, a man should have it too.You're being dishonest if you exclude the future burdens that of the waste we have already produced that still have to be accounted for, the risks of them leaking in the water supply, and ignore the chance of very big disasters due to their small chance. Nuclear energy produces problems for millenia.

&gt;The waste is minimal and stored safely.

[Inspectors in northern Germany have found that a third of barrels containing radioactive waste at a decommissioned nuclear plant are damaged](http://www.thelocal.de/20141010/one-third-of-barrels-leak-at-nuclear-waste-site-brunsbttel)

And that's *Germany*, known for technological prowess, and adhering strictly to procedures.I'm certain that you do, after all all your own comments get an automatic upvote from yourself. So, I'm honored by getting a downvote from you.&gt; And it then creates an injustice for both the mother and the child. It "solves half the injustice" by creating two new ones.

No, the mother voluntarily chose to be in that situation. The child didn't, but the father chose not to have it in the first place and it only exists because the mother chose it to exist. You can't have the exclusive power to decide about abortion or not, and then blame the nearest man for the consequences.

&gt;here is a child once the woman is pregnant.

In that case, abortion is murder and should be made illegal.

&gt;That's not the point I'm making.

It's still not a good argument to deny abortion to anyone. If you  think it is, you have to agree that abortion for women should be illegal too.

&gt;This is physically impossible unless you have figured out a way for men to get pregnant.

I've figured out a way for men to opt out from parenthood, just like abortion.

&gt;Ok, but the discussion is about two parents who had consensual sex.

Yes. I see no reason why one of both should get the right to opt out of parenthood and the other shouldn't. It's either both, or neither.

&gt;Yes, it happens when two people have sex.

So you think women shouldn't have the right to abort either?




The high capital requirements for both starting a business and recovering if it fails are yet another problematic feature of capitalism, not social democracy. Sure. It's still True in the long run.Well, Jo\u00eblle Bergeron, former FN member, is part of UKIP's EP fraction. Conversely, Janice Atkinson, elected as UKIPer, is part of the same EP fraction as Front National. It's a revolving door.&gt; The actual risk is minimal. Coal plants "leak" more radiation to atmosphere than nuclear power plants do, lol.

I'll gladly agree that coal is worse than nuclear. Then again, coal is worse then *anything* else, so that doesn't say much.

&gt;You know why nuclear in Germany is being phased out Germany? Because of Fukushima. Putting aside the fact that Fukushima got into trouble because of a TSUNAMI, which don't happen in goddamn Germany, it experienced meltdown of tree of its reactors(which is basically the worst case scenario as far as a nuclear power plant goes) and... the area in the vicinity of Fukushima is perfectly habitable. The background radiation is so low it doesn't even go above natural levels according to western standards.

The point of Fukushima is that unforeseen circumstances can and do make things happen that the nuclear industry promised couldn't possibly happen. It showed that cutting corners on security is profitable and seductive, and that we can't reasonably expect human beings to effectively implement safe practices, even if they are technically possible. The main problem is that humans are unreliable.

Fukushima was just the final drop in the bucket of a steady stream of failure of the nuclear industry to live up to its promises.
&gt; As far as i know Scottish didn't want out, but that besides my main point. If they want out, I would let them get out of the union.

The Welsh certainly did. Point is that "natural" national identities were forged intentionally or grew as a result of political arrangements. There is no reason to expect that the current situation is definitive.

&gt;It's hardly inevitable as how Eu is going to be is mainly matter of policy. Policy can be changed. 

Continuing globalization will force us to make more international deals. If we wait now we will just be forced later when we notice that we lose relevance because it's just not efficient to deal with 28 dwarves instead of one EU.

&gt;Unfortunately politicians are one of the people who most benefit from the Eu.

I don't see that at all. They'll have to share power with more others. It's easier to be king of the heap in a small country than in the EU.



&gt; Fair, but even if the only restriction a matter of time, there are still going to be a number of men who will simply walk away the second the hear they have a child. And unlike the potential female who is similarly callous and unwanting of being a parent, who would simply terminate any pregnancy she gets, this option leaves behind a child that has needs to be met. That really is why this can't be the equivalent to abortion. The outcome is just not the same.

The only way there can be a fatherless child is when the woman decides to have one: her responsibility.

&gt;My example was given to demonstrate that without the father's support, the mother may be left with only desperate options.

Well, it's better that she knows it as soon as possible rather than getting a surprise divorce six months later. At least then she has the option still to abort if she doesn't think it's a good idea to have a child alone.

&gt;In effect, the father making his proposed choice backed her into a corner where she had to make her choice.

At least she has a choice. Right now the man has no power at all and just has to obey the decisions of the woman in the matter.

&gt;in the reverse, when the woman takes her choice, the situation is over and done with. No more decisions need to be made, anyone and everyone in the situation has been held as accountable as they are going to be.

That's because in the latter case two people get to make a decision, now it's only one: just the woman.

&gt;I actually do think the potential negatives are lessened with the option of holding father's accountable for living children. You don't have to be parent. You can just pay your child support

Your not holding him accountable for his children, your holding him accountable for the decision of another person, the woman. How can it be his responsibility if he had no power in the decision to create the child at all?

&gt;Or you can help the mother find someone to adopt the child on your behalf. 

That's a *wildly* unlikely situation, really :) The mother can still find someone to adopt that child without involvement of the natural father, if she's so inclined, anyway.

&gt;But if there is a living person walking around on this planet because you had sex with someone, you should be accountable for that living person.

I disagree with that assertion.We haven't got a faint clue. That's the problem, and that's the reason why I don't think we should risk relying on nuclear for much until that is clear.

https://www.rt.com/usa/192300-hanford-nuclear-waste-leak/

http://www.reuters.com/article/2015/03/27/us-usa-nuclear-new-mexico-idUSKBN0MN0C920150327

http://www.thelocal.de/20141010/one-third-of-barrels-leak-at-nuclear-waste-site-brunsbttel&gt;Both voluntarily chose to be in that situation when they voluntarily had sex.

Then why do they have different rights as a result?

&gt;&gt;In that case, abortion is murder and should be made illegal.
&gt;Not what I said at all.

If you say that there is a child once the woman is pregnant, then abortion is murder. If there isn't, then your statement is invalid.

&gt;Abortion doesn't leave a child with only one parent to support it even though two are alive.

Neither does parental opt-out: it leaves a pregnant woman with the choice between a) abortion b) raising a child with her as the single parent c) giving it up for adoption etc. Her choices, her responsibility.

&gt;Both opt in when they have sex. Women have the ability to opt out after because that's how the human body works.

Abortion is a legal right, not a natural feature. Women have no abortion muscle.

&gt;That's not what I said, but nice job trying to put words in my 
mouth.

If having sex justifies denying a person to opt out of parenthood, then it does so for persons of any sexe.

Those are all things a woman can do too. If those options justify denying a person any further options, then you must argue that abortion shouldn't be permitted at all.&gt;It's very relevant when trying to describe someone or their actions as cruel.

Cruel or not is not relevant.

&gt;If a woman is getting an abortion primarily because she doesn't want to play host to a fetus for 9 months or for health concerns, and in doing so causes emotional turmoil for the father, this is an unfortunate situation but it is not cruelty. Not even close.

Good, so if a man abdicates his parental rights and duties because he thinks he won't be a fit father due to financial problems, diseases etc. then that's unfortunate, but it is not cruelty either.

&gt;No, it would be due to the father's refusal to take responsibility for his actions.

He takes responsibility by deciding that having a child in his situation is a bad idea. If the woman thinks it's a good idea, it's her prerogative to have it anyway, but I see no reason to allow her to conscript people who explicitly declared that they don't think it's a good idea to execute her desires.
&gt; Does the man's option end the pregnancy? No? Then it's not an abortion.

I don't see how semantic arguments about the terminology bring us anywhere. Call it however you want.

&gt;Does it have any of the same effects as an abortion? No? Then it isn't the equivalent.

It's the equivalent for the women's ability to opt out of parenthood. It's not an equivalent with regards to ending the physical pregnancy, but that's unnecessary as the impact of the pregnancy on the man is not directly physical, so that part is not relevant.

&gt;I laughed reading this.

Incredulity is a bad argument.Then what do you argue?&gt; There's a difference between subsidies, feed-in tariffs and loans.

Preferential access to capital etc. is a subsidy too. Name me a nuclear plant that didn't get state support.

&gt;Because people are scared to death by radiophobia and will rather swim in an oil pool than drink "2 times more radioactive water", if you know what I mean. 

Even in countries that are positive towards nuclear power, it's still subsidized up the wazoo. Even in countries with no organized public opinion or lax environmental rules and/or enforcement, there are not private nuclear plants (ed. without subsidies). Electricity doesn't smell, they don't need permission from the public to produce and sell it.&gt; Name one that does not cash in RECs - a form of subsidy. 

You'll have to say in which country that is.

&gt;There are only 9 RBMK reactors left in operation (all located in Russia), all scheduled to be shut down by 2026. Without any Chernobyl type reactors left, your argument would be dishonest. 

There are plenty of ways for nuclear reactors to fail. Any earthquake can cause unexpected reconfigurations.
Sure, it's not even True currently. But it's based on nothing anyway.So why do you name that list of options then? What does that comment mean, if it was not a justification to deny the opt out to a man?Working on it!We wouldn't be judging it as a whole, but would be able to point out specific flaws, which can then be corrected and will be passed on to the final draft, which then can be approved smoothly. Now they're practically asking to have it refused, simply because it's impossible for everyone to properly analyze, discuss, propose alternatives for the flaws, and decide which ones to use and which ones to drop. If they say take it or leave it, then I say leave it.&gt; Does it? The exploding solar and wind industry is a small fraction of what hydro is producing, and can't produce 100% of the time.

That's rather perverse reasoning: if it has a large share it's mature and doesn't need subsidies; if it has a small share it's insignificant and will never amount to everything. It seems you have made up your mind and are just twisting your interpretation of the data to fit that.

&gt;Do you really not understand that more people supporting something is better for that thing? People who are anti-nuclear for environmental reasons are actually working against their ideals by blocking nuclear.

If they consider the problems with nuclear worse or just as bad as those with fossil fuels, they aren't. There are plenty of other problems with nuclear too, not in the least the long construction times that will just deliver 20 years old technology when it's finished, but will still suck up time and money before, and long after they are useful.

&gt;Who is dismissing renewables as irrelevant? Are you even talking about this article any more? Were you ever?

They are advocating for nuclear to expand and to provide a leading part of the energy, and are saying that nuclear is the greenest option. That's quite unambiguously putting renewables in second place at best.

And they don't even have that much to offer. They advocate " development of safe, next-generation nuclear energy systems". So nuclear energy *isn't* good enough yet, but they still advocate it. Finally, by saying that "we entreat the conservation and environmental community to weigh up the pros and cons of different energy sources using objective evidence and pragmatic trade-offs, rather than simply relying on idealistic perceptions of what is 'green'." they actually say that anyone who supports renewables is a hippie and Real Men use big powerful technical nuclear plants. In other words, the same story we have gotten from nuclear advocates right from the start. Nothing has changed.Fossil fuel usage being a serious problem doesn't contradict nuclear industry being a serious problem of its own.&gt; I heard Siberia has some spare space.

Then please go there and create a sprawling utopia of parking lots and highways, without people.&gt;Yeah, no. Because a father cannot abort the child. You don't get to get out of your legal obligations if the child develops and is born. To think you should is really rather reprehensible.

So you think that one person gets to decide whether another person will become a parent or not? That is a violation of their autonomy, and just as reprehensible.

You wouldn't accept either that the husband got to decide whether a woman was allowed to have a child either (eg. by controlling her access to birth control). And yet you are now supporting the situation where the woman gets to decide instead of the man whether he will be a parent or not.

That is wrong. That is his decision alone, just like it's her decision alone to become a parent too. The only consequence of the fact that she is the partner who actually carries the child, is that her decision to abort overrides his desire to keep the child. That is the only case where there is a conflict with her bodily autonomy, and then that gets precedence. Giving him the right to opt out of parenthood in no way infringes on her rights.If that's True for the man, then it's also True for the woman unless you say that equality between the sexes is not important to you.The UK's trade with the EU is a larger percentage of their GDP than the EU's trade with the UK.&gt; Actually I think it should be legal

But those women acted consciously in a manner that makes another human life dependent on them, and you consider that enough reason to make parental rights and duties definitive for a man. So you violate equality between the sexes.&gt;Because a man's body and a woman's body are different.

So you actually think that equality between the sexes is bullshit?

&gt;Keep putting words in my mouth.

That's the logical implication of what you say. I can't help it that your beliefs are self-contradictory.

&gt;And then leaves the child with one parent when two created it if option B is chosen.

The man is not responsible for the choices of the woman. She is an independent adult capable of making her own decisions without a supervisor who is responsible to deal with the consequences, as if she were a child.

&gt;Abortion is a legal right because carrying a child is a natural part of being a woman.

The consequence still is that a woman effectively obtains the right to avoid parenthood. Regardless of the source, we should strive to give both sexes similar rights.

&gt;Having sex opts two people into parenthood.

No, it doesn't. A woman still has the right to op out. A man does not. That violates the equality between the sexes.


I can't help it that you're unable to support your view with arguments.

Given you lack of answer, I conclude that you indeed don't care that people of different sexes have different rights. Your view is therefore sexist.Then it's still impossible to point at any specific film without black actors as racist. So then we're hypothesizing racism without being able to provide actual examples. I think that's... questionable.

I rather think it's a second order effect of the disadvantageous socioeconomic position of blacks in the USA. People don't like movies about lower class people in general, therefore less movies are produced about them, and less blacks figure in them, given that blacks unfortunately are disproportionally situated in lower classes.That's on hypothesis, and that will probably be responsible for some percentage. However, if the script says "white guy", then they're not going to cast a black guy. That's just not possible, and not necessarily racist.Emissions, diseases, sprawl, accidents, congestion, material cost, etc.&gt; Yes they do, but to whom? - Other parties and from experience these negotiations also happen in secret (eg. trade-offs, small committees that bring the results to party forums). Of course those internals become public at some point, especially when parts of the party want to torpedo/change the deal. But typically that's after it is done.

Small negotiations happens in secret, because the subject matter is limited, because they're done quickly, or because the limits in which to negotiate are already quite strictly defined. TTIP will neither be limited, short, nor constrained in what it affects. If a state were to decide about eg. rewriting a significant part of the constitution or the whole the VAT tariffs, of course that would be a public discussion.

&gt;And concerning your scope comment: I think the EU mandate and position documents that are public already put quite the constraints on everything.

Precisely because it's secret that is practically irrelevant. They can scrap or add everything they want and blame the other party for demanding it afterwards. If negotiations were public, they would need to effectively defend that POV.

&gt;Additionally they can only impact EU competence or they will have to get the OK from every single member country (and you saw how this turned out with the last treaty rounds, which were probably less controversial compared to the trade treaties now).

That's probably going to be out ace to get out of this mess.

I conclude that yes, you actually think equality between the sexes is bullshit. If you want a discussion, answer my arguments, in particular why you think it's no problem to give one gender different rights than the other, even when there is not physical necessity to do so.&gt;What is your point? If Welsh want out and UK refuses to give them referendum, I wholly support their strive for independence.

But that's plainly hypocritical after they have been assimilated into the UK by force of arms and law. The point is that you accept the results of past, aggressive nation-state forging, but reject the current non-aggressive state-forging as unacceptable. That is inconsistent.

&gt;I've yet to see any evidence that smaller countries cannot negotiate their deal just as well as big union such an Eu. 

That's basic geopolitics. For example, do you think Taiwan would still even be independent if it wasn't for their alliance with the bigger power USA? If the USA negotiates with the Bahamas, who's more likely to get what they want?

&gt;Also Eu can force countries to take part in deals they don't want to!

So can any state that is significantly more powerful. The only way to avoid that is to be significantly more powerful yourself, which is possible by banding together.

&gt;And deals negosiated by Eu at best represent average will of all countries, individual countries can negotiate deal that better fit their individual interests.

No, they may very well contain the sum of all countries' interests. Individual countries lose more in bargaining power than what they gain in flexibility. 

In addition, having bilateral treaties requires n\u00b2 treaties, where n is the number of countries. That number grows exponentially with the number of countries, creating administrative overhead. Reducing it to fewer big blocks benefits everyone by reducing the paperwork, and makes treaties more effective because they're better known.

&gt;Eu presents lot's of new job opportunities for politicians. Eu basically gives them more and higher paying job opportunities.

Pff, abolish the House of Lords already then. Or why not the whole government? After all, it only is advantageous for politicians to have more than just a village council.&gt; No, you have to first say which one does not receive any subsidies. Oh wait, you cant!

http://hub.globalccsinstitute.com/publications/global-trends-renewable-energy-investment-2014/renewables-installed-without-subsidy

&gt;Sure there are plenty of ways, just not on the same scale as Chernobyl. There has never been radioactive contamination release as bad as Chernobyl with any other non-RBMK reactor. Fukushima is relatively harmless compared to Chernobyl.

The point is that the nuclear industry -again- failed to live up to her own promises. So their promises simply aren't reliable.&gt; Really? Which ones?

http://hub.globalccsinstitute.com/publications/global-trends-renewable-energy-investment-2014/renewables-installed-without-subsidy

&gt;The overall capacity factor of the fleet in 2014 was still 62%, that includes the 2 shut down reactors, the doel 4 sabotage and all outages.

That's rather disappointing for a technology that's trying to score points by claiming that it's always available. In addition, Electrabel is using its (written off) power plants preferentially to generate electricity. To a large extent it's their choice to use nuclear electricity first and the rest later. Only a third of Belgium's production capacity is nuclear, yet 2/3 of electricity is generated with it.They will. It just won't be an improvement over the current situation.&gt; No, I KNOW that the other person took that risk by having the sex that led to the pregnancy.

That's the same for all persons involved. That cannot be used to support different rights for different sexes.

&gt; You can get a vasectomy, use condoms, double up on them if you're paranoid, or choose not to have sex with women...but if you DO have sex with someone, you are taking that risk. It's that simple. [...]He made the decision to accept that risk when he had sex.

The same applies to women. They have all the same options, and still get one more. There is no reason to deny the man that option too, as much as physically possible. It is not possible to give him the right to become a parent when the woman doesn't want to, so we don't need to do that.

&gt;BIOLOGY made it so the woman decides to carry the pregnancy or not.

Biology doesn't write laws.

That is the same argument conservatives in the 18th-19th century used to deny women the right to vote, own businesses or do politics: 
&gt;[The notion of separate spheres dictates that men, based primarily on their **biological** makeup as well as the will of God, inhabit the public sphere \u2013 the world of politics, economy, commerce, and law. Women's "proper sphere", according to the ideology, is the private realm of domestic life, child-rearing, housekeeping, and religious education.[3][4] The separate spheres ideology presumes that women and men are inherently different and that distinctive gender roles are **"natural"**.] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Separate_spheres) (bold emphasis mine)&gt; Never said it couldn't count so. Though, you see it's different from, say, biomass subsidies if you know what I mean.

So there are no nuclear plants without subsidy. [There are plenty of renewables plants without subsidies.](http://hub.globalccsinstitute.com/publications/global-trends-renewable-energy-investment-2014/renewables-installed-without-subsidy)

&gt;Bullshit.

From your report: "Historically the nuclear sector has received around 78% of the funding, of which the majority was on 
nuclear fission." And that's just indirect cost, mostly R&amp;D - it doesn't even include the research funding from the WW2 and other military budgets for nuclear weapons. Nuclear received twice as much too in direct support as well, vastly outpacing any other energy source in received subsidies but coal.

&gt;[name one?]

I think it's easier for you to give a counterexample of a private plant that is not subsidized.

&gt;Wtf? The whole US scene is ruled by privates.

No private plants *without subsidies*, if that wasn't clear, sorry.

They all have the guarantee that the US government deals with the damage they cause above a certain threshold. That on top from the specific subsidies they have gotten in the form of preferential treatment in spatial planning, loans, R&amp;D, waste disposal, etc.

&gt;Engineers don't. Politicians that make laws do.

Plenty of countries where the environment isn't very important, or where people aren't averse to nuclear power.

It's much less hassle and risk for the average man to use a condom than to deal with the paperwork *and* run the risk that the pregnancy is only discovered after abortion is possible. He would still have his parental rights and duties then.

There might be the potential for abuse if there were hypothetically someone that would make a sport out of it. That's a valid concern. To counteract that I would make the procedure cost a fee similar to the cost of an abortion. It's going to be quite costly to exploit it that way.

Even so, the right to opt out would still result in such a person explicitly notifying his intentions to the women involved when they still have the chance to opt out themselves, rather than just vanishing. That's much preferable to the alternatives: he' wouldn't be paying the child support of the children that would have been born otherwise, anyway.No, says the man in the control room. It belongs to the owner of the oxygen!I quoted your comment two levels up almost literally.&gt; asking a question about the lack of black actors in a movie.

If you're a director/producer and your cast just happens to be monocolored it's a good idea to check your assumptions and hiring policy, sure.&gt; Where did you get this statement you are attributing to me

Well, you are arguing that a man shouldn't get an opt-out, aren't you?

&gt; how does it relate to bodily autonomy?

Not. That's the point.
&gt; Is there a single unsubsidized solar plant in US? Even in Chile, where wholesale power is twice as expensive as in US and worlds best ~30% solar capacity factor, they still get $8 per MWh in renewable credits which is a form of subsidy. 

[Apparently not or not anymore: "Despite having no feed-in tariffs or subsidies to speak of, the Chilean solar market is among the first in the world to prove self-sustaining, with new projects able to be produced at or below grid parity, according to new research by Deutsche Bank."](http://cleantechnica.com/2013/08/24/deutsche-bank-views-chile-as-subsidy-free-solar-market/)

&gt;I assume you mean Fukushima. Are you blaming US nuclear industry for flawed actions of Japanese Tepco? I don't see how thats intellectually honest. 

And when it was Chernobyl they blamed communism where nothing works and so on. In Germany the presumably safe location to store nuclear waste definitively still is leaking again. Japan and Germany are both places known for technological prowess and strict adherence to procedures. If they can't make it work there, it can't work anywhere. [There have been at least 56 accidents at nuclear reactors in the United States](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nuclear_reactor_accidents_in_the_United_States)Mmm, it didn't seem that way.&gt;So I'm going to assume that the man who states his opt out intentions would also abstain from having sex or would get a vasectomy right?

No, I don't see why that is necessary if a form of contraception is used. We don't require women who get an abortion to be sterilized or abstain from sex either to allow them to get it.

&gt;Opt out parenting seem to be just another name for I want to have as much sex as I can, but I want to place all the responsibility for the tough choices or the financial support to someone else. 

I don't see why the choice to be a parent or not is tougher for a woman than for a man. I don't see why you automatically equate sex with pregnancy in a time of widely available contraception. The responsibility for the financial support is only placed on someone else if that person voluntarily accepts that responsibility.

&gt;There is still a child involved when a father opts out. 

No, there isn't, since it happens in the time window of abortion. There will only be a child if the woman consciously chooses to let the pregnancy continue, fully aware that the sperm donor will not take up parental duty.

&gt;Why should as a taxpayer have to support a child when that child's father is down at the pub flirting with another girl?

For the same reason they support children of single mothers who go to a sperm bank to have a child. It's functionally the same in that regard.

&gt;I've never got a good answer that actually addressed that question. people have deflected multiple times or said how the girl had all these options, but no one has ever told me why my tax dollars should go up so that a guy can chat up a girl at a bar the next week. 

Because the woman chose to have a child. I don't see why you need to blame a man for a decision a woman makes.

&gt; The trade deal is not meant to facilitated mergers and corporate inversions. It is meant to increase trade. 

Stated intentions are hardly relevant. Results are what matters.

&gt;This will not change any corporate structure or tax laws. Tax avoidance needs to be tackled at an EU level. A few EU players are by far the worst offenders, and this is not the vehicle to change that. It would not make it any easier to avoid taxes.

It gives companies the choice in which legislative environment they want to produce, with the guarantee that they'll be able to sell the products on either market afterwards. That effectively gives companies the choice how they are taxed, and they'll naturally choose the most advantageous. They'll also choose the least stringent and weakest quality, safety and health norms available.&gt; Of course trade organizations care. They care about all trade deals, and reject most of them. I am talking about the general public. 

Civil society organizations, not trade organizations. I still don't see how not immediately reacting to something somehow makes a later reaction invalid. People are complaining now, and your argument is that they didn't make complaints early enough? That's quite silly.

&gt;How many threads on here do you see calling for it not to be approved, or petitions for it not to be approved? 

Manifestations generally are against both TTIP and CETA. Against TTIP generally is the rallying cry, yes.

&gt;It is the most transparent deal in the history of trade deals AFAIK. Elected officials can go see it. It has been available in Brussels and the US has offered its embassy network to allow EU national officials to read it. In Brussels it is available at an EU institution. How much more transparency do you want for this deal that clearly does not apply to others? 

Given the very broad scope of the treaty and the sizes of the economies involved this will affect a lot of people significantly, so it's much more important to get feedback on than, say, a treaty on the exact administrative procedures to import fish from Nicaragua.

&gt;You keep saying trade deals are different, I know this. However CETA has an ISDS clause (and stronger investment protections that it did not seem you were previously aware of). I can virtually guarantee the Vietnamese deal has one.

The Vietnamese deal is mostly just about basic stuff like market access and removing tarriffs and even contains things like human rights commitments. I don't see why you keep bringing that up, as it's qualitatively different from the TTIP treaty. Not all so-called "free trade" treaties contain the same clauses.

And again, two wrongs don't make a right. The amount of ISDS clauses keeps growing and this is the drop in the bucket that makes us aware that is actually undermining the power of our democratically mandated governments, then we have the right to stop it. We'll have to renegotiate the other treaties too then. Besides, other significant countries like India, Brazil and South Africa are als wary of ISDS clauses and are now refusing to engage in new ones.

&gt;The EU negotiated a peace deal in Ukraine behind closed doors and a nuclear deal with Iran. There were no calls for transparency with those. Sometimes governments negotiate with each other.

War and peace and military matters are very clearly delineated competences, mostly separate from civilian life and actually do risk escalation if the national pride drum is pounded. A general trade treaty will affect every citizen, and generally concerns administrative matters that don't risk escalation. The apple doesn't fall far from the tree.At this rate we have at least two characters now who are not long for this world.Missiles need holidays too!&gt; When countries agree to join the EU they agree to join the EU as it is not how it will be.

And that includes the ability to make decisions about new EU-wide rules.The judge can decide to do that if he deems the risk of actual abuse too high. It's prejudice, I agree, but lives can be at stake. I don't know the details of this case so they may well have overreacted or made a bad decision.Those poor autocrats being victimized by evil popular uprisings!You need an official permit (from the Region), starting from next year. I suggest you contact an association of metal detector enthusiasts, they can fill you in on the recent legislative changes, and your rights and duties. You can also brag about your findings there :p or put them up for identification. There are some facebook groups too, or your local history association could help you too.Car noise, exhaust and parking spots everywhere is probably the main reason why I don't live in a city. And I'm not the only one.Works better than putting on a nightgown and pretending to be her grandma. edit: come on people, know your faerie tales.&gt;But public transport get worst and more expensive over time. 

Because it becomes harder to use when people start building stuff in places that are easy to reach for cars, but hard for public transport. Sprawl necessitates car use and car users demand sprawl.

&gt;I love how you made the choice of a baby existing something on the woman.

Well, if the man has made clear that he doesn't think it should exist, and the woman goes through with it anyway, then it's her choice. He can't and shouldn't be able to force her to have an abortion, she makes the decision... and she then has the responsibility.

&gt;It is entitlement and ducking responsibility disguised as rights. 

I think it's entitlement to expect to be able to conscript a non-consenting human being into bearing the consequences of your decisions for the next 18 to 25 years.

&gt;It isn't a sperm bank. It is a woman you chose to have sex with and then had a kid with and then who walked out on that responsibility. 

No, it all happens before there is a kid. Just like when a woman gets pregnant, realizes she isn't ready for a child, and has an abortion. 

&gt;And I'm going to pay for that. 

No, you're paying for single mothers.

&gt;So that man can do the same thing with as many women as he can because why not?

Why wouldn't he do it now already? At some point you simply can't pay child support for any additional children, so a guy who is mad enough to want to do that already can.

In comparison to the current situation, he would still have to pay the full price for every opt-out (now he pays nothing), and he would have to warn the woman that he didn't intend to take the responsibility, so she was still able to abort and throw him out right then. That is an improvement over the current situation where the same shit can happen, but will more likely result in fatherless children existing.

&gt;How about this. You can get your "financial abortion" once you pay 50 thousand dollars for it. That money can go to a fund to give single parent kids in the state resources. Let's add some responsibility to the situation. 

It should be just as expensive as an abortion for women. I don't see why women opting out of parenthood should pay less. The proceeds can indeed go to orphan support, planned parenthood or abortion clinic funding - I'd let them pay it at abortion clinic anyway so the accessibility mirrors that of abortion for women. If it becomes more common than abortion for women we can still raise the fee to discourage it, because then it would be missing the goal: providing equal rights.

&gt;I've taught those kids who couldn't afford a pencil. I've spent money from my own pocket so those kids could complete their homework with a paper and pencil. I've seen firsthand how poor kids from one parent families can be. And I'm sure that people like you would blame that on the woman. Let's just say I'm aiming my target someplace else. 

Actually, I think many of these poor single mothers would have appreciated it if the father of their child warned them that he didn't intend to stick around when they still would be able to pull the emergency brake. It would have been the best possible outcome in a bad situation.

&gt;If I was teaching again where I was, I would be paying for a lot more pencils if your ideas came close to being the law. 

I really think getting an early warning would avoid many fatherless children. Conversely, from the man's side, it turns fatherhood from something you are saddled with into a positive choice. If you treat people are responsible adults that make their own decisions, they are more likely to behave that way...They were at Bruis too this summer. Good show.&gt; Well good, but now you cannot get into one either because public transport isn't better and car use is sabotaged.

Never had problems with that.Better run that through the calculator first. Brussels would also become responsible for the pensions of all these high wages, and for their social security, and to deal with all the unemployed in the city. Furthermore, if they want to have roads that go to Brussels, the other Regions will be like "Oh you want us to maintain your roads? Here's the bill."In your scenario, certainly not France, to respect EU balances. Out of spite France will deny it the Netherlands. So it will become Brussels DC.

Otherwise, rationally it should be integrated the Flemish Region. There is no territorial competence in Brussels that can be decided independently without coordination with the surrounding Region. It's part of the Flemish Diamond, and the border does not correspond with the geographical reality, because there is no real border between Brussels and Flanders.

Of course that changes nothing about the languages of Brussels - nothing would change in the Community arrangements - , so that would effectively make Flanders at least partially bilingual. &gt; The question was "who?" and your answer is "they." Who is "they"? Do you even know who you are talking about at this point? Is it the leading climate scientists that you seem to take issue with in the previous quote, or the biologists who wrote the report? Or some other nameless group? Or just something you read one time on the internet?

The people quoted in the article.

&gt;No, they don't actually say that. The quote is right there. "Look at the objective evidence and pragmatic trade-offs" is quite a bit different than "anyone who supports renewables is a hippie and Real Men use big powerful technical nuclear plants." You are really good at building straw-men.

It implies that people who don't think nuclear is teh shit *didn't* use objective evidence and pragmatic trade-offs. So they're effectively saying "we're objective and pragmatic, and you are emotional and unrealistic. Why don't you stop being stupid and support us instead?" Yeah, no.

&gt;This is a global issue. We need to build and maintain a power generation system that does as little damage to the planet as possible. Just as we phased out oil lamps and horse-drawn buggies, and are beginning to phase out internal-combustion engines, we need to phase out fossil fuel power generation. How do we do that? Renewables are a start, yet the first question: What do we do when the sun doesn't shine and the wind doesn't blow? We still need baseline power. The best option we have right now for baseline power is nuclear. 

We can use renewables for the bulk of the power, and fill in the gaps with gas plants... just like we would do if nuclear were to deliver the bulk. There is no objective reason to use a static baseload production to fill the baseload consumption.

&gt;The newest reactor design that has been built was drafted up in the 60's I believe. That bears repeating. The newest implemented nuclear reactor was designed in the 60's. I have no doubt that we will find something better than nuclear, but what is it? Can we build it now? How do we get from now to then? Nuclear and renewables. Replace fossil fuel plants with nuclear, and reduce dependence on nuclear with renewables. 

And yet nuclear still hasn't made much progress, the revolutionary new plants (breeder, thorium) still have prohibitive flaws.. Even if we start construction now, a new plant takes more than a decade. We'll still be decades behind when they are finished. I predict that we'll have trouble keeping nuclear production constant, let alone expand it. Renewables, meanwhile, are improving constantly at a high pace. Any innovations make their way to the market quickly, and they are easily picked up by private individuals and small companies. That is much more promising for a quick expansion than going through the nuclear slog again.I though tranny could serve as a somewhat affectionate term - being a diminuitive -, but apparently it can't. Oh well.I think the term objectification has been overused to try to analyze man-women relations. You should try to define it independently from these examples, and then try again to apply it to them to get clarity.

For example, talking about human laborers in a company as *human resources* seems like a clear example of objectification: mentally stripping them of all human qualities and treating them strictly utilitarian for one's own profit as a result. 

As you say, a rapist generally derives pleasure from subjugating a person rather than just selecting a fuckdoll for strictly physical sexual satisfaction and ignoring the fact that it is a person. So I don't think that objectification is what is happening during a rape.It's practically impossible for me to evaluate and research every product on the shelves on a supermarket personally. That's why we have food standards: to be able to just buy groceries without committing 4 years of research just to avoid getting poisoned.&gt; The important thing to note about "countries getting screwed over" is that this happens when companies make investments, get permission from countries and THEN they suddenly pass legislation which leaves the entire investment worthless. I get why countries would do such thing, but it does involve a legit loss of investment for which a compensation can make sense.

Sorry, if the country deems that necessary it is necessary. Democracy &gt; business.In Canada, a Canadian company let its USA subsidiary sue the Canadian government because it didn't like the newer and stricter environmental legislation. That is what companies like to use ISDS for: to obstruct states doing their job by protecting the common interest against private interests.Does it? If murder wasn't illegal, and we made murder illegal, should we compensate weapon manufacturers for the loss of income due to decreased demand for guns?Don't forget your prejudice on the way out.&gt; If you need to get the last word in feel free. I don't really care.

You missed two good chances not to care already :pI think it's more of a case of "it took so long that the care arrangement has effectively become an adoption". Still, very bad judgment on behalf of the judge.Nuclear launch sequence initiated. This is not a drill.&gt; More speci\ufb01cally, Woodley asserts that individuals with higher cognitive ability are more likely to be aware of the advantages of adhering to norms and beliefs dominant in one\u2019s society and hence will shift their own attitudes and beliefs towards this normative centre. As a result, and in line with the present \ufb01ndings, in societies with rather liberal norms (such as most Western societies), individuals with greater cognitive skills are predicted to be generally more left-wing. However, in societies characterized by more conservative and rightist norms and belief systems, one could expect those individuals to shift to the right side of the spectrum. 

Mmmm... adherence to authority is more a right-wing characteristic. IMO the link is there because the left wing is about invest in people/causes now to see the benefits later and elsewhere, and that requires some predictive ability. In addition, compromising and negotiation requires more solid analytical skills to be certain you're not screwed rather than "these are our rules, our money and our country, obey or GTFO" - it's easier to avoid feeling threatened when you know what's going on.What is noninterference? If a pedestrian crossed the road, should the AI not interfere and not brake the vehicle it's driving? Or not interfere and not run over the pedestrian? But at that point the traffic will slow down, slowing the delivery of life-saving goods and services... and so on. The outcome of these large-scale balancing acts is unintuitive.

That's why we shouldn't let AI make those balancing decisions on the fly, merely give it an informative function. Politics and ethics should remain human decisions.... By pretending that the laws in both countries are equivalent, guaranteeing that our products are made in the cheapest way that either legislation allows... likely giving us the worst of both sets of legislations in every area.No, because it transfers power from democratically mandated governments to international capital.It's the same like Britons and British.Between Austrian German and German German. Or between North German and South German for that matter.The nuclear lobby is getting really desperate now: "it's better than coal!". Well duh, *anything* is.No, coal use is rising because it's quick and dirty and people can work with it. Nuclear energy is a big dinosaur that takes decades and billions, and then you're left with a bunch of crap that keeps costing money and keeps causing problems afterwards. For all its faults renewable energy can be installed piece by piece, making it a much better fit for humans.&gt;Real enough that the deaths per unit energy generated is the lowest for nuclear?

If you discount any future cost and ignore low-risk big-impact events.

&gt;The problem with those is that the energy is intermittent and storage is nowhere near up to the task of compensating for that.

That's a solvable problem, by things we should do anyway like upgrading the network, demand management and improved storage in the long run.

&gt;The truth is that nuclear can and should support renewables, both by providing a baseline source of energy, and by making the EROEI of a nuclear plus renewables system high enough to support a modern civilization. Renewables need nuclear. You're just going to have to come to terms with that. 

Actually nuclear doesn't have much to offer to renewables: the only thing they need is a way to make up for the gaps, and nuclear is the worst possible candidate for that, because it's not very flexible in production. In fact, nuclear needs flexible capacity itself to be able to cope with peaks... so they're competing with renewables in that regard. They're also competing for money - no nuclear plant has ever been built without subsidies, but plenty of renewables have. Wind electricity often undercuts nuclear electricity on the spot market. Nuclear energy requires huge capital commitments, while renewables can be built piece by piece if need be. Lastly, renewables are advancing much faster technologically. It'll be a clear case of a small and nimble challenger outmanoeuvering the big old dinosaur, in hindsight.

Call us when they're ready. I'll be on my roof, installing solar panels.It used to be more expensive, but the price has dropped.&gt;  So what's "neoliberal" about a "strongly regulated housing market"?

The neoliberal part is that the state stopped building appartments to fill the demand. So, the worst of both worlds.The stereotypical Irish hair is reddish though.As it stands, the regulation in the USA is even stricter than that in the EU right now... In any case it won't end up being to the advantage of lower or middle class people.Right wingers often base themselves on tradition, homogeneity of their in-group and deference to the instruments of authority, like police and the army or any hierarchy in general. Leftwingers on the other hand practice strikes, civil disobedience, questioning authority, prefer an egalitarian society rather than a hierarchical one and generally aim to change society rather than keeping it static.&gt;So in markets with exceptional prices and exceptional geography.

Perhaps you need to reevaluate what is normal in geography: [most people in the world live on a latitude where they get at least as much sun as in the Mediterranan](http://bigthink.com/strange-maps/563-pop-by-lat-and-pop-by-long). And where people live, that's where the consumption is. Right above that latitude you have a zone with [strong winds](http://www.artinaid.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/03/Mapa-de-Velocidad-del-Viento-en-el-Mundo.jpg). So geography will not be the limiting factor in the long run. 

&gt;In a normal market its simply impossible to build renewable energy projects without subsides. 

Which subsidies? I just gave you an article that explicitly deals with examples of the lack of subsidies. I'll repeat: no nuclear plant has ever been constructed without significant state support.

&gt;It is, but its still twice the capacity factor of our wind turbines on the sea. Three times that of our land based turbines and 7 times that of our solar energy. 

Windmills are actually put on non-active when there is an oversupply, because they're easier to throttle than nuclear. So that's a measure of the actual production, not the potential.

Capacity factor is a non-problem, really. What matters is actual supply delivered. Whether that is achieved by one plant delivering at 100% or 10 plants delivering at 10% of capacity doesn't really matter - it's just a different construction price to build either the excess capacity or some other way to balance supply and demand over space and time.

&gt;Once D3 &amp; T2 are restarted next year capacity factors of 90% will return.

Doesn't really matter, does it? We need the backup from other sources, no matter if we only need it once every ten years or once every ten days. The capacity has to be there.

&gt;Well they are simply the cheapest plants to run

... After a bunch of implicit and explicit subsidies in the past and in the future.

&gt;why would you choose to use power plants like gas plants which are 3 times more expensive to run?

The point is that observed use cannot be equated with actual production potential: you have to account for the policy choices of energy companies.&gt; Evaluate and research? You are already in the supermarket. All you need to do is use you arm to pick up the product and then use your eyes to read. If that is too much work for you then we have bigger problems lol.

The contents of the product are one thing, its production practices, production chain and corporate structure another. They can hide their dirty practices in a subsidiary, that's not something you can find out in five minutes on your smartphone, and really, five minutes per product that you *could* buy? You'd be in the supermarket all day just to get groceries.

&gt;But seriously, if it is a brand you don't recognize then don't buy it. Fairly simply if you want to avoid researching. Not signing TTIP seems more of like it being an inconvenience to you more than anything

That's nonsense, brands change all the time, and the market can't function without innovation. Ensuring that a product that reaches the shelves abides by certain minimal standards, at least those that I can't evaluate then and there without making a day job out of it, is a core task of government and as essential for the functioning of a common market as *roads*.

&gt;Not signing TTIP seems more of like it being an inconvenience to you more than anything

Well, TTIP is only about the convenience of transnational capital, so what gives?How will you verify that a person has the right age, citizenship and lives in the right voting district? How will you prevent people from voting multiple times?

&gt;keeping millions from voting. 

How on earth does an ID requirement keep people from voting?

If anything, it's the silly exercise in red tape that is voter registration that keeps people from voting. With a permanent ID you don't need to waste time on that bullshit. Or hold elections on an off-day, so people who need to work can actually vote. That's both much more taxing for time-pressed people than ID.You have to account for one simple fact: I can rechargy my electric vehicle at home, with at most a one-time investment to change the wiring, which probably comes with the car.

But nobody can charge their combustion vehicle at home. The only reason they're more convenient is the existing network of fuel stations. So, ICE's are actually at a disadvantage compared to EV's, and only the benefit of historical infrastructure keeps in business. With only a small improvement in either battery size, weight or charging times, it will become more affordable for more people to have an EV, and at some point the fuel stations will do the relatively small investment to make it possible to recharge there... the fact that it could still take 20-30 minutes will only stimulate them to do it faster, since those people will likely buy a drink at their charging station. In fact, even the more fancy restaurant might do it, to attract customers - charge while you eat, and then others will imitate. And once EV's have a better network than now, the ball starts rolling and EV's take over.

But I agree that significant investment by someone with deep pockets would make it happen faster, be it in charging infrastructure, mass production or technology research.&gt; They said the same exact thing about cell phones in the '80s: "They're too expensive", "The batteries don't last", "They're too big and bulky", "Normal people will never use them"

Well, and that all is still True for 80's-style cellphones...For a fuel station owner 500$ of investment is almost negligible. Part of the investment comes right back through reduced taxes already, and the rest can easily be recouped by either charging fees or the extra profit by people buying a drink, snack and newspaper while charging... and that's ignoring the PR: they profile themselves as high-tech and attract wealthier customers, at least initially. And at some point it becomes expected standard equipment.&gt; Electric cars will likely gain prominence among suburban people, and then slowly move into cities.

Suburban people are the biggest car users, and there you'll find the ones who actually do have very long commutes. If anything small electric vehicles will be easier in the city than ICEs, and the smaller the vehicle the easier the battery problem - so I'd expect electric scooters.Most muslims don't wear scarves. It's a requirement for being muslim like wearing a [beguine's cap](http://img.ymlp.com/Heemkunde_Vlaanderen_GrootjufferVerhaegheIMG2824.jpg) is a requirement for being Christian. There are muslim countries who forbid the scarf in some places, there are muslim countries who mandate it but there the population tries to wear none.

Having established that it's not religious at all, we can see that it is a marker of identity and group membership more than anything else. So, if you change that, it's a clear message that you want to change which group to belong to.&gt;It matters what the person believes, not what their religion tells them to believe.

In that case they should call themselves a freethinker rather than endorsing the religion by calling themselves a follower.But that's the raison d'\u00eatre of Belgium, so business as usual..It's implicitly accepted that restaurants make a lot of profit on the drinks, while barely breaking even on the food. It all evens out. At least the owners don't outsource the personnel management by tipping like in the USA.I reckon there are quite a few people who have hard tech-boner for nuclear power in NASA. If you pit nuclear against coal and the game is "emit the least possible carbon dioxide", then we already know who the winner is. It's a rigged fight. And if you then see the conclusion: "We conclude that nuclear energy \u2014 despite posing several challenges, as do all energy sources (ref. 7) \u2014 needs to be retained and significantly expanded", it's pretty clear that's what they wanted from the start.&gt; Sure. Then don't buy the product if you're unsure.

Then I can't buy anything at all, because production practices change faster than a single person can research them.

&gt;Your making this so much more difficult than it needs to be.

Difficult for producers who want to sell crap to the masses perhaps.

&gt;How exactly is it nonsense?

Being able to trust that what you buy on the market probably won't kill you is a public good. It's not possible for individuals to compensate for its absence.

&gt;I am in a foreign country where I can barely read or understand the language. If I am unsure about the what exactly is in the product, what do you think I do? A) Get whiny, scared, and throw my hands up in frustration B) Don't buy it and buy what I know

I'm not in foreign country, and if I were I would have taken the absence of presence of minimal food and product standards into account before deciding to live there. If you want to sell your stuff in my country, you get checked at the door. If you don't like that, turn back. How complicated is that?&gt; What is Haley's huge secret?

"I'm not really what you would call" ... "honest" seems to fit easily into the scene and the arc without conspiracy theories.&gt; Forcing Brussels to make \u201can explicit statement\u201d that Britain will be kept out of any move towards a European superstate. This will require an exemption for the UK from the EU\u2019s founding principle of \u201cever closer union\u201d.

Who actually started this conspiracy theory about the "ever closer union"? That has never been used to force a law through, or to forbid one, not will it ever. Likewise any statement that Britain doesn't need to be part of it would be completely irrelevant.

... And the most obvious way to achieve that is staying in the EU.They also aren't any longer automatically eligible to receive healthcare as a Spanish citizen as with the EHIC.Coming from a country that had no meaningful spatial planning and did exactly that: please don't, you'll regret it.Well, the nice people who want Britain to stay out of the Euro have collected ample data that Britain is doing *just peachy* lately... apparently being in the EU isn't such a disaster after all. :pThey now fit in the EHIC framework. That work will need to be replicated by a separate treaty... for all 27 EU members. The result will just be that Britons in general need to go through a lot more red tape when dealing in the EU.Actually not.It's all relative. If the government stops funding housing from a neoliberal motivation that the government should do less, then the policy has become more neoliberal. If the neoliberals scrap a socialist element from the housing policy, and the housing situation gets worse, then neoliberalism is to blame, at the very least for misdiagnosing the problem and fucking up the situation with the wrong medicine.Well, for permanent residents it's the S1 document, for temporary stay it's the EHIC (if residency is not required, but for pensioners it's generally not, or a simple regular visit home suffices to keep it active). Both boil down to the same though: if you're legally entitled to healthcare in the UK, you're legally entitled to healthcare in Spain, *as if you were an insured Spanish citizen*. The Spanish national insurance will simply send on the bill. This seems simple, but it simply did not work that way before a solid, generally applicable arrangement was conceived and implemented on the EU level. Instead of 28\u00b2-28 sets of rules to make the different EU healthcare and insurance systems play nice with each other, we now just need 1.An AI that doesn't interfere with things outside his goals, doesn't help people in need, is precisely an AI that risks turning into a paperclipper - or an oracle in the best case scenario, because every action has consequences that would interfere with other people's choices.Could be that people who have invested years of education and half their careers in the nuclear sector are somewhat biased, despite their best efforts.

The reason is that nuclear might very well be *technically* possible and achievable, but beta scientists typically ignore how to realize it politically and socially. And that's the domain of alpha scientists, and those know that you can't give us monkeys toys that aren't foolproof or crookproof.&gt;No, that'd be some pensioners and non-permanent residents. It doesn't apply to anyone under 65's resident in Spain...

Residency requirements for insurance eligibility are a UK policy decision, it's been a few years since I was up to date with the matter.

 &gt;You are right though that the EU has simplified the system where the NHS is liable for costs, and that's great! But I'm also sure that if the UK leaves the EU I'm sure it'll be relatively simple to maintain, and happily since the EU already has something in place between EU and EEA members it'll be the UK working with one bloc, not 27 separate members, so it'll still be simple.

And that new deal will likely consist out of "follow our rules". Any change in either ruleset will disrupt it too, later on.It would be an organization similar to a hospital or university. Though in these cases, parts of the motivation is that we can allow free initiative and choice... prisoners don't have a choice where they end up anyway. So we'd only do it to leverage the benefits of free initiative, I don't know whether that's enough.Not necessarily, social security is funded by dedicated taxes and contributions. Although the last decades they tend to receive extra funding from the regular budget since it's easier to account for fluctuations in expenses there. Nevertheless, the money from social contributions cannot be used for other expenses.

[They actually do if they can use it as a way to sabotage alternative policies](http://www.gva.be/cnt/aid1058458/gevangenis-beveren-zou-pal-op-meccano-trace-komen-2).I have a limited income, but digital copies are unlimited. A market that doesn't allow people to make free digital copies when their income is exhausted, is a market failure because it doesn't distribute goods optimally.Go back to your play room, and shut up about things you don't understand.&gt; There is no point in putting barriers to movement or tourism in place as it harms everyone. 

Which is kinda the whole point of the "freedom of movement in the EU" concept.At that point it becomes useless to make one. &gt;Do you literally not buy anything now? Do you live on a farm and produce your own food?

For a significant part, yes. The things in the store I buy actually are subject to a significant number of quality controls and requirements done by organisations that are not me. So that's okay. It's not okay if I have to test every bite I take on poison.

&gt;Then don't buy it.

I repeat, we cannot research every food product in the stores. It's physically impossible, that's why we let a central agency do it instead.

&gt;This is not even relevant to my point. Not only that, but it doesn't even make sense. Thirdly, that is not a public good, sorry.

I suggest you try arguments instead of denial.

&gt;The sheer level ignorance you're displaying is mind boggling. 

Please tell me how.

&gt;My suggestion to you. Move out of your country. Find a private island, start your own farm. 

My suggestion to you: move to Somalia, where there is no functioning government and you can enjoy all the food free from regulation you want.
What has operating security to do with the long term risks?We simply have no effective method to calculate that risk because of the long time scale. That alone is enough to discount it.The concept is a bit broader than just walking wherever you want. Having smoothly integrated laws and public and government organizations also facilitates that.It's the price of the whole meal that matters.&gt; That isn't what it is about, this isn't about there being a legal mechanism that pushes integration, but rather that there isn't a current mandate in the UK for ever closer union between the EU and the UK. Essentially the UK doesn't want to be involved in further political integration, that's a fairly popular view in the UK - the EU is fine as it is, further integration goes too far. Hence why it is in the demands.

I always interpreted it as a natural consequence of cooperation, a description rather than a prescription.

&gt;It would be politically relevant and give a clear intent on the part of the UK in relation to the EU. Which might also mean there is less growling when the UK seeks to opt out of something rather than joining in or scuppering it, because it has made it clear it doesn't want closer union..

That's pretty clear by now. The growling is because opt-outs reduce the efficiency of EU policies and generates a lot of red tape... precisely the things the UK likes to complain about to justify the anti-EU stance.&gt; It is. It's used as a way to express their religion. If that is correct with theological discussions is interesting but irrelevant. If women choose to use a headscarf to express their devotion, even if that contradicts theological interpretations, it's a religious thing and wearing it is using your freedom of religion.

Well, in that case: paying taxes is against my religion, there. Clearly individual interpretations are irrelevant and certainly don't confer rights by freedom of religion. Freedom of religion doesn't mean that you can ignore the law as long as you say it's for your religion; it means that you're not obligated to take part in a religion, are not obligated to disclose your religion, and aren't allowed to be discriminated against based on your religion. That's all.

&gt;Of course the headscarf is more than just a religious thing and culture -and group dynamics- plays a huge role in it. But the fact that Muslims can't wear a headscarf in public buildings in Turkey doesn't change that a teenage girl in Antwerp can wear that same headscarf as a religious expression.

She can wear anything she want and call it religious expression. That doesn't contradict that it's generally viewed as switching her whole allegiance and lifestyle rather than just a religion.Carbon capture will cost more energy than burning fossil fuels delivers, so we'd still need another energy source. Solar shading requires such advances in material engineering that we'll be using dirt cheap solar panels as standard roof covering material long before that.&gt;That's an odd argument. I get what you're coming from, but how on earth does wearing a scarf compare to avoiding taxes? Religious freedom gives all citizens the right to express and practice their religion as long as you respect other freedoms and restrictions. Wearing a scarf in public doesn't harm others' freedoms nor restrictions and can express a certain belief. So how does religious freedom not apply here?

The point is that freedom of religion does not confer specific rights, especially not ones depending on your own interpretation. Wearing the scarf is her choice and is not dictated by the religion. By opting to choose an interpretation of the religion that is rather visible, she's deliberately baiting for reactions, so this is not doing any good at all.

How are her rights harmed by people having an opinion about her conversion and the way she expresses her religion, anyway?

&gt;In my opinion, there's no better image to represent Western Values than a picture of a parliament where a few people are wearing scarfs, a few suits and some other sandals. It shows that the parliament is a representation of the people and that different opinions can coexist and debate with each other. Something that only can happen when fundamental freedoms like freedom of religion is secured. 

I don't think keeping some pet religious people around to show how morally superior we are is a sign of openmindedness.
&gt; If you wear the scarve means you follow the koran very literally because altough nothing specific in the koran says you should wear the scarve

Read that again.And who decides about that? Women visit the cinema as often if not more than men, and even in mixed company or on dates it's not rare for them to pick the movie either. If there were an unfulfilled hankering for strong female roles, all of these films would be hits.It's a supply of half a liter per day for 60 years. Completely normal.&gt; Most of the non-romance female lead movies have been hits.

So, make more of them. It's a solid investment. I can understand the studios are a bit conservative, but they're reluctant to try *any* new formula, not just more women. So that's not sexism, that's general sclerosis and risk-averseness of an industry that has been uncontested for too long. You know what to do.&gt; 1) The Jewish ancestral claim is older than the Palestinian Ancestral claim. So they are not "alien settlers" walking through their lands. 

By and large the Palestinians are descendants of the people who lived in Palestine, just like the Jews. They just got admixture from different ethnic groups, Jews from Europeans and Palestinians from Arabs. Both are descendants... if I had to pick a side, I'd favor the Palestinians because they have 15 centuries of continued, uninterrupted occupancy in their favor while the Jews were away.That's just your opinion.&gt;Yes, but the UK is responsible for UK interests within the EU, it should be opting out of things where it seems reasonable to do so

If countries opt out when they don't completely like stuff, there is no union to start with.

&gt;It's hard to argue that a country should sign up to things it thinks are bad (like, say the Euro) on the basis that might reduce the efficiency of the EU, or generate red tape..

Even if the city of Oxford thinks rail standards in the UK are bad, it would still be nonsensical to opt out and have their own rail standards... The value of that lies in the fact that it's a network. A suboptimal network is still better than a fragmented one.

To an extent it's also the easiest solution for the politicans involved. If they can stretch the disagreement lasts long enough, by now everyone expects the UK to drop out again, so politicians don't really bother to hammer out a solid compromise anymore. It's just going through the motions.It's strange that defenders of opt-outs or Brexit always seem to go in circles: they always come back to "the people don't want it" and when asked why we still end up with "the people don't want it". Nobody questions that the EU has a bad reputation in the UK, but saying that they don't want it because they don't want is a bit disappointing.A smoker always remains a smoker, even when they have quit.You'll love it, so easy. Keep your weapon as main, and press shift to mine when there coincidentally aren't any bats biting your armor in two.It gets boring if everything is the same everywhere. Otherwise it's mostly a goal you can set for yourself. I think it's fun to try to contain it with the least effort possible, using caves as barriers. Also makes it easier to navigate the underground when you're done.

I prepare by making sure there is an accessible route past all the altars I want to destroy, and pwn them all in one big swoop. That way, some of the seed hallow/corruption will be generated right next to each other, and get in each others way, reducing the total amount of corruption/hallowing and making it more diverse. In addition, you only have to check the area once for new ores, most of which you are getting while building the containment hellavators/tunnels anyway.Pick up *everything*. The stack limit expansion was a godsend.Evade evade evade. Fight him in the middle of corruption, use a hunter potion so you see him coming, suspend yourself with the grappling hook in the middle of a crossing of shafts and the horizontal tunnel where all the altars are. When he's almost upon you, jump aside by reattaching the third tendril of the jungle grappling hook. Voila, he's passing right next to you, melee range or point blank range for other weapons, and you're not taking damage.It would be wonderful to have the game track which weapon did how much damage to a boss after you fought it.They ain't telling you. They'd rather get the dirty details about cheating get out than the fact that they couldn't really afford that last vacation. Or the car. Or the house.The Belgian style is more passive agressiveness.Doing exactly that. :pYep. There was no place anywhere else in Australia for a caravan park."Good evening Bashir! You were right, I lost my bet. The Americans weren't dumb enough to give away the positions of all the opposition forces at once."The issue with that is that we already have a rather robust method to create sentient beings if we want to. So it's not going to be relevant economically at all then. And then we're not even talking about an AI with civil rights gaming the system by creating a few trillion copies and landsliding the next election.Fossil fuel subsidies are still several times as big as subsidies for renewables though. Carbon taxes are trivial, and so on. These are all no-brainers and they don't even interfere with the market, so that can't be the problem.Not quite. No matter how much Greens compromise, the dead weight of established industrial interests bars any change. Even very easy and system-integrated measures like a carbon tax are scoffed at... but it doesn't get more standard than that as far as political measures go.And if they do they're brushed off as "naive smelly hippies" and "you really can't expect everyone living like that". Damned if you do, damned if you don't.&gt; There was never a period that the Jews were away.

Exactly, so one branch of the descendants of the Jews are now called Palestinians.That would actually make a couple conspiracy theories come True for once.What long term risk? A blade that gets loose and is swung away? Bring it on.If True (numerous people disagree, [eg.](http://mondoweiss.net/2008/09/israeli-historian-palestinians-are-biological-descendants-of-bibles-jews)) then you cannot claim that there was never a period that the Jews were away either.Time travelers arrive and prevent you from trying in the first place.Pay the ransom, *then* see whether the money protects them from a bombshell.Some people like to stress the difference. That goes all back to the anti-Dutch propaganda we were subjected to after 1830 though.Flashing a neutron bomb on this side of the planet will solve 93% of all problems in the world.Meh, your town is an invasion of the place where beavers used to live.You'll need at least an AK-47 to shoot your way through.

Just go by train if you can, that avoids the largest risk of dying prematurely in Belgium: the traffic.That's less than the inflation, so I doubt that.Demand creates employment. Without that, both of these drop their employees like a hot potato.Consider that the people who know they're making above average are much more likely to post here.[Magic is full of references to "this creature", "this card" etc. already](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Search/Default.aspx?action=advanced&amp;text=+[%22this%20creature%22]), and it works perfectly fine. Note that they never use the phrase "this creature" for another creature than the one the ability is on. When a targeted or selected card is intended they use *that* creature or *that* card.There is a god, and he's a jerk.What do you mean? Welsh, Scot, Irish etc. are all allowed. Just the most common language in popular music nowadays isn't, to limit the subject of the thread to something manageable.You only need to hit the head, and gravitational lensing bends the ray a little, so there's a margin of error of 2m :p&gt;Any change in spelling makes it a new word to learn.

It much, much easier to learn how the basic root is realized differently in a different language than learning a complete new root.

&gt;I can get the gist of French on the back of a cereal box. However due to the grammar, it may as well be Greek. The language to me, is unrelated and difficult to learn. 

You can't expect to understand most of it without putting in any directed effort, that much is True. Caling it monumental is exaggerated.

&gt;I understand that. But back in Grade 4 starting out, I had 10 years worth of vocabulary head start on learning another language. Everyone around me spoke only English, and my 10 year old mind didn't see the point in doing anything else. I was still learning English, and doing that course. It was conflicting to do both. Now if I was 4 years old when French started. It might have been different. (The earliest I can remember is being 5) I hadn't made up my mind by then, and the learning process would have been more ingrained.

I only started French at age 10 too. You have to be willing to use the other language to think, rather than translating what you think in your native language.As much as fit on the back of the envelope :pThen you would say *excluding* indexation.The trains strike less often than there are accidents and congestion around Brussels.Absolutely, it's superior. They'll just need it to reach the store though :) There, they can buy what they really need, including SAM's and anti-tank grenades.Changing one line in the relevant raw file suffices.Nuclear energy relies on limited fuels too. We already have a big fusion reactor in the sky, all we need to do is plug in. Let's preserve our fissiles for interstellar space flight.That makes no sense, the presence of electric cars almost correlates with union presence.&gt;As I take it there's no real advantage to increasing gun control. If everyone in America had access (that isn't a violent criminal) wouldn't this increase security since people could protect themselves? 

People will be distracted, tired, have their hands full and most likely be less capable, less prepared and less willing to use guns compared to criminals. It's not in their advantage to raise the stakes to a gunfight. When guns aren't expected, criminals typically don't bother to get guns themselves.

&gt;At this point it seems almost impossible to completely ban guns since there are so many already, and it just isn't logical. I don't think even the most liberal take this view anyway.

It's going to take a long time to reduce the amount of guns lying around, that's True. Better get started then.

&gt;That would mean the only thing politicians could do this regulate or ban certain kinds. I could understand banning high capacity assault rifles as those are meant for killing, but isn't it still technically in the constitution the right to bear arms? Where does it limit what it defines as arms?

Constitutions aren't the word of god, they can be amended... and they have to be clarified and interpreted. For example, it may well be interpreted as "all citizens have the right to serve in official functions that require bearing arms". Taking the law literally without context is bound to cause trouble. Context changes, for example the cities we have now are much more dense so more bystanders are likely to get hurt when shooting guns, and the guns we have are far more deadly than they were then. In fact, even if we say "let's interprete it literally" then *arms* at that time were at most *muskets*, not *assault rifles*.

&gt;If everyone had high power rifles wouldn't that deter criminals?

It would incentivize criminals to shoot first or use hostages.
Only if their income is dependent on the sales. Hint: it isn't. Somebody else rakes in that money. Find another way that allows you to give money directly to the person providing the service to you.Not if they only pay for actual clicks.&gt; Human sex trafficking is linked time and time again to prostitution. In the context of sex trafficking, an individual finds him or herself trapped and prostitution ceases to be a decision. Sex becomes forced. Prostitution is then linked to pornography. Trafficked victims become the subjects for pornographic videos and pictures, whether they like it or not, for our viewing pleasure. It is a vicious cycle of abuse with no way out. link

That only proves that sex trafficking is exploitative, not porn.

&gt;It includes and perpetuates violence against women link: 

The line between violence and sex is blurry. Are you advocating a '50s view on sex that considers bondage perverted?

&gt;According to Dines's research the prevalence of porn means that men are becoming desensitised to it, and are therefore seeking out ever harsher, more violent and degrading images.

I agree! In that sense it's like a drug: there's danger for abuse, but it can be used responsibly. It's desensitization, but not, as you quote later, "To think that so many men hate women to the degree that they can get aroused by such vile images is quite profound," says Dines".

The solution to that is to give people the option to walk away from the practice if they desire so, but that's an economic problem, not a porn problem. All bottom-end jobs have that problem: when there are few economic alternatives, the workers become exploited.

&gt;It damages the reputation of the workers in the industry; they're not respected outside of that industry and can struggle to find employment or relationships afterwards

That's a problem of society and the prudes (hypocrites or otherwise) in it.

&gt;\u201cNobody really wants to date a porn star, stripper or escort. 

It's not stable occupation, to start with.

&gt;On the porn sets themselves, actresses are vulnerable: According to those who were in the business of pornography, there are times when girls are held captive on porn sets or driven under the command of a pornographer or agent to and from the sets, which would fit the definition of \u201charboring and transporting.

That's already illegal. It also happens in eg. the construction industry, but it's obvious that outlawing the construction industry is not a realistic cure to that evil either.&gt;The wait between strips can feel long, only being 3x/week

Compared to other webcomics he updates extremely often and 
extremely reliable.It's like a separation of powers: you don't decide about the rules *and* enforce them at the same time, so that timer keeps you to your promises.&gt; You don't see a difference between handling a cash transaction for a customer and having sex with strangers for money?

It's less emotionally taxing to handle strangers' cash than strangers' cocks, but that's a difference it quantity rather than quality - some people can deal with that better than others in both cases.&gt; He cried and cried, but I think that deep down he thought it was a pretty good joke.

That won't stand in court.&gt; EU has proven that in the event of a serious crisis, that there is no unity in creating a response.

Thanks to all the countries that start to whine about sovereignty whenever it is tried to implement a unified policy! &gt; I don't see that changing (and why should it..)

Because national vetoes prevent any unified policy at all, so it's self-contradictory to blame the EU for problems around an issue that is explicitly kept national.Absolutely, the EP should get more weight so it can function as a proper parliament on EU issues. If the member states want a final veto over decisions, they also need to accept the final responsibility for failure to do something.Then don't blame the EU for anything that goes wrong. If you're sovereign, you're responsible. If you want the EU to solve a problem, you have to give it the competence to do so.&gt; Part of the problem people in the UK have with the EU is that it was never made clear what it could, or would, become.

It's an institution sui generis, not a 5-year plan or a conspiracy. It is created step by step in response to challenges in the world. Yes, there is an awareness that there are vast opportunities to reduce costs and increase effectiveness in defending and promoting our common interests by cooperation and presenting a unified front, but there is no exact plan how that will happen or how far it should go.Yes, and in many cases we would arrive at a superior solution without the national veto: the seat of the EP, the fishing quota, the euro structure, etc.&gt; No.. A lack of unity prevent unified policy.

So you expect unity to be a god-given happenstance? That's not realistic. Unity needs work, and people only do work when there's no easier alternative, even when doing to work would improve the situation.

&gt; not that we should somehow throw out the mechanisms that make dissent possible..

A qualified majority in the Parliament offers ample opportunity for dissent. If that's not enough, then your own state doesn't make dissent possible either.


It seems you have an unhealthy tendency to gamble. Worse, all the people like you fuck up my deckbuilding because of it.It's an informal agreement, but it's an agreement nonetheless. Though no loopholes are covered.

In addition, the player plays Magic at least semiprofessionally. It can be argued that it's part of the income he derives from his professional activity, especially since there is no chance involved to obtain the money: if he does A, he gets B amount of money, so it can't be seen as (untaxable) lottery winnings.There was no EU procedure for that, nor is it done by means of the EU. It's simply what happens if there is no EU arrangement: the big states get their way and the rest scramble not to be steamrolled. If the EP could decide about it, Germany would still have a large influence (rightfully, because of their population), but there would be far less logistic problems for other parliamentarians to weigh in proportional to the population they represent (in fact, the bigger the state, the lower the relative per capita representation in the EP to facilitate that). &gt; No I don't, I do think that it needs work and it needs common goals and so on. The problem is that I don't think you can run something like the EU effectively without it. Essentially, much like the Eurozone, it feels arse about face, the EU needs to build itself around the unity that exists, that might create more... not try to enforce it and ignore disunity because that breaks the EU..

That is a bit of a chicken or the egg problem, both the institution and the tuning of the ideas build on each other, and reinforce each other. It's much like forming a marriage: even if you start out on solid common ground, after a time you inevitably get into an issue where your view differs, and then you have to compromise for the sake of keeping the marriage going... just because it's not worth breaking up the marriage because you both like your eggs boiled for a different time. Nor does a fight about doing the laundry warrant a divorce. The laundry has to be done anyway, and sharing household tasks generally reduces the total burden for everyone, even if the ironing alone is more than it would have been otherwise.

&gt;It does mean that in some areas whole countries are going to feel like they are being dictated to..

Those areas exist in every country. If splitting up is the solution then the map of Europe is going to end up like the Holy Roman Empire, which was a toy for the countries that did unify until it finally unified itself.



&gt; I agree its unique, and yes, there is no exact plan as to how far it should go, but surely popular sovereignty demands that some control be exercised over how far it goes? Otherwise it's like that old saying - give an inch [of sovereignty] and he'll take a yard etc.

Of course. Personally I think the directly elected Parliament is better placed than the indirectly appointed ministers in the Council and commissioners in the Council to do so. Given the scale of the whole thing I'm fine with tweaking the numerical constraints, for example instead of a simple majority there should be a qualified majority for the EP to make decisions.&gt; Russian people do not want democracy. They see it as weak. Check the polls. Russian people also don't want peace, check the polls. 60% believe the Baltic countries shouldn't be independent. 

They want it, they just believe it impossible to achieve, that the world is dog-eat-dog and they're going to be betrayed anyway, so why not go ahead and serve yourself at the Lebensraum buffet.The problem with that is that the national governments tend to block progress on that front, as they see it as eroding their power base.It's like a party where no one wants to be the first on the dance floor.After the state started funding it again...With 200/day you can afford a cab too, if all else fails.To be honest, that *is* a significant increase in workload and as such it's not something unreasonable to strike over. The problem is that the negotiations didn't even start properly, and that five days of strike is a lot to start out with. Striking is supposed to be plan B, not plan A.You're not going to "remove" a professional army from key points with shotguns and molotov cocktails. From a random village, sure. But not from what they want to keep. And they won't get tired of it politically and go home, because they already are home. Lastly, a large part of the population would *support* that army.Or bargain for a compromise, as it's often easier to just say no right now. Most countries do consider the EU as a whole worth the membership fee, that wouldn't change.Nobody would complain if you replaced coal plants with nuclear in addition to the solar and wind. Please, go ahead and prove it. But all nuclear really wants is to eliminate potential competitors for subsidies.Oil is cracked into different components, some of which become fuel and some of which become feedstock, so it's not a straight barrel oil to fuel oil conversion.&gt; There is well over a hundred years left of oil with just the currently known reserves

Nonsense. Oil production has been on a plateau since about 2005.

&gt;and additional billions of barrels of oil are discovered every year.

The pace of discoveries has already peaked decades ago.

&gt;The US, for example, hasn't touched it's most promising oil reserves in Alaska.

If your "most promising reserves" are somewhere in the arctic circle, it's a sure sign you are scraping the dregs out of the barrel. Why would oil companies try to put oil rigs in the Arctic Ocean if there was anywhere cheaper or easier to go?

The main problem is half a century of car-centric spatial planning. Alternative transport means have to be built for those zones, or the people and economic activity have to move, which again implies a lot of construction.The market didn't stop dumping waste products in rivers all by itself either.There is some flexibility in the the cracking process. 

Nevertheless, plastic packaging is too cheap right now already. It would be good to see that price rise, so we get less superfluous plastic wrappings.
&gt; For me it seems very similiar to the bullshit as the ban of old light bulbs. I miss those, since they were cheap and weren't toxic. So I hope they won't do that.

They weren't light bulbs, they were space heaters who also happened to give some light.You forget that an electric car is much simpler and more robust than a combustion engine. Actual maintenance will be much cheaper and easier, it's just that for now the battery needs regular replacement. But there already are battery lease programs available, it's trivial to replace it - or part of the battery pack - during the normal maintenance schedule.You have to set a goal to be able to make a plan to get there.That's an option for at least some, but that would mean keeping a significant car fleet instead of cycling them out.&gt; It really isn't, its only a problem for people who want rapid integration and union. Essentially we have had a long period of convergence post WWII in Europe, not all countries have come along at the same speed not all countries are at the same point, but it has certainly happened. We should have been able to build limited institutions around that and watched it grow with participation and a real democratic mandate. Unfortunately we haven't done that, we are now in a position where a crisis is seen as a good avenue for new institutions or frameworks and they aren't sold on the basis of democratic buy in, but on the back of fear, manipulation or what amounts to economic blackmail. The foundations are essentially rotten and I really don't see how you fix that.

I don't see that.

&gt;If we took this analogy, we'd actually have to make it a polygamous arranged marriage, where not everyone was aware that it was a marriage when they started out, and a few of the brides aren't entirely sure why the rules say they have to allow themselves to be fucked because a majority of the wives got together and agreed on it..
The EU doesn't have the common ground people claim it does, the 'breaches in solidarity' make claims on a level of solidarity that has never existed and a continued thrust in this direction is going to break the EU for everyone, whether the UK leaves or not..

It seems you didn't get the analogy.&gt; Regolith (dirt) is a good source for a wide variety of different elements, provided you have the energy to extract them. Iron is relatively cheap to extract to begin with, as it is ferromagnetic and thus can be magnetically beneficiated, and is present in the form of meteor fragments in lunar regolith.

It's more expensive than mining actual ore on earth, not even including the cost of the space flight and the setup process of the colony.

&gt;Under 1980's assumptions, yes.

Under 2015 assumptions too.

&gt;So the system would be designed to use them sparingly.

I was referring to the idea to put factories in space. Most of the products we use have nontrivial organic components.

&gt;The goods would be mostly inbound from space, which would be releatively cheap due to aerobraking and space-sourced landing gear. Outgoing transport would be limited to hard-to-manufacture parts like computer chips and so on, or bulk materials that can't be produced on site. This would taper off as sources are found for the bulk materials and as additional factories are produced for the more specialized parts. 

No matter how cheap you make it, it's still an additional cost compared to any earthly manufacturing process. Not to mention that many earthly resources like the atmosphere or water are very hard to come by on the moon. Lastly, what fuel do you think that traffic will use?Seems like a case of bad education then.You'd be surprised. Maintenance costs make up the bulk of the cost of a used car.&gt; Who says they have to fight as a rebel? The whole point is that they are leaving the army thus removing themselves from actively fighting the rebels. Even if no deserters joined active rebellion, it is still weakening the army.

Deserters in a tyrannical regime can't just go home and veg out on the couch. Desertion is treason and just as punishable.

&gt;Very very rarely.

Which is more often than never, and we're in a civil war - an exceptional circumstance in itself.

&gt;I'm not sure what you link is supposed to provide?

Counterexamples against the notion that no one would risk starting an underground within the military. In fact, the military taking over and installing a government of its choice is a rather common way of doing a coup. That was True for the Roman Empire, True for Latin America in the last centuries and will remain True for the foreseeable future.

&gt;Killing a leader of a regime doesn't make the regime go away.

Neither does deserting. You're just putting yourself on the shortlist for elimination then.

&gt; A new general steps in and takes over.

That's exactly what a military coup is.That's exactly the mentality of the terrorist attackers in eg. Paris, "take out some swine with me". Is it surprising that I don't want to make it easy on people with that mindset to get guns?&gt; It really isn't

[Yes, it is.](https://juliareda.eu/2014/10/an-eu-wide-google-tax-in-the-making/) 

&gt;When Google takes intellectual works from within the EU and works with them, then the EU can protect those works and demand a levy from Google.

He's been pushing it for a long time already.&gt;[The 2001 Census recorded 30 languages which were spoken by more than a million native speakers and 122 which were spoken by more than 10,000 people](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Languages_of_India)

Population of India: 1.236.344.631

That's one big language per 41,2 million people. Not *that* impressive. If you want to compare India we should compare it with Europe as a whole, anyway.

&gt;I do not have an extensive background in Benelux history - why was there Anti-Dutch propaganda in the 1830s?

Well, it all goes back to the revolt of the Low Countries against the Spanish Habsburgs. That was partially succesful, the Northern Netherlands escape but Spain regained control in the Southern part (present-day Belgium). After the congress of Vienna they Low Countries were unified again, but the nobility and clergy of the south had come to appreciate hands-off rulership by distant overlords and the royal regime of the United Netherlands was too absolutist to accomodate that. So, Belgian indepence happened and the Great Powers were occupied elsewhere or wanted the United Netherlands to break up for their own purposes, so it stuck. The new Belgium of course made sure to portray the Dutch as the spawn of the devil, right down to the pulpit of every village church. And that mentality has stuck to some extent.&gt; The Netherlands was largely protestant

It wasn't, actually. There were large catholic areas and it was closer to 50-50. This aspect of the problem was exaggerated in the post-separation propaganda. There *was* some apprehension in the north about being country with a Catholic majority, but that's all.I can't imagine that's cheaper in the long run.&gt; I have some interesting ideas about a fleet of electric vehicles and the infrastructure for a distributed load-balancing/peak-shaving energy storage system...but that's a topic for another dissertation. 

That doesn't require total nuclear commitment. It would be a good match for renewables too.

&gt;Everything 100% nuclear is probably not correct, no; but I'd argue it's the one currently most severely underutilized when costs and benefits are taken into consideration. 

Currently the fuel reserves simply aren't sufficient to warrant a significant nuclear expansion, and the best ores have already been used. So it will come down to things like grinding down granite to get to uranium - rather energy-intensive in remote locations, so that involves a lot of fossil fuels... The footprint can only get worse. In addition, the waste management is not solved, and those deaths/diseases aren't accounted for. Lastly, nuclear has the potential to create no-go zones right in the economic and population centers of countries. No matter how low the chance of it happening, that's simply not acceptable.The waste management is not solved, and those deaths/diseases aren't accounted for. That happens on very long timescales that we simply have no empirical data on yet. But if even Japan can't keep its promises on nuclear safety, and even Germany can't deal with nuclear waste properly (both countries are rich, technophilic, known for adherence to procedures and aware of nuclear dangers), then it can only get worse elsewhere.

Nuclear has the potential to create no-go zones right in the economic and population centers of countries. No matter how low the chance of it happening, that's simply not acceptable.&gt; If you ask me, making the game automated is what makes a game boring fast.

At that point you can let the computer play by itself and go do something else :)&gt; There's arguably only one truly useless item in the game (And it is hard to get even one of), but collecting piles of it has become a traditional challenge that experienced players attempt.

Doesn't killing the right monster drop a pile of iron chains? Doesn't seem to be that difficult.&gt;I want a Europe of nations, of different identities and cultures that cooperate but stay seperate.

A Europe of Regions would do exactly that... while nominal "sovereignty" for small and medium countries only means that they have to suck up and submit to international capital and big countries just to make a living.&gt; Because my country may have different interests, wants and needs that contradict with the interests of say Germany or Poland.

The needs and interests of Yorkshire also conflict with those of Sussex and Cornwall. Why not split then?

&gt;And we saw how well that worked with Greece. It's unwise to try and merge divergent economies.

That's just a policy failure caused by putting individual countries and their interests at the core of EU decision making. Of course it's not possible to create a succesful common policy if every state strictly thinks of its own national interest and nothing else.

&gt;Who says we need to be a super power? Why can't we just trade with other nations, and cooperate with different people and focus on our internal matters? We don't need to be alpha dog.

If you don't want to be bossed around you need to be able to stand your ground.

&gt;The EU is stagnating, it's the only stagnant trade bloc!

That has a rather specific cause, see above.

Either way, without experimentation it's impossible to determine whether that's due to too much EU or too little, but given that only 1-2% of European GDP is managed by the EU, chances are it's the latter.&gt; Bullshit. Many people have pointed out the anti-Western undercurrent that's pervasive in Islam, and some have argued that this legitimises those Muslims who do openly support ISIS, but nobody thinks that each and every Muslim is an ISIS member.

It's very common to see "Eurabia" claims that simply count every person of muslim descent as a hardcore Sharia supporter to claim that Europe will be part of the Caliphate 50 years from now.Well, if you're lucky it doesn't matter what you buy, right?INB4 "muh sovereignty!"(It's okay, we can't all be German)Completely agreed.

Completely off-topic: [aren't you supposed to be dead?](https://nl.wikipedia.org/wiki/Joe_Dassin)She isn't staying there, so she shouldn't pay for something she doesn't use. 

Finding a new roommate can take time, but not infinitely long. They all met on Craigslist to start with... It's acceptable to ask her to pay a part of her rent until they've found a new roommate if that's what they want, but if they want the space for themselves they should pay for it themselves. If they're sabotaging or refusing to find a new roommate, she shouldn't have to pay anything anymore.

The compromise can be her paying three more months, and then it stops. What are they going to do otherwise? Evict her?For heating your home?

The cost of switching is that you have to clean up - or at least stabilize - your oil reservoir and need a connection to the main gas line from your house. The gas companies probably will be eager to make the switch as easy as possible on you, so you could contact them for help. For your legal obligations concerning the oil tank, it's probably best to contact the municipality.I would give them the legal option to hold a pay strike: tickets are not verified. Right now not doing so would be illegal and considered theft, while striking, i.e. not working at all, is legal. A pay strike is good or at least neutral for the traveler, and actually encourages the use of public transport.&gt; Nevertheless, something has to change. I don't find the status quo to be acceptable. Despite the NMBS receiving plenty of subsidies (and gasoline being heavily taxed), most of the time it's more economical for me to take my car than to take the train.

Cars actually do more damage to society due to externalities than they pay in taxes... In addition, spatial planning has been car-centric for the last decades. No miracle that you can't reach an office by train if it's built near a highway onramp, or that people think a car is better if cars are subsidized by the community by providing parking in the city center within spitting distance of every shop.

&gt;The way I see it, a strike is the last resort against a gross injustice. The way it's been used by the NMBS/SNCB unions during the last few years is just to resist pretty decent reforms that are required to succeed in a struggling economy.

It seems plan A than plan B too often, that's True. Then again, they have little other recourse: other ways to hold actions are usually illegal.

That being said, increasing work hours with 1 per week is a gigantic money grab. They won't improve service with it, they'll just put off hiring more people. And let's not forget a lot of NMBS employees already have horribly irregular and unplanned work hours... while some clear abuses and counterproductive organization practices, in particular in the central seat, go unchallenged. It seems that the NMBS top chooses the easy solution to squeeze their labour force for more effort, while ignoring their own part of the work, improving the organization of the company.Are you a member?&gt; I thought it was a poor analogy and extrapolated. 

I used it to illustrate the nature of a relation of long-term commitment, but you extrapolated the legal details like number of partners etc. But okay, an analogy doesn't always work.The driver can still refuse to drive the train if the conducteur refuses to play ball. But that's indeed a problem that would need a decision beforehand to prevent problems.&gt; So what?

It's the mentality that is the problem.

&gt;. And I'd rather have the ability to shoot back than to do nothing.

There are actually more mass shootings in the gun-loving usa than in Europe..., and only very rarely are those stopped by people shooting back.
&gt; It's either that, or large amounts of actual iron gear

Doesn't seem to be a big problem, just a lot of work.&gt;Julia Reda's opinion on such matters is worth diddley-squat. Her political agenda is, I would have said, obvious.

An elected parlementarian has a political agenda? What has the world come to! /s

You only need to read the citations of what the other people involved said. Well, as long as linking to it is still free (legal and gratis) to do so.Sooner or later, a gnome with a wand of death/polymorph is going to spawn.Every vote is a signal. If you want politicians to take your view into account, then you have to do the very least effort you can do to make it known. Even if you would vote for eg. a tiny party that only would get 5%, then it's still worth voting for, because next time another candidate might decide to include some of that party's issues in his platform in an attempt to get those voters behind him next time. In a first-past-the-post system, coalitions are made before the elections. You're voting to influence that coalition forming.Out for dinner and a beer.&gt; productive nations don't exist without singular language,

Mmmm..

http://appliedeconomist.blogspot.be/2014/01/gdp-per-capita-by-language.html
Nonsense, cars have congestion, red light, parking etc. problems too."Flexible hours" in practice means that they expect you to work late when they need it, and still bitch at you when you arrive later or leave earlier.Please refer us to the statistical data you use to come to the conclusion that black people don't take part in the celebration, and that they were excluded intentionally.You can throttle them to some extent, but at the cost of efficiency, most often by simply letting dissipate the excess energy. Even countries like France use a nontrivial amount of classic thermal plants to be able to run their network, in addition to that.&gt;Regardless of what venue the litigation takes place in, it would involve lawyers.

You're just more likely to trust yourself and your colleagues. That's normal, but for everyone else there's a glaring potential conflict of interest by allowing people with career ambitions to decide over the interests of big companies they might end up working for in the future.&gt;That applies to the finance industry only. And EU laws are much more lax than their US equivalent.

I never said that it would be disadvantageous to the EU exclusively - it's to the disadvantage of the US citizens too. We'll both get the worst of both worlds.

If the EU ever is going to improve and close the loopholes in the banking legislation, I don't want "the jobs will go overseas!" choruses to make it harder.

&gt;And as I said, this will not pass Congress. Financial services are an extremely contentious issue, and the US has flat out said they need to be excluded from TTIP unless the EU makes the changes it agreed to make at G20. 
So as I said, it wont happen.

And the reason that it doesn't happen is that Congress, the EP and the national EU parliaments are being kept on alert by all these protests and concerns against TTIP. So that's why we do it.&gt; Then you should not have said "I agree".

I agree with the premise, not with your interpretation how to apply it.

&gt;I would say they are.

I think they shouldn't, because that doesn't guarantee good parenting to a child. I think it's better not to force people whenever possible, especially for issues that benefit highly from personal motivation like parenting.

&gt; For the last time, in the case that there is, this is abandonment. You're suggesting forgoing child support, and there's only child support if there is a child.

You can't abandon a child you don't have parental responsibilities for.

&gt;Well too bad. God gave her the ability to decide who is a biological parent and you can't take that away from her without an assault on her bodily integrity.

An appeal to *divine intent*?! I know it's sunday morning, but LOL that's silly.

&gt;Those are exceptions rather than the rule. 

Just like this would be.

&gt;We have adoption to avoid worse circumstances where desperate couples abandon their children to die.

And we have abortion where women can abort their pregnancy to avoid having to raise a child when their circumstances don't allow to do it well: if she considers that it's not going to work out for the child, then she'll abort as the lesser evil and perhaps try again later. I see no reason why men aren't capable of making the same decision.

&gt;By and large, if you make the kid, you should be responsible for him, and this applies to both parents. Or, at the very least, you should pay for him if you're not going to raise him.

Then tell me why that doesn't apply to the woman?

&gt;It's not "the reason". "The reason" is that the kid is here now and he should be paid for by the people who made that happen, i.e., both parents.

That would be fair if women didn't have a the right to opt-out either, in the case that abortion would mean transplantation of the foetus to an incubator or something, and she would be parentally responsible or liable for child support too. But that's not the case: she gets an extra opt-out. Worse, she also gets to override the wish of the man to keep the child anyway. The latter is currently unavoidable, but the first is not, and therefore we should change it.

&gt;The fact that he had a chance to use contraception or abstain from sex is a counterpoint to your claim that it wasn't his choice, not the argument for denying it in the first place. 

That applies to women who want abortion too. They, too, had a chance to abstain or use contraception. Why should they get an optout and men don't?

&gt;He can. Call it "moralizing bullshit" all you want, he made his decision.

No, he didn't. The woman has 100% control of what happens in the first trimester. It's her decision, so it should be her responsibility.

&gt;These aren't "random people off the street." 

Why do you care? A child should have the right to support.

They have in common with random people off the street that they didn't intend to father a child with that woman.

Then why should that man be any more responsible than any other man she has sex with under similar terms?

&gt;They're two people who had sex without considering the consequences.

And yet you're giving one the chance to opt out and the other not, based on their sex. That's discrimination. Again, you show that you don't care for equal rights.

&gt;No, but certain right supersede others. Rights like a child's right to proper care, a woman's right to decide whether or not to abort her child, and my right to property are more important to a man's right to ungarnished wages after he's consented to sex with someone.

That's just an arbitrary assertion tailored to support your opinion: I'll give a reason why I think otherwise. IMO A woman's right to control her body *does* trump the man's concerns about parenthood, so she should be allowed to abort or not, without concern for his wishes. However, *her* wishes regarding parenthood do not trump *his* wishes regarding parenthood, and therefore he should not be able to be forced into parenthood as a consequence of her decision. A person's duty to support a child depends on his pre-existing parental responsibility. 

Whether society chooses to support single parents or not is a separate decision. You could just as well say "my right to property is more important than a woman's right to live comfortably after careless partner choices", so you're being quite sexist here.

&gt;The basis of this "difference in rights" is that he shouldn't be able to decide whether or not to abort her child. 

Nor would he when had the right to refuse parenthood in these circumstances; that remains the same.

&gt;Again, they both have equal responsibility for the child once it's born. The decision of whether or not it is born is in her hands because the alternative is godawful. That's the only difference.

The decision about the pregnancy remains 100% in her hands. She just doesn't get to decide about the parenthood of another adult anymore.

&gt;YES. HE. DOES.

No, what happens in the first trimester is 100% at discretion of the woman.

&gt;I mean, after the four months, the mother has to live with her decision and can't take it back either. But the man had his whole life before having sex to decide whether he would risk becoming a father. His partner had her whole life plus four months for a potential abortion. He is whining about four months.

That argument applies to women exactly in the same way. So you are again arguing against the right to abortion in general. Perhaps not surprising for someone who invokes divine intention as an argument...Any commercial television status lives off advertising and therefore has to be at least accomodating to business interests.&gt; I love free markets

I'd love to see one.&gt; To be fair, Corbyn is largely written off as a dirty commie here in the UK.

Then why is he party leader of one of the two leading parties of the country now?I'd say that liberals in the EU and USA are very similar, it's just that the other mainstream parties generally are on the right of that in the USA and on the left of that in the EU.Whereas Americans are all happy happy joy joy about their governments? Please.

&gt;However, its not the political system or the welfare programs that are making the danes happy. Quite the contrary.

[citation needed] I've yet to see anyone rage with anger that they didn't have to sell a kidney to pay for their university education or sell their house to pay for live-saving medication.Advantages of scale, and a focus on the top at the expense of everyone else.That would be relevant if the only value of education was to obtain a fleeting advantage in job interviews, and there was no actual content taught.State-approved topics of study, sounds like FREEEHDUMB!The reason is 76% because their parents were in middle class or better, and 20% that they didn't have a large setback like getting ill at the wrong time.&gt; lock the door

There's no lock on the general door to the stalls. In addition, if that was an issue unisex toilets would be better as more people go in and out.&gt; Snow also raises the ambient light level; I wonder if that's significant?

Mostly likely, improved lighting decreases crime rates.&gt;  Of course, she could have been talking out of her ass.

Probably still counts as eyewitness then...

&gt;penises (penii?) 

*Penes*, if you want Latin.Feminism is basically the combination of a conspiracy theory and a masochistic rape fantasy: you get to talk all day long about how you're oppressed and controlled by men in a thousand ways.The fire alarm just went off.Black men most often are lower status. Higher status gets the girl, most of the time. It feels like someone is breaking the rules of the social game, which sucks if you've been trying to play by the rules.Because the entitled piece of shit that is their employer refuses to pay them a living wage.What would be the point of that?&gt; Anyway, how about we proceed from this point forward discussing when its morally acceptable or morally unacceptable to "refuse care for a child one conceived"? How about that?

As I've just explained ("I think they shouldn't, because that doesn't guarantee good parenting to a child. I think it's better not to force people whenever possible, especially for issues that benefit highly from personal motivation like parenting."), it's the lesser evil... It's not coincidence that it serves equally well as an argument in favor of abortion for women.Agreed. In practice though even economic liberals usually have to be supportive of the welfare state in Europe, or risk electoral irrelevance.You said this:

&gt;Theoretically, a guy can slip in the bathroom, lock the door, kick in your stall door, and there you are

That order of actions only makes sense if he locks the door to the public, not the stall door. Unless he locks himself into a stall and then kicks out that door, but that doesn't makes sense.&gt; What does 76% of their parents having been in the middle class have to do with anything?

Social mobility isn't that high in the USA. The social class of the parents is a good predictor of the social class of the children.

&gt;Or it will mean more men impregnable women

Sex is sex, impregnation isn't a voluntary act.

&gt;and refuse to help. 

It's quite revealing how you think of them as the junior partner in the parenthood enterprise: just good enough to contribute capital, but not good enough to actually be allowed to make decisions.

&gt;Even with precaution pregnancy can happen and men will have no reason to take any precautions such as condoms. Women will face the full burden of birth control. [...]So pregnancy will be just as likely if not more so and because the men have an out many will take it. They will go into sex knowing it has no consequences. So they won't really care who they impregnate.

STD's alone are a sufficient reason for birth control. Besides, accepting parenthood will still be the default. Just like abortion for women it will be quite a hassle, cost much more money than condoms, and not be foolproof.

And ultimately, these kinds of guys exist, and they aren't good in either parenting or paying child support on time or at all. It's preferable that the woman in question gets an explicit notification of his intentions rather than naively assuming that the guy will be of any use to the child.

&gt;Just showing the other potential side of this. I think women already have a built in reason to be wary of pregnancy and guarded about sex. Men need to have one too and the only way is emotional or financial. And we cannot legislate emotion. So financial is all we got. Men need to have a stake when they go into a sexual encounter.

I think you're quite sexist in assuming that men are mindless fuck machines that have no consideration or sense of responsibility.&gt; Lock the main door to the bathroom, the public door to the facility.

That one has no lock, typically, or the key is on the keyring of the bar owner, or there is no door at all even.

And honestly, that must be the moron of the century, to lock himself in a public place to commit a crime that's going to involve screaming and noise, guaranteeing that there's a crowd if he gets to finish at all.&gt;Because the electorate of the Labour party who chose him accepted that as none of the candidates were that electable or effective, so they might as well go for someone who authentically represents their values rather than someone who would appeal to moderates.

So one of the main parties considers him the most electable, effective and representative of their values. At the very least that big party, that is in government half of the time, does not consider him a cook, since you say he represents their values.

&gt;Oh, and the mechanism intended to keep people like him out, the threshold from MPs, was subverted by self confessed morons in the PLP who voted for him assuming that he would fail miserably in the contest but would 'broaden the debate'.

Apparently he isn't thought of as a dirty commie, in spite of what you think. Or he would indeed have failed miserably in the contest.

That certainly was an unregulated market, but given the threshold to entry only free for a very few persons...&gt;Even if they were only presented with a final version of TTIP, the US has been clear that it will not remove restrictions to match EU regulation. I am sure the Senate would be surprised if they saw that included in TTIP, but can guarantee it would not pass regardless of whether people were protesting about it daily or they received a copy they get to evaluate and vote on like they do with a traditional trade agreement.

And we should make sure that our politicians, who are infatuated with neoliberalism and will do as it says even when it hurts, do the same... which leaves only the areas of trade where the EU and USA already have practically identical legislation, which will, effectively, reduce TTIP to something harmless.&gt;No, they will need to use the network, and the network operator can not destinct between data.

It's the location of the provider, not the network, that makes it legal. Regardless, wireless services like telephone would be unaffected.

&gt;No they won't, besides countries like Poland aren't neighbours, we should be focussing more outside Europe.

So because there's one country between you and Poland, that's too far... but countries on other continents are not too far? I don't get that.

&gt;In the medium-long run we'll become some backward ally too, the differnces might be less then, but I don't want that.

Nobody cares much for tiny countries, no matter how advanced. Being small means having trouble defending your interests.
I'd love to see one, because the mythical free market that is going to bring affluence to us all can't exist in a world with physical constraints. It's about as utopian as communism.&gt;What are you talking about? They shouldn't what? Who is "they"?

Can you speak English? Can you read? Then you know that "they" refers to persons, and given that it's a quote from my previous comment, it refers to persons in the comment I replied to.

I've given relevant arguments in the last two comments already that you ignored (not to mention everything else you ignored), why do you insist on sterile metadiscussion?

The discussion is directed by the OP. I don't see why you need need more specific discussion rules; at this point it just seems that you are trying to win on points in some way by invoking procedural errors.
&gt; You jump to a lot of faulty assumptions.

They're not assumptions, I give you the reason why.

&gt;I'm not sexist because I recognize that scumbag guys exist.

You are sexist because you speak about men in general.

&gt;But really it is absurd that you resort to ad hominem attacks and mischaracterizations of my stance.

It's not an ad hominem, I called your assumptions sexist, not you. If you don't have the intention to be sexist, then don't say sexist things.

&gt; When I see a toxic and moronic idea like financial abortions

No wonder that you don't have productive discussions, if you enter them with prejudice and contempt.

&gt; You'll find very few free markets because markets don't exist in a vacuum. 

Which is exactly why I said "I'd love to see one", none have existed so far. It's not achieveable in practice, so claiming that free markets will solve everything is about as productive as claiming that the second coming of Christ will.

&gt;Something as simple as a toy could suffer the same thing if you paint it in lead based paint. The reason for the lack of truly free markets has nothing to do with malicious intent from the government and more to do with markets being very good at some things and not very good at other things.

Completely agree.



I didn't say that was their motivation. Just that the scenario is ridiculously unlikely. Just try to find an example of it in real life. You'd be hard-pressed to find one.&gt; They elected him because he was a dirty commie, not in spite of it.

So they elected a dirty commie to represent one of the main parties of the UK after WW2... you can hardly say he's written off, and even if he was, he isn't anymore.

&gt;As I said before, the Parliamentary Labour Party did not want him to even be in the contest.

The Parliamentary Labour party is not the final arbiter of who is politically relevant.People who are thinking the issue over tend not to comment, so it's a kind of natual selection where only the most sure people make themselves heard.&gt;  And If I may ask, is it an acceptable thing for people to work in unrelated field with their degrees in Belgium or other EU countries?

It's *acceptable*, but you're just part of a rather large pool of people in the same situation. At that point any job and job-related experience will make the difference. But a master in a business-related field will probably be reassuring enough to the average HR recruiter, so you'll be okay.Well, they keep to their own narrow circle: they do just like the Flemish do...&gt;As already said, Turkish state media is ridiculously pro-AKP.

And the others too since they were forced to change their critica stance to a pro-AKP stance...As much as the the cover of a book means to the content.&gt; As if Turkey's candidacy process has not been a complete joke in the past 40 years. 

Turkey can join if they fulfill the acquis communautaire. If Turkey did catch up on legislation and was still refused you'd have a point, but the never catched up to European standards, so why do you expect them to be allowed join? Then entry conditions are quite clear: stop playing the victim and take responsibility.&gt; Turkey has been trying

They haven't, actually. Otherwise they would have caught up with the legislation by now.Certainly a cause worth celebrating.While theoretically interesting because it would better represent the mixed sympathies of an individual voter, in practice that is unworkable eg. when electing a parliament.

In addition, people will get tired of coloring dots and just vote for an entire party to get it over with, or because they're rather close-minded. It would just give the close-minded single-party supporters an edge over those who actually balance their votes over different points of view.&gt;I have been accused of being a misogynist, a misandrist, a racist, and a skeleton warrior. In reality, I am none of these things. I am a normal person who is interested in engaging in conversation with people who think differently than I do. 

Oddly, calling people misogynist, misandrist, racist even when they aren't is exactly what SRS does... and as such they are part of the hate speech problem, not part of the solution.Why do you need a gun in school at all? WTF.If you can't find French media, why would you want to learn French? 

Also, *you can't French media*? Can those people find their pants when getting dressed in the morning?[This picture includes two progressively more detailed versions of this map](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Languages_of_Belgium#/media/File:Languages_Benelux.PNG).They did give some belated recognition by calling it "Brian Reynold's Alien Crossfire", but that was too little too late. Reynolds did end up making some version of farmville for facebook now...Can you reformulate that?Because many people would rather be the top dog in a powerless country than a codecider in a unified continent.[article:Does Europe 
Have Something to 
Offer the World?](http://www.brookings.edu/~/media/research/files/articles/2006/6/summer-europe-boisgrollier/boisgrollier20060525.pdf)&gt; Eu now is layer upon layer of red tape

Stop parrotting that bullshit. The EU has worked wonders to *reduce* red tape in international trade and promote internationally interchangeable standards, to the point of making other countries outside the EU *spontaneously* adapt our standards.&gt;To be fair, some people, including myself, just pick a language and gets to know the media along the way. 

Sure, but barring very obscure languages, there's bound to be some material somewhere on the net.

&gt;Also, dubbed material - and translations of media that you're already familiar with - is often easier to follow, especially when you're listening comprehension is still kind of bad.

IMO it's easier to learn with subtitles, because then you get native speakers, *and* can refer to a translation at any time to compare or for help.
&gt;it is necessary that we determine when 

Well I don't think it's necessary, and you're ignoring a lot of good argument so I consider that silent agreement unless otherwise noted. The whole bloody thread is all about whether it should be a legal possibility, which is about 99% determined by whether it's morally acceptable or not.

&gt;it is morally acceptable to refuse care for a child one has conceived, 

I'll give a couple of counterexamples: - a handicapped person conceives a child - a child is taken away by child protection services and adopted - a child conceived by rape. In none of these three examples would there be an unquestionable obligation to care for a conceived child. A counterexample suffices to disprove a general rule. Therefore, it is not necessarily morally unacceptable to care for a child you conceived.... and you could have figured out my stance on that without your little procedure, and it's frankly ridiculous that you suddenly remember that *now* after we've written approximately five pages of conversation on it. &gt; It's an expression.
&gt;"you can't take that away from her without an assault on her bodily integrity."

Her bodily integrity remains uncompromised. She retains 100% control over what happens with her body, abortion or not.

&gt;&gt;You can't abandon a child you don't have parental responsibilities for.

Why do you ignore this? Abandonment can only happen when you don't care for a child you were responsible for. Men who abstained from parenthood in the abortion window would never be responsible for a child, and therefore could not abandon it... just like you aren't responsible for children dying in Africa right now, or like sperm donors aren't responsible for children conceived with their sperm. Why not? Because they didn't make the decision to take the parental rights and responsibilities upon them, their parent(s) did.

&gt;It does apply. If a woman abandons her partner to single fatherhood, she has to pay child support too.

That's not the same situation. That's at least half a year after the time window for abortion has passed.

&gt;It's much less fair that I have to pay for something I had nothing to do with than that a man has to pay for a decision he let her make. 

The only reason he "let" her make that decision is that the law offers no alternative: so he didn't "let" her make the decision, he was *forced* to let her make the decision. 

&gt;This "equality as equal number of opt-outs" argument is useless since they both get at least one. And he willingly gave her that decision by having sex with her. That's his fault. They all took the risk and it could have happened to any of them, so it's a viable deterrent for that behavior for all of them. 

That argument would apply exactly the same before abortion for women was legal, anyway: "they voluntarily chose to risk pregnancy by having sex, why do they need abortion now? They already got an opt-out! It will be a deterrent against slutty women in the future!" It wasn't a good reason to not change the law then, it's not a good reason now. 

&gt;I'm giving one a chance to opt-out based on the fact that it happens in her body and the other doesn't get one because he makes me pay for his mistakes otherwise. 

So you do want to pay for mistakes women make but not for mistakes men make? That is sexist.

&gt;If he thinks this game isn't fair he shouldn't have played.

If the game isn't fair, we should change the rules.

&gt;And he's not! If he wants to, he can opt out of parenthood, just like anyone.

No, he can't.

&gt;He just has to pay for his mistake so that the rest of us don't have to.

Men have to pay, but women don't? Sexist. Slut-shamer.

&gt;Someone has to support these kids if their parents can't afford to. 

And that may exactly be the reason why that man says "It's not a good idea to engage myself in parental responsibilities now, I'm broke and unemployed. Better abort." Why do you think it's reasonable for you to support women that voluntarily chose to have children they can't care properly for, and to punish men who are wise enough to recognize that and want to have nothing to do with that unresponsible decision?

&gt;A right to support is the highest right of this conversation, make no mistake.

That must be why you balk at it. Except if it's a woman, of course - sexist.

&gt;And what got them to the first trimester relied on his decision. 

On a mutual decision.

&gt;This is not the reason I intend to deny fathers the ability to opt out of child support and your attempt to apply an argument in ways I never invoked it is nothing short of middle-school teasing.

That argument also applies to abortion for women. If you think that's a sufficient argument to deny someone abortion, then you have to deny it to women too, or you're sexist.

&gt;Abandoning your children has a victim; abortion does not.

The right to opt-out would be exercized in the same time window as abortion, there are no children yet, so they can't be abandoned. Abortion for women prevents that their parental responsibilities ever become active (so abortion by women isn't murder), and the same would apply to men (so abortion by men isn't abandonment).

&gt;Oh for Pete's sake, it was an expression. We all like using fun language sometimes.

So do I :p
They're both thermal reactors - glorified steam engines, it's not much different, they only use a different heat source.

What you mean is capacity factor, probably. Or which efficiency do you mean exactly.&gt;When you take someone's cultural identity and make it into a stereotypical costume it becomes clear that you have no real respect or admiration for the culture. You just think it's funny to wear a sombrero.

So, dressing up as a doctor with Halloween is not allowed because it's a show of no respect?

Hiring black musicians should have been banned after the end of slavery because they were just there for entertainment so they were being appropriated by the majority? Let's all stop listening to rap, it's not our culture. Only white Aryan music for whity from now on!Give all women and children bow and arrows. Equal opportunity works!Or Dorne's fabled legions.&gt; Sapkowski's Witcher managed to break through, but the last two parts of saga are only now (after success of the video games) being translated into English despite the fact that they came out in PL in 1997 and 99 respectively.

How many are there in total? I've read two books in Dutch translation, but I don't know if were both intended as parts of a larger saga rather than a collection of loose stories.It's pointless to ask at the interview: you're being evaluated right then and there, and if you're good enough you'll get to experience it yourself or will have time to ask it later; if you're not good enough it's too late anyway for this job, and you can as well ask what made the difference when they let you know you aren't The One.All you need to do is to learn to fake sincerity, and from there on it's all downhill - PR in a nutshell.IMO it's just an exercise in sucking up. If you don't have the job none of them matter. You're under their scrutiny, not the other way around, and if you have enough leverage to be asking them questions you don't need this kind of advice.Been reading it in translation, and avoiding the television series on purpose until the books are finished, or GRR Martin drops dead while watching a football match.&gt;"Doctor" is not a culture, ethnicity, nor cultural identity.

It certainly is an identity, and a group that is considered respectful... and dressing up like them doesn't change that.

&gt;A black person voluntarily rapping and selling it, is not cultural appropriation for a white person to consume.

So you actually think that people should only practice culture that is associated with their own race/ethnicity? You're a racial segregationist.

&gt;The fact that white rappers tend to receive more praise and awards than black rappers, 

Oh yes I get it, like women get more praise for succes than men.

&gt;and some white rappers affect a stereotypical "black accent" when rapping, is cultural appropriation. See the difference?

No, that is as much as saying "rapping is cool and I want to sound like the original cool rappers". It's a compliment. It's really perverted to try to twist that into an act of domination.I definitely agree they had to make some judgment calls. For Limburgish, for example, it really depends on which isoglosses you elevate to the most important ones when determining the border with Brabantian. That's a bit subjective.&gt; Harmonization (not just copying the lowest one) can reduce production costs quite a bit

It can, but then you get to a point where you have so many regulations to maintain and get feedback on that nothing less than a full unified legislative organ will do, and naturally that requires the two other powers too to balance it. It's exactly the same conundrum we had with the EU: at some point interstate treaties are so clunky and unaccountable that you need to upgrade. I don't think the spirits are ripe to hear the idea of the USA joining the EU without choking in their coffee.That's quite a different proposition.Sorry, didn't get that.&gt; Open borders yes.

And that directly contradicts the red tape meme.

&gt;Free marked certainly not. Just look at this small part of Poultry regulation in the EU. http://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/TXT/?uri=celex:32006R0679 Make crappy product, EU say bad you, now we pay you for loss until consumer is happy again.

I agree that's crappy legislation. Show me a governance level that hasn't produced stuff like that. It's no better or worse in that regard than national legislatures. At least there is the potential for abolishing it now without the affected companies threatening the jobs will go to the neighbour countries.Please refer us to the statistical data you use to come to the conclusion that black people don't take part in the celebration, and that they were excluded intentionally.You can throttle them to some extent, but at the cost of efficiency, most often by simply letting dissipate the excess energy. Even countries like France use a nontrivial amount of classic thermal plants to be able to run their network, in addition to that.&gt;Regardless of what venue the litigation takes place in, it would involve lawyers.

You're just more likely to trust yourself and your colleagues. That's normal, but for everyone else there's a glaring potential conflict of interest by allowing people with career ambitions to decide over the interests of big companies they might end up working for in the future.&gt;That applies to the finance industry only. And EU laws are much more lax than their US equivalent.

I never said that it would be disadvantageous to the EU exclusively - it's to the disadvantage of the US citizens too. We'll both get the worst of both worlds.

If the EU ever is going to improve and close the loopholes in the banking legislation, I don't want "the jobs will go overseas!" choruses to make it harder.

&gt;And as I said, this will not pass Congress. Financial services are an extremely contentious issue, and the US has flat out said they need to be excluded from TTIP unless the EU makes the changes it agreed to make at G20. 
So as I said, it wont happen.

And the reason that it doesn't happen is that Congress, the EP and the national EU parliaments are being kept on alert by all these protests and concerns against TTIP. So that's why we do it.&gt; Then you should not have said "I agree".

I agree with the premise, not with your interpretation how to apply it.

&gt;I would say they are.

I think they shouldn't, because that doesn't guarantee good parenting to a child. I think it's better not to force people whenever possible, especially for issues that benefit highly from personal motivation like parenting.

&gt; For the last time, in the case that there is, this is abandonment. You're suggesting forgoing child support, and there's only child support if there is a child.

You can't abandon a child you don't have parental responsibilities for.

&gt;Well too bad. God gave her the ability to decide who is a biological parent and you can't take that away from her without an assault on her bodily integrity.

An appeal to *divine intent*?! I know it's sunday morning, but LOL that's silly.

&gt;Those are exceptions rather than the rule. 

Just like this would be.

&gt;We have adoption to avoid worse circumstances where desperate couples abandon their children to die.

And we have abortion where women can abort their pregnancy to avoid having to raise a child when their circumstances don't allow to do it well: if she considers that it's not going to work out for the child, then she'll abort as the lesser evil and perhaps try again later. I see no reason why men aren't capable of making the same decision.

&gt;By and large, if you make the kid, you should be responsible for him, and this applies to both parents. Or, at the very least, you should pay for him if you're not going to raise him.

Then tell me why that doesn't apply to the woman?

&gt;It's not "the reason". "The reason" is that the kid is here now and he should be paid for by the people who made that happen, i.e., both parents.

That would be fair if women didn't have a the right to opt-out either, in the case that abortion would mean transplantation of the foetus to an incubator or something, and she would be parentally responsible or liable for child support too. But that's not the case: she gets an extra opt-out. Worse, she also gets to override the wish of the man to keep the child anyway. The latter is currently unavoidable, but the first is not, and therefore we should change it.

&gt;The fact that he had a chance to use contraception or abstain from sex is a counterpoint to your claim that it wasn't his choice, not the argument for denying it in the first place. 

That applies to women who want abortion too. They, too, had a chance to abstain or use contraception. Why should they get an optout and men don't?

&gt;He can. Call it "moralizing bullshit" all you want, he made his decision.

No, he didn't. The woman has 100% control of what happens in the first trimester. It's her decision, so it should be her responsibility.

&gt;These aren't "random people off the street." 

Why do you care? A child should have the right to support.

They have in common with random people off the street that they didn't intend to father a child with that woman.

Then why should that man be any more responsible than any other man she has sex with under similar terms?

&gt;They're two people who had sex without considering the consequences.

And yet you're giving one the chance to opt out and the other not, based on their sex. That's discrimination. Again, you show that you don't care for equal rights.

&gt;No, but certain right supersede others. Rights like a child's right to proper care, a woman's right to decide whether or not to abort her child, and my right to property are more important to a man's right to ungarnished wages after he's consented to sex with someone.

That's just an arbitrary assertion tailored to support your opinion: I'll give a reason why I think otherwise. IMO A woman's right to control her body *does* trump the man's concerns about parenthood, so she should be allowed to abort or not, without concern for his wishes. However, *her* wishes regarding parenthood do not trump *his* wishes regarding parenthood, and therefore he should not be able to be forced into parenthood as a consequence of her decision. A person's duty to support a child depends on his pre-existing parental responsibility. 

Whether society chooses to support single parents or not is a separate decision. You could just as well say "my right to property is more important than a woman's right to live comfortably after careless partner choices", so you're being quite sexist here.

&gt;The basis of this "difference in rights" is that he shouldn't be able to decide whether or not to abort her child. 

Nor would he when had the right to refuse parenthood in these circumstances; that remains the same.

&gt;Again, they both have equal responsibility for the child once it's born. The decision of whether or not it is born is in her hands because the alternative is godawful. That's the only difference.

The decision about the pregnancy remains 100% in her hands. She just doesn't get to decide about the parenthood of another adult anymore.

&gt;YES. HE. DOES.

No, what happens in the first trimester is 100% at discretion of the woman.

&gt;I mean, after the four months, the mother has to live with her decision and can't take it back either. But the man had his whole life before having sex to decide whether he would risk becoming a father. His partner had her whole life plus four months for a potential abortion. He is whining about four months.

That argument applies to women exactly in the same way. So you are again arguing against the right to abortion in general. Perhaps not surprising for someone who invokes divine intention as an argument...Any commercial television status lives off advertising and therefore has to be at least accomodating to business interests.&gt; I love free markets

I'd love to see one.&gt; To be fair, Corbyn is largely written off as a dirty commie here in the UK.

Then why is he party leader of one of the two leading parties of the country now?I'd say that liberals in the EU and USA are very similar, it's just that the other mainstream parties generally are on the right of that in the USA and on the left of that in the EU.Whereas Americans are all happy happy joy joy about their governments? Please.

&gt;However, its not the political system or the welfare programs that are making the danes happy. Quite the contrary.

[citation needed] I've yet to see anyone rage with anger that they didn't have to sell a kidney to pay for their university education or sell their house to pay for live-saving medication.Advantages of scale, and a focus on the top at the expense of everyone else.That would be relevant if the only value of education was to obtain a fleeting advantage in job interviews, and there was no actual content taught.State-approved topics of study, sounds like FREEEHDUMB!The reason is 76% because their parents were in middle class or better, and 20% that they didn't have a large setback like getting ill at the wrong time.&gt; lock the door

There's no lock on the general door to the stalls. In addition, if that was an issue unisex toilets would be better as more people go in and out.&gt; Snow also raises the ambient light level; I wonder if that's significant?

Mostly likely, improved lighting decreases crime rates.&gt;  Of course, she could have been talking out of her ass.

Probably still counts as eyewitness then...

&gt;penises (penii?) 

*Penes*, if you want Latin.Feminism is basically the combination of a conspiracy theory and a masochistic rape fantasy: you get to talk all day long about how you're oppressed and controlled by men in a thousand ways.The fire alarm just went off.Black men most often are lower status. Higher status gets the girl, most of the time. It feels like someone is breaking the rules of the social game, which sucks if you've been trying to play by the rules.Because the entitled piece of shit that is their employer refuses to pay them a living wage.What would be the point of that?&gt; Anyway, how about we proceed from this point forward discussing when its morally acceptable or morally unacceptable to "refuse care for a child one conceived"? How about that?

As I've just explained ("I think they shouldn't, because that doesn't guarantee good parenting to a child. I think it's better not to force people whenever possible, especially for issues that benefit highly from personal motivation like parenting."), it's the lesser evil... It's not coincidence that it serves equally well as an argument in favor of abortion for women.Agreed. In practice though even economic liberals usually have to be supportive of the welfare state in Europe, or risk electoral irrelevance.You said this:

&gt;Theoretically, a guy can slip in the bathroom, lock the door, kick in your stall door, and there you are

That order of actions only makes sense if he locks the door to the public, not the stall door. Unless he locks himself into a stall and then kicks out that door, but that doesn't makes sense.&gt; What does 76% of their parents having been in the middle class have to do with anything?

Social mobility isn't that high in the USA. The social class of the parents is a good predictor of the social class of the children.

&gt;Or it will mean more men impregnable women

Sex is sex, impregnation isn't a voluntary act.

&gt;and refuse to help. 

It's quite revealing how you think of them as the junior partner in the parenthood enterprise: just good enough to contribute capital, but not good enough to actually be allowed to make decisions.

&gt;Even with precaution pregnancy can happen and men will have no reason to take any precautions such as condoms. Women will face the full burden of birth control. [...]So pregnancy will be just as likely if not more so and because the men have an out many will take it. They will go into sex knowing it has no consequences. So they won't really care who they impregnate.

STD's alone are a sufficient reason for birth control. Besides, accepting parenthood will still be the default. Just like abortion for women it will be quite a hassle, cost much more money than condoms, and not be foolproof.

And ultimately, these kinds of guys exist, and they aren't good in either parenting or paying child support on time or at all. It's preferable that the woman in question gets an explicit notification of his intentions rather than naively assuming that the guy will be of any use to the child.

&gt;Just showing the other potential side of this. I think women already have a built in reason to be wary of pregnancy and guarded about sex. Men need to have one too and the only way is emotional or financial. And we cannot legislate emotion. So financial is all we got. Men need to have a stake when they go into a sexual encounter.

I think you're quite sexist in assuming that men are mindless fuck machines that have no consideration or sense of responsibility.&gt; Lock the main door to the bathroom, the public door to the facility.

That one has no lock, typically, or the key is on the keyring of the bar owner, or there is no door at all even.

And honestly, that must be the moron of the century, to lock himself in a public place to commit a crime that's going to involve screaming and noise, guaranteeing that there's a crowd if he gets to finish at all.&gt;Because the electorate of the Labour party who chose him accepted that as none of the candidates were that electable or effective, so they might as well go for someone who authentically represents their values rather than someone who would appeal to moderates.

So one of the main parties considers him the most electable, effective and representative of their values. At the very least that big party, that is in government half of the time, does not consider him a cook, since you say he represents their values.

&gt;Oh, and the mechanism intended to keep people like him out, the threshold from MPs, was subverted by self confessed morons in the PLP who voted for him assuming that he would fail miserably in the contest but would 'broaden the debate'.

Apparently he isn't thought of as a dirty commie, in spite of what you think. Or he would indeed have failed miserably in the contest.

That certainly was an unregulated market, but given the threshold to entry only free for a very few persons...&gt;Even if they were only presented with a final version of TTIP, the US has been clear that it will not remove restrictions to match EU regulation. I am sure the Senate would be surprised if they saw that included in TTIP, but can guarantee it would not pass regardless of whether people were protesting about it daily or they received a copy they get to evaluate and vote on like they do with a traditional trade agreement.

And we should make sure that our politicians, who are infatuated with neoliberalism and will do as it says even when it hurts, do the same... which leaves only the areas of trade where the EU and USA already have practically identical legislation, which will, effectively, reduce TTIP to something harmless.&gt;No, they will need to use the network, and the network operator can not destinct between data.

It's the location of the provider, not the network, that makes it legal. Regardless, wireless services like telephone would be unaffected.

&gt;No they won't, besides countries like Poland aren't neighbours, we should be focussing more outside Europe.

So because there's one country between you and Poland, that's too far... but countries on other continents are not too far? I don't get that.

&gt;In the medium-long run we'll become some backward ally too, the differnces might be less then, but I don't want that.

Nobody cares much for tiny countries, no matter how advanced. Being small means having trouble defending your interests.
I'd love to see one, because the mythical free market that is going to bring affluence to us all can't exist in a world with physical constraints. It's about as utopian as communism.&gt;What are you talking about? They shouldn't what? Who is "they"?

Can you speak English? Can you read? Then you know that "they" refers to persons, and given that it's a quote from my previous comment, it refers to persons in the comment I replied to.

I've given relevant arguments in the last two comments already that you ignored (not to mention everything else you ignored), why do you insist on sterile metadiscussion?

The discussion is directed by the OP. I don't see why you need need more specific discussion rules; at this point it just seems that you are trying to win on points in some way by invoking procedural errors.
&gt; You jump to a lot of faulty assumptions.

They're not assumptions, I give you the reason why.

&gt;I'm not sexist because I recognize that scumbag guys exist.

You are sexist because you speak about men in general.

&gt;But really it is absurd that you resort to ad hominem attacks and mischaracterizations of my stance.

It's not an ad hominem, I called your assumptions sexist, not you. If you don't have the intention to be sexist, then don't say sexist things.

&gt; When I see a toxic and moronic idea like financial abortions

No wonder that you don't have productive discussions, if you enter them with prejudice and contempt.

&gt; You'll find very few free markets because markets don't exist in a vacuum. 

Which is exactly why I said "I'd love to see one", none have existed so far. It's not achieveable in practice, so claiming that free markets will solve everything is about as productive as claiming that the second coming of Christ will.

&gt;Something as simple as a toy could suffer the same thing if you paint it in lead based paint. The reason for the lack of truly free markets has nothing to do with malicious intent from the government and more to do with markets being very good at some things and not very good at other things.

Completely agree.



I didn't say that was their motivation. Just that the scenario is ridiculously unlikely. Just try to find an example of it in real life. You'd be hard-pressed to find one.&gt; They elected him because he was a dirty commie, not in spite of it.

So they elected a dirty commie to represent one of the main parties of the UK after WW2... you can hardly say he's written off, and even if he was, he isn't anymore.

&gt;As I said before, the Parliamentary Labour Party did not want him to even be in the contest.

The Parliamentary Labour party is not the final arbiter of who is politically relevant.People who are thinking the issue over tend not to comment, so it's a kind of natual selection where only the most sure people make themselves heard.&gt;  And If I may ask, is it an acceptable thing for people to work in unrelated field with their degrees in Belgium or other EU countries?

It's *acceptable*, but you're just part of a rather large pool of people in the same situation. At that point any job and job-related experience will make the difference. But a master in a business-related field will probably be reassuring enough to the average HR recruiter, so you'll be okay.Well, they keep to their own narrow circle: they do just like the Flemish do...&gt;As already said, Turkish state media is ridiculously pro-AKP.

And the others too since they were forced to change their critica stance to a pro-AKP stance...As much as the the cover of a book means to the content.&gt; As if Turkey's candidacy process has not been a complete joke in the past 40 years. 

Turkey can join if they fulfill the acquis communautaire. If Turkey did catch up on legislation and was still refused you'd have a point, but the never catched up to European standards, so why do you expect them to be allowed join? Then entry conditions are quite clear: stop playing the victim and take responsibility.&gt; Turkey has been trying

They haven't, actually. Otherwise they would have caught up with the legislation by now.Certainly a cause worth celebrating.While theoretically interesting because it would better represent the mixed sympathies of an individual voter, in practice that is unworkable eg. when electing a parliament.

In addition, people will get tired of coloring dots and just vote for an entire party to get it over with, or because they're rather close-minded. It would just give the close-minded single-party supporters an edge over those who actually balance their votes over different points of view.&gt;I have been accused of being a misogynist, a misandrist, a racist, and a skeleton warrior. In reality, I am none of these things. I am a normal person who is interested in engaging in conversation with people who think differently than I do. 

Oddly, calling people misogynist, misandrist, racist even when they aren't is exactly what SRS does... and as such they are part of the hate speech problem, not part of the solution.Why do you need a gun in school at all? WTF.If you can't find French media, why would you want to learn French? 

Also, *you can't French media*? Can those people find their pants when getting dressed in the morning?[This picture includes two progressively more detailed versions of this map](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Languages_of_Belgium#/media/File:Languages_Benelux.PNG).They did give some belated recognition by calling it "Brian Reynold's Alien Crossfire", but that was too little too late. Reynolds did end up making some version of farmville for facebook now...Can you reformulate that?Because many people would rather be the top dog in a powerless country than a codecider in a unified continent.[article:Does Europe 
Have Something to 
Offer the World?](http://www.brookings.edu/~/media/research/files/articles/2006/6/summer-europe-boisgrollier/boisgrollier20060525.pdf)&gt; Eu now is layer upon layer of red tape

Stop parrotting that bullshit. The EU has worked wonders to *reduce* red tape in international trade and promote internationally interchangeable standards, to the point of making other countries outside the EU *spontaneously* adapt our standards.&gt;To be fair, some people, including myself, just pick a language and gets to know the media along the way. 

Sure, but barring very obscure languages, there's bound to be some material somewhere on the net.

&gt;Also, dubbed material - and translations of media that you're already familiar with - is often easier to follow, especially when you're listening comprehension is still kind of bad.

IMO it's easier to learn with subtitles, because then you get native speakers, *and* can refer to a translation at any time to compare or for help.
&gt;it is necessary that we determine when 

Well I don't think it's necessary, and you're ignoring a lot of good argument so I consider that silent agreement unless otherwise noted. The whole bloody thread is all about whether it should be a legal possibility, which is about 99% determined by whether it's morally acceptable or not.

&gt;it is morally acceptable to refuse care for a child one has conceived, 

I'll give a couple of counterexamples: - a handicapped person conceives a child - a child is taken away by child protection services and adopted - a child conceived by rape. In none of these three examples would there be an unquestionable obligation to care for a conceived child. A counterexample suffices to disprove a general rule. Therefore, it is not necessarily morally unacceptable to care for a child you conceived.... and you could have figured out my stance on that without your little procedure, and it's frankly ridiculous that you suddenly remember that *now* after we've written approximately five pages of conversation on it. &gt; It's an expression.
&gt;"you can't take that away from her without an assault on her bodily integrity."

Her bodily integrity remains uncompromised. She retains 100% control over what happens with her body, abortion or not.

&gt;&gt;You can't abandon a child you don't have parental responsibilities for.

Why do you ignore this? Abandonment can only happen when you don't care for a child you were responsible for. Men who abstained from parenthood in the abortion window would never be responsible for a child, and therefore could not abandon it... just like you aren't responsible for children dying in Africa right now, or like sperm donors aren't responsible for children conceived with their sperm. Why not? Because they didn't make the decision to take the parental rights and responsibilities upon them, their parent(s) did.

&gt;It does apply. If a woman abandons her partner to single fatherhood, she has to pay child support too.

That's not the same situation. That's at least half a year after the time window for abortion has passed.

&gt;It's much less fair that I have to pay for something I had nothing to do with than that a man has to pay for a decision he let her make. 

The only reason he "let" her make that decision is that the law offers no alternative: so he didn't "let" her make the decision, he was *forced* to let her make the decision. 

&gt;This "equality as equal number of opt-outs" argument is useless since they both get at least one. And he willingly gave her that decision by having sex with her. That's his fault. They all took the risk and it could have happened to any of them, so it's a viable deterrent for that behavior for all of them. 

That argument would apply exactly the same before abortion for women was legal, anyway: "they voluntarily chose to risk pregnancy by having sex, why do they need abortion now? They already got an opt-out! It will be a deterrent against slutty women in the future!" It wasn't a good reason to not change the law then, it's not a good reason now. 

&gt;I'm giving one a chance to opt-out based on the fact that it happens in her body and the other doesn't get one because he makes me pay for his mistakes otherwise. 

So you do want to pay for mistakes women make but not for mistakes men make? That is sexist.

&gt;If he thinks this game isn't fair he shouldn't have played.

If the game isn't fair, we should change the rules.

&gt;And he's not! If he wants to, he can opt out of parenthood, just like anyone.

No, he can't.

&gt;He just has to pay for his mistake so that the rest of us don't have to.

Men have to pay, but women don't? Sexist. Slut-shamer.

&gt;Someone has to support these kids if their parents can't afford to. 

And that may exactly be the reason why that man says "It's not a good idea to engage myself in parental responsibilities now, I'm broke and unemployed. Better abort." Why do you think it's reasonable for you to support women that voluntarily chose to have children they can't care properly for, and to punish men who are wise enough to recognize that and want to have nothing to do with that unresponsible decision?

&gt;A right to support is the highest right of this conversation, make no mistake.

That must be why you balk at it. Except if it's a woman, of course - sexist.

&gt;And what got them to the first trimester relied on his decision. 

On a mutual decision.

&gt;This is not the reason I intend to deny fathers the ability to opt out of child support and your attempt to apply an argument in ways I never invoked it is nothing short of middle-school teasing.

That argument also applies to abortion for women. If you think that's a sufficient argument to deny someone abortion, then you have to deny it to women too, or you're sexist.

&gt;Abandoning your children has a victim; abortion does not.

The right to opt-out would be exercized in the same time window as abortion, there are no children yet, so they can't be abandoned. Abortion for women prevents that their parental responsibilities ever become active (so abortion by women isn't murder), and the same would apply to men (so abortion by men isn't abandonment).

&gt;Oh for Pete's sake, it was an expression. We all like using fun language sometimes.

So do I :p
They're both thermal reactors - glorified steam engines, it's not much different, they only use a different heat source.

What you mean is capacity factor, probably. Or which efficiency do you mean exactly.&gt;When you take someone's cultural identity and make it into a stereotypical costume it becomes clear that you have no real respect or admiration for the culture. You just think it's funny to wear a sombrero.

So, dressing up as a doctor with Halloween is not allowed because it's a show of no respect?

Hiring black musicians should have been banned after the end of slavery because they were just there for entertainment so they were being appropriated by the majority? Let's all stop listening to rap, it's not our culture. Only white Aryan music for whity from now on!Give all women and children bow and arrows. Equal opportunity works!Or Dorne's fabled legions.&gt; Sapkowski's Witcher managed to break through, but the last two parts of saga are only now (after success of the video games) being translated into English despite the fact that they came out in PL in 1997 and 99 respectively.

How many are there in total? I've read two books in Dutch translation, but I don't know if were both intended as parts of a larger saga rather than a collection of loose stories.It's pointless to ask at the interview: you're being evaluated right then and there, and if you're good enough you'll get to experience it yourself or will have time to ask it later; if you're not good enough it's too late anyway for this job, and you can as well ask what made the difference when they let you know you aren't The One.All you need to do is to learn to fake sincerity, and from there on it's all downhill - PR in a nutshell.IMO it's just an exercise in sucking up. If you don't have the job none of them matter. You're under their scrutiny, not the other way around, and if you have enough leverage to be asking them questions you don't need this kind of advice.Been reading it in translation, and avoiding the television series on purpose until the books are finished, or GRR Martin drops dead while watching a football match.&gt;"Doctor" is not a culture, ethnicity, nor cultural identity.

It certainly is an identity, and a group that is considered respectful... and dressing up like them doesn't change that.

&gt;A black person voluntarily rapping and selling it, is not cultural appropriation for a white person to consume.

So you actually think that people should only practice culture that is associated with their own race/ethnicity? You're a racial segregationist.

&gt;The fact that white rappers tend to receive more praise and awards than black rappers, 

Oh yes I get it, like women get more praise for succes than men.

&gt;and some white rappers affect a stereotypical "black accent" when rapping, is cultural appropriation. See the difference?

No, that is as much as saying "rapping is cool and I want to sound like the original cool rappers". It's a compliment. It's really perverted to try to twist that into an act of domination.I definitely agree they had to make some judgment calls. For Limburgish, for example, it really depends on which isoglosses you elevate to the most important ones when determining the border with Brabantian. That's a bit subjective.&gt; Harmonization (not just copying the lowest one) can reduce production costs quite a bit

It can, but then you get to a point where you have so many regulations to maintain and get feedback on that nothing less than a full unified legislative organ will do, and naturally that requires the two other powers too to balance it. It's exactly the same conundrum we had with the EU: at some point interstate treaties are so clunky and unaccountable that you need to upgrade. I don't think the spirits are ripe to hear the idea of the USA joining the EU without choking in their coffee.That's quite a different proposition.Sorry, didn't get that.&gt; Open borders yes.

And that directly contradicts the red tape meme.

&gt;Free marked certainly not. Just look at this small part of Poultry regulation in the EU. http://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/TXT/?uri=celex:32006R0679 Make crappy product, EU say bad you, now we pay you for loss until consumer is happy again.

I agree that's crappy legislation. Show me a governance level that hasn't produced stuff like that. It's no better or worse in that regard than national legislatures. At least there is the potential for abolishing it now without the affected companies threatening the jobs will go to the neighbour countries.Already got one naturally, two more after ca. 8000 gel units. Its rarity is enough to make it survive a bit of lava too.

On a related note, do slimes from statues have the potential to drop the bladed gloves from the Halloween period?Another option is to make wide-range throwables (sticky napalm bombs, or duplicating missiles in spray or swarm form ). That will make them better against bosses since they're big targets, but players are small and don't really care whether the area next to them is hit.

Imagine murdering your owner.Potentially game-breaking, since you can pick your commander for it's enters/leaves the battefield effect.I wonder where this train of thought is going.&gt; I got the job I interviewed for but now I'm having second doubts.

"I was looking for a job and then I found a job, and heaven knows I'm miserable now" - The SmithsHave some patience with foreigners, they don't know better.&gt;Say I work part time over the weekend, freelance work. I would like to declare this in my tax declaration but how much would that be taxed? I'm already at the 50% cap on my normal 8-5 weekday job.

The progressive tax rate is determined based on your total income. If you're already in the 50% cap, your taxation percentage remains the same.

But don't get obsessed with that percentage: to know what percentage you *actually* pay in income tax, use this formula: 100*(*voorheffing* + what you have to pay or get back)/bruto income. That will be less than the daunting 50% percentage, most likely.

But honestly, if you prefer working above doing something with your weekend, what do you need that much money for at all? You won't have time to spend it.

In any case there are different legal options to do that extra work (company, independent, diverse income, etc.), with corresponding different tax obligations and deduction options. Check with an accountant.I also want acces to media that are not "approved by netflix".

Besides, my budget is limited. I use torrents to select which groups I want to see perform live.It's only a temporary setback for your opponents. Either have a land sac outlet (Sylvan safekeeper will also protect him), or good ways to make use of the temporary extra mana. 

Or use with Excavation to tempt them to sacrifice their own lands and run discard :pThat's like saying that lifeguards only should rescue people who aren't drowning.

&gt;The government should always put their citizens first. Taxpayer dollars should always be used to benefit the citizens within its borders and not to the others outside.

It's in the interest of the citizens to have a country that is seen as benevolent, and actively contributing to a safe and prosperous world rather than only serving its narrow self-interest.

In addition, foreign instability and poverty also is a disadvantage to the country: resources from there are more expensive, there are less consumer markets to sell stuff to, and their interests can be threatened by foreign wars and enemies (hello 9/11).

Lastly, the fact that there are still internal problems in the country is not caused by a lack of money but by a failing policy, and the pittance spent on foreign aid, when spent similarly to the rest of the government budget, will not make much of a difference.&gt;UNLESS the child would be impoverished without dad's aid 

Why does that matter at all? If I set up a fake business that defrauds someone for 20% of his income every month, that suddenly doesn't become less criminal because I'm otherwise unemployed and have a child or two.

&gt;Moreover, men incur all the accompanying risks of "sticking their dicks in crazy," including lies about birth control. 

Why does that not apply to "open your legs to crazy"? You're just slut-shaming.

If you really want to do something about child poverty, you would do it through taxation and redistribution. That's much more effectively and doesn't rely on encouraging lying to people and manipulating them.&gt; The child's needs are paramount, far more so than those of the parents. The state has a vested interest in ensuring the child's needs are met by the parents, because when they're not, the state then has to step in. 

Turning it around, everyone involved has an incentive to do what they can to avoid unwanted pregnancies, because they will be on the hook for paying the costs. Curiously, the decision is made by the one party who has the guarantee that someone else will cough up the cost to bear the consequences of that decision. Clearly their is a mismatch between decision power and responsibility.

&gt;Far, far, far more often than the scenario you presented, the situation is that the two of them had sex, either did not use or failed at using birth control, and are both now faced with an unexpected pregnancy. So, how do you propose that the person from your scenario proves that is what happened, as opposed to what I said? 

Proving that you're unwilling to be a parent requires a simple statement. If there is a disagreement, at least one of them lied and that's not a good basis to start parenting anyway.

&gt;When you have sex, you are tacitly accepting the risk of a possible pregnancy, because whether she is on birth control or not there is no birth control that is 100% effective short of a full hysterectomy. 

That does not justify denying abortion to anyone.

&gt;There is no situation in which it is okay for a man to create a child with a woman and then walk away from that child without taking any responsibility for them.

I agree. That's why it should happen in the same time window as abortion.

&gt;They owe that child a hell of a lot more than child support. Children do not ask to be born and regardless of the circumstances surrounding their conception, both parents have a responsibility, not just financially, to ensure they have the best possible upbringing. 

And that includes choosing abortion as the lesser evil when the circumstances aren't favorable.




&gt;SJWs want to ensure that people feel like their presence is equally valid.
Anti-SJWs want to protect their rights to be complete d-bags to people on a regular basis.

Well, IMO SJWs want to feel good in their identity as SJW rather than doing real good. Anti-SJW's are irritated by their moral snobbery and intolerance for breaking the rules SJW are unilaterally creating. People who criticize SJW's may or may not be bigots, but that's not necessarily the same in any case.IMO you seem to have fallen victim of the [hostile media effect](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hostile_media_effect).They're not only anti-SJW, they're actually anti-SJ *tout court*.&gt; And there are plenty of examples of this kind of witch hunt happening, the latest being Tim Hunt. Would you call him a "d-bag" too?

Or Matt Taylor, who became known for his shirt while he should have become known for putting Rosetta on Tsurjumov-Gerasimenko. Ironically and regrettably, this confirmed sexist stereotypes that women are more interested in clothes than in science.&gt; I think most anti-SJWs would agree that we generally shouldn't insult people. The question is whether those who do insult people should be excluded from the discourse.

And whether person A should be bound by by what person B decides to consider insulting..&gt; Can you list some examples on what "toxic" things you have seen there?

The whole premise of the subreddit - quoting people out of context (lots of parody and even outright /s quotes there) and calling them shitlords without giving them the chance to explain themselves - is quite toxic. Quite some of these quotes hint on a relevant consideration, though undiplomatically formulated - but they're selected for their suitability for the 15 minutes of hate, so that's not surprising.srsThen it's just another salary, you'll get another fiche, they'll pay *voorheffing* etc. Not different from what you're doing in your other job.You'd be the first in history to *dance* to The Smiths. They'll do fine if you need musical commiseration though.

For dancing your troubles away, freak out and go for Zappa's *Dancing Fool*.&gt; It does apply to open your legs to crazy. A woman who can support her child on her own without the child living in poverty will not be entitled to support. 

That's wrong. Child support usually is calculated relative to the income of the paying parent, and not capped if the minimal needs of a child are exceeded nor if the parent with the child could afford it without problem.

&gt;The consensus of everyone who knows the story is they hate both parties, but wow, he is an idiot. The consensus is also "damn, I would not want to be that child." Now this was many years ago and she might be able to support the baby today which would end the father's obligation in my universe. (of course she has moved on to a new man). But for awhile that child would have been fucked, or on welfare without the father's aid.

I don't see how that is his fault. His intention clearly never was to father a child. The woman, on the other hand, clearly was not able to support a child - she wasn't even able to support herself. There is no version of the story where she didn't at least deliberately chose *not* to have an abortion, despite her inability to provide for the child. The man clearly recognized that fact and said beforehand that he didn't want a child. Why should he be responsible for a child he didn't choose to have?

&gt;And I don't see why a child should get welfare if his dad makes good money. 

It's not his dad. It's his sperm donor.

&gt;I would allow exemptions for condom sabotage situations, but NOT lies about birth control. 

I don't see the difference.

&gt;Holding a guy semi responsible for not doing his due diligence and being a good judge of character is not as bad as letting a child be poor. 

And why is holding a woman responsible for fraud and careless life decisions not among the options?

&gt; But I think certain sectors of the economy could be harmonized.

Of course they could, but then we'll have to either forbid each other from changing our standards without consulting each other, or to have an organ that can do so smoothly. The first is stifling for democratic decision making *and* encourages a race to the bottom in the competition for attracting companies, the latter is effectively creating some kind of American-European Union.

&gt;So harmonization here would fix a very lopsided regulatory environment that is very profitable for European banks right now

I agree that the banking sector requires a lot of fixing still, but there are Ameican laws that require fixing too. There's no predicting whather we'll get the best or the worst of both worlds, it'll be hard to improve later anyway, and if it's done by mutual recognition we'll be guaranteed to get the worst of both worlds...The advent of the internet should have solved that problem. Even ignoring digital content, amazon.fr also delivers outside France.&gt; "doctor" is not a culture. There's nothing of significance to doctors that you are disrespecting by dressing up as one for halloween. 

If dressing up as x is disrespectful, then I don't see how that's different.

&gt;No. that's not at all what I said.

Why yes, since otherwise they're *appropriating* and that's bad for some reason. 

&gt;This is actually False.

There are plenty of people who will either praise or minimize eg. someone's successful business that they built depending on which gender the person has.

&gt;It's not a compliment, that's like saying that someone who adopts a fake spanish accent, puts on a sombrero starts a mariachi band is a compliment to mexican people. They can rap without using a stereotypical fake accent.

People who learn French strive to imitate the French accent properly because they love the language. That is a compliment. You cannot forbid someone to try to adopt a certain style because he's of a the "wrong" race. That is racial discrimination by definition.

What harm does cross-racial spread of behaviours do, anyway? Why are you against cultural exchange, and blurring the boundaries between races?&gt; Growing up around a lot of black people != growing up dealing with societal discrimination and oppression as a result of the color of your skin. 

By that reason black people who grew up in stable middle-class families aren't allowed to use it either, and white trailer trash is. But of course that's much harder to project prejudice because the target of your outrage isn't color-coded for convenience anymore.&gt; I'm saying that it's perfectly fine for a white person to rap, but engaging in stereotypes to do so, or appropriating culture rather than using their own is what is racist. 

I think it's extremely racist to forbid people to use certain cultural expressions based on their race.I agree that would be a different way to address the concern, as that, too, would reduce the unconditional power of the woman to force the consequences of her decision on the man.

Still, it doesn't address the fundamental injustice and inequality of rights, just reduces it.

In addition it would give a perverse incentive in that men would be suspicious of poor women to form relationships with, and that women would end up in poverty trap where they wouldn't gain much by becoming employed, since they would lose even more benefits than they do now.&gt;It is absolutely necessary. Financial abortion will result, in some cases, in refusing to provide for children you conceived. Therefore, to determine when financial abortion is acceptable, we need to also determine when it is acceptable to refuse to provide care for children you have conceived, and see if those cases overlap.

And then we're right back where we started, trying to determine whether financial abortion is acceptable.

&gt;It is impossible to have an argument about something if both parties don't know what the argument is about.

The practice often named "financial abortion" in this subreddit.

&gt;I see you are not reading the posts I made recently. I have NOT claimed that it is necessarily morally unacceptable to refuse care for a child one has conceieved. 

Well, then you could have answered your own question. Why bother?

&gt;The reason to make this clarification is so that you can stop mentioning irrelevant cases of people refusing to care for a fetus.

So as I expected, you're just trying to make a procedural case to exclude an argument that you don't have a good counterargument against.

It's not irrelevant. Abortion is not murder because a foetus is not a person, the parents have no parental obligations towards it, and therefore cannot be murdered nor abandoned... just like eggs or sperm cannot be murdered or abandoned.

If you're judging a man to abandon something that could become a child, then you should judge the woman too for abandoning the very same thing, and then abortion should be considered murder or at least abandonment too.&gt; If your plan will bring more children into this world with only one parent, I don't support it. Children need support. That priority is number one.

That's the woman's plan in that case. I don't see why people who explicitly disagree with that plan should be responsible for the consequences.

&gt;It's exactly the same situation, with a four-month deficit. You are whining about four measly months.

That's not a sufficient argument to deny women abortion either.

&gt;It allows the alternative of not having sex with people you don't trust.

That's not a sufficient argument to deny women abortion either.

&gt;Again, this isn't an argument in itself. It's a counter-argument to your claims, not the reason I favor denying men this legal ability. Abortion is OK because there's no victim. Leaving a child with one parent has a victim and I'm not OK with that.

No one is leaving a child, just like abortion is not murdering a child. What happens with the foetus afterwards is at the discretion of the woman. Why do you think a woman isn't capable of bearing the consequences of her own decision alone?

&gt;&gt;So you do want to pay for mistakes women make but not for mistakes men make?
&gt;When did I say that? If they have the kid they're paying for it, and if they get an abortion they're paying for that too. I'm not paying for any of this.

You agree to support single mothers even if they willingly chose to go on with a pregnancy in absence of a father for the child. You don't agree to support men who don't even willingly chose to have a child.

&gt;If there's a kid, they both have to pay. Where are you getting these complete lies about my position?

Women get to decide whether there's a kid at all. They have the opportunity to opt out of paying. Men don't.

&gt;Grow up.

Stop slut-shaming people.

&gt;I would support tying child support to the ability of the parent to pay. 

That's a big change from the current situation already. It would address some concerns, but not the fundamental ones. For example, it would be an improvement for men who want to opt out of parenthood precisely because they would feel obligated to care for the child as good as they can, much more than just paying child support, but just don't think it's a good time to start parenting.

In addition, it's inconsistent with your position that it's for the good of a child: those children still wouldn't get what they need.

&gt;Since when am I supporting these women and not these men? 

Because you give them the power to force other people to support their decisions, willing or not.

&gt;Single parents, regardless of gender, get money from the non-custodial parent. That's not sexist.

And they should, but if those people opted out in time, they would not have the rights nor responsibilities of a parent.

&gt;Apparently you still don't get this: this isn't the reason in itself. It's a counterargument against your arguments, and therefore this attempt to turn it back on me and make me anti-abortion is crappy logic. 

I don't see how it's a valid counterargument. If four months don't make a difference for men, they don't make a difference for women either. You cannot use this particular counterargument without being inconsistent.

&gt;If there wasn't a victim involved (like abortion) I would have no problem allowing men this right, but there is.

There is no victim of the man's decision, just like abortion has no victim. If the pregnancy continues, that was a decision by the woman. The child is her victim then.

&gt;Right, but if she says no, then there is a kid,

That's her decision.

&gt;and he has only one parent providing support. That's the victim.Or, potentially, if I have to pick up the tab, the victim is me.

The victim of the woman's decision. Even if we would still force the man or society to fund that decision (for the sake of the child), then either one should be able to sue that woman for damages equal to the paid child support.But they don't have the accent, and they don't grew up in the hood being gang members.. so they're appropriating that situation.So wearing a sombrero and playing in a mariachi band is a cultural expression derived from a shared experience of oppression and discrimination? What are you smoking?The utilitarian solution to solve child poverty is to provide unconditional support to every single child, not trying to trap people into paying for some specific children.&gt; I can see where you're coming from. I would assume there would be an "adoption" principle. For instance at the signing regulations would be harmonized but if safety standards changed in one jurisdiction the other would have to adopt them.

If everyone was forced to adopt the most strict standard, then it would actually be a big improvement. That doesn't seem to  be the plan, however.

&gt;Likely their would be a "best efforts" clause that they would work together but virtually every trade deal has a "health and safety" clause that permits regulations regarding health and safety even if they conflict with the treaty. 

But it also has safeguarding the interests of companies against governments as basic premise, and when those two conflict, there has to be some interpretation about the definitions and which takes precedence. Enter ISDS - and that's another reason to be wary of the treaty.&gt;Austerity in the UK was significantly less than austerity imposed by the fiscal compact.

But still rather high when compared to other European states. The austerity idea is present across Europe, not just in the Eurozone.

&gt;The exact problems that the euro is facing were discussed in the British parliament in the 90s, during the Maastricht negotiations. This is unsurprising because Britain had experienced the exact same problem that peripheral eurozone is currently experiencing, of being tied to a currency it could not keep up with in the 90s.

And it would have been beneficial if people weren't *expecting* the UK to be difficult by then, so they wouldn't have been able to write it off as the usual British uncooperativeness.The goal for that specifically was to solve child poverty. 

The goal of financial abortion is to have better balanced personal rights and responsibilities, which includes making sure that the people who decide to make children bear the consequences of it. To preserve that, it would be necessary to avoid making exceptions for poor women, given that those are a large part of the irresponsible pregnancies.&gt; The missiles are made in the USA, yes, but they're under our control. If we didn't buy any more from the USA we could develop our own. Granted it would be expensive, but that's not an issue for a nuclear deterrent. 

The same applies to basic stuff like ammunition and logistic support for army operations. Which makes sense, mind you, in military conflicts the advantage of scale is crucial. Still, independence is highly theoretical under that structure.

&gt;As for Scotland. There was a referendum and the out campaign lost. Independence isn't under evaluation. Only when another referendum is set would there be any doubt. 

And if you ask the SNP they'll be scheduling it ASAP.&gt; But the courts have and done repeatedly... The point here being that the EU is not at liberty to define it's own competencies or to interpret them as it sees fit.

But neither are national governments. They, too, face rebukement by EU courts if they try to usurp any competences. That proves that they're on equal footing in that regard.

&gt;I don't think people will be (I don't think we'll have a federal state..), but you keep suggesting that it is both inevitable and entirely possible and valid without oversight or the objections of individual member states... 

The EU is not a group of independent states, nor a federal state. It's an Unidentified Political Object sui generis, so far, and will remain so for a good deal longer. It's up to political scientists to find a name for it afterwards, and I'm perfectly fine with that. 

What I think *is* inevitable is an increase in cooperation, uniformization and enlargement of scale in Europe, centered on the EU as primary institution. Of course there will be plenty of objections, delays and changes of pace along the way, but the advantages and opportunities are simply too large to stop or reverse the process for the foreseeable future.The weak version of control of one's own parenthood would be satisfied as the man isn't forced to take up responsibility for a child he didn't want. The strong version would also require consent for use of his genetic material, and lacking that nobody should be able to use it to create a child. However, forcing a woman to abort still clearly isn't something we should be able to impose by law under any circumstance that is not a science fiction horror scenario, so the most severe consequences of that act even under the strong interpretation would be a lawsuit for moral damage.

Arguably a child conceived under those circumstances should be removed from the influence from the female parent ASAP by child protection services anyway... in the interest of the child, and to discourage such acts from happening (in both the strong and weak version). That's the happy ending.It's like watching porn compared to sex. You need to feel the weight and smell the texture under your hands.Then I didn't miss one by logging off,  that's a reassurance :)*Everything* has specific significance to a culture, or it's not even part of it. 

By that reasoning, a European reading the bible is *appropriating* Jewish culture. That means Christianity should be forbidden as it's cultural appropriation from top to bottom. Using E=mc\u00b2 is appropriating Jewish culture too! Europeans using it are oppressing the Jews, they should only use Aryan science! Are you playing/appropriating a piece by Mendelssohn? NAZI!

All kidding aside: that's how culture works. Reassembling bits and pieces of various sources into something new. It works both ways: for example voodoo, santeria and similar syncretic religions smash together all kinds of elements from native African, American and christian sources into something *weird* that would not be approved by the religious authorities of either of the sources... and those can keep practicing what they want, they don't lose that.  People should be free to do that.&gt; For a large portion of the population, choosing abortion will never be the lesser evil. Its essentially making the woman choose between something that is morally abhorant to her, or live in poverty, because the father wasn't responsible.

Everyone is responsible for the problems caused by the moral limitations he or she chooses to follow. If you think not having an abortion is morally necessary, then you'll gladly suffer poverty for it. It's not the man's duty to follow or subsidize the religious choices of his sex partners. 

Ideally people discuss all these issues at length before doing their two-person saucy hotdog act, but we don't live in an ideal world: sometimes that doesn't happen and at that point it's less relevant whether the conflict originated by omission, lying or obliviousness, especially since it would be practically impossible to prove guilt anyway. It's much simpler to adapt the same unilateral right women now already have, for men as well.

&gt;Yes birth control fails, but if the man wasn't using any birth control at all why would anyone reasonably believe that he didn't want a child?

Plenty of couples only use the pill because it feels better without condom. Surely that's questionable judgement, but it's far from uncommon.
Really, really wonderful. Are both types of hardmode ores being generated when smashing altars?

Also, really looking forward to playing in a world with huge water-filled caverns and tunnels :)

This really is what the game needed to stay fresh... Exploration is more fun than farming stuff IMO."Surely, anyone not joining the circlejerk that the newest gadget is necessarily superior in every aspect to anything that came before must be a troglodyte digiphobe that can't handle modernity."Child support is calculated based on the man's income, not on what the child or woman needs. So the income level of the woman doesn't really matter.&gt;In this case, the man has decided not to use birth control.

Nonsense, it's a joint decision.

&gt;Someone who decides to forgo their only option of birth control doesn't sound to me like someone who is that worried about having a kid.

We don't deny abortion to women for that reason either, and rightly so.
That +80k was the additional profit companies would pocket on average, not the job increase :pIt's a lot less impressive if you actualy correct for the fact that we were in an economic crisis then and in an economic recovery now.Certainly worth celebrating.They need a cream pie to the face.Nobody cares about your opinion, serf.I don't see why we shouldn't be able to afford a few years more after about a century of unprecedented productivity increases. It's just a political choice. That being said, everyone benefits from paid free time, not just pensioners.

At some point people just stop being able to work with the expected productivity though... and that's the primary function of pension. And do know that healthy years lived have not increased as much as total years lived.The problem with capitalism is that the people that you refuse to pay properly will not be able to buy your products.You make the common mistake of reducing democracy to majority vote. Democracy also requires respecting civil rights, freedom of the press, etc. An absolute monarchy that respects all human rights insofar that is possible without elections is closer to a democracy than an elected ISIS junta that tramples all over them.

&gt;Singapore and HK, two of the best societies on earth, are far from liberal democracies...and yet Europeans, Americans, and Aussies flock to them.

"Best"? That's just your opinion. Besides, they're both trading hubs, relying on the surplus of other places to remain prosperous. They're highly exceptional and statistical outliers. In Europe, Monaco plays pretty much the same role as tax haven for the rich insofar it's not part of France, and an absolutist monarchy like Liechtenstein isn't doing spectacularly well.&gt; I honestly feel like its 200 people who are engineers trying to build one machine.

You're making the wrong analogy: engineers get an order to build something and they execute the order as efficiently as possible. They don't decide *what* to do, and they don't decide what *efficient* means. Efficient means using as little of a resource as possible, but what resource? Time? Money? Whose money?

A better analogy would be the writing of an OS... except the computer it runs on cannot be turned off, the OS has to be kept running at all times, there is only one computer, and all resources you have (including the computer's power supply and the paycheck of the programmers and all users) are run by that computer. On top of that, the users change opinion daily about what they want the program to do. Software engineers wouldn't be able to handle that better.&gt; Pretty soon we will lose rights to our arms.

Surely a dictator won't allow you to have arms either, unless you join their death squads.&gt; And on top of that they are required to represent the people and listen to the people. 

Then it's not a dictatorship.I took the liberty to use a synaesthetic description.&gt; This makes no sense. I've already pointed out that reading, listening to, or enjoying something is not "appropriating culture". A white person listening to rap is not cultural appropriation. I know you were just joking/kidding, but this facetiousness just shows a complete misunderstanding of everything i'm saying.

Surely taking a Judaist text and founding a different religion on it is appropriation because it's clearly not intended to support that religion. Likewise, a white person rapping is using cultural forms that are associated with the black community, so it's appropriation. I can't see why not.

&gt;There's a huge difference between reassembling bits and pieces of various sources into something new, and appropriating something outside of it's meaning and significance. 

No, it's not. Please explain why.

&gt;As you pointed out, Voodoo, santeria, etc. are examples of cultures that were smashed together to form new things from others. However, this happened over decades and centuries to form those entirely new and distinct cultures.

And that didn't happen by a century long committee meeting, it started with an African slave deciding to sacrifice a chicken to Saint Anthony and splashing the blood on a statuette of him... which clearly is appropriating the culture of christianity in ways that disrespects the original religion and would horrify its practicitioners.

&gt;And they didn't form by imitating existing cultures and stripping them of their cultural significance. 

Yes, they did. They copied the superficial forms and fit them into their own frame of reference.

&gt;They grew by forming new cultural significance upon new things. They are influenced by those other cultures, not copies of them.

Define me clearly where the difference lies. I'll get the popcorn.

&gt;A white person developing an entirely new style of music which draws influences from Rock/Rap/Country music, is not cultural appropriation that's the culture they live in. A white person specifically utilizing Rap in a fake accent of a stereotypical black person "from the hood" or whatnot is cultural appropriation.

That white person is just starting to develop his own style. You can't draw a line where one style ends and another one starts. I don't see why a non-Jewish violinist playing a Mendelssohn piece would be appropriating Jewish culture - or why Mendelssohn composing in the European tradition would be appropriating that, for that matter.

&gt;It's like a white person who gets face paint of a sugar skull because it "looks cool". That's not adapting culture, mashing elements of culture together, appreciating, or joining in. 

Of course it is. Why wouldn't it be?That's a risk of doing business. Regulatory environments change all the time, and governments are responsible only to the citizens of that country only. If I get a job under the assumption that the income tax is 50%, then I wouldn't get a compensation either if the government were to raise taxes to 51%. If the government makes the fire safety laws more strict, then companies have to provide more fire safety as the law says, even if that requires more investment.

Besides, I don't see why national courts wouldn't be sufficient for those cases.

&gt;That said, Netflix would most likely rather sue in national courts so it could have the law invalidated as opposed to a monetary award it would get in arbitration. 

Why should we pay money to corporations to change our own laws? Do they own us? Fuck that corporate feudalism. We do not need to beg for permission from the corporate nobility to change our own laws.&gt; You guys love to pretend that women don't pay to raise their children.

No, you're reading things into it that aren't there.

&gt;. The average child support payment in this country is less than $300 a month. That does not make a dent in raising a child.

Then why insist on it?

&gt; So stop pretending women are pumping out kids so they can live high on the hog, because it's a bullshit LIE. 

Nobody is, you're fighting a straw man. The fact is that women decide alone whether an abortion happens or not, and the man is forced to bear the consequences of that decision, either by subsidizing it or by 

&gt;Proving that you were "tricked", proving that they told you they were on birth control, that isn't as easy as just saying it.

And that's why we don't even require it, and just give people one last chance to make up their mind about parenthood and make a decision either way. We already allow women to do that (we don't require a motivation for abortion, it's 100% her discretionary decision), we should allow men the same.

&gt;A statement is not evidence of anything.

Of course it is.

&gt;If you want something legal, you need more than just your word, sorry.

Plenty of legal actions require a simple statement.

&gt;And again, if you don't want to be a parent, the onus is on YOU to ensure it doesn't happen. Not on her. YOU.

And a man should be allowed to do so by opting out in the time window of abortion, just like women are.

&gt;And no one was talking about abortion, so I don't even know what you're on about there. This conversation is about child support.

No, it's not. You're again misrepresenting the issue. If you read the content of the OP rather than just the title, that becomes immediately clear.&gt; Don't you get it? Pensions are getting too expensive, where do you think you'll get the money from? Borrowing, adding more to the state debt? Abolishing the rest of social security and using the full budget for the pensions only?

Like I said, we have had a century or two of completely unprecedented productivity increases. Reducing pensions to what we could afford in 1889 is simply absurd. Let's reintroduce child labor too then, if that is to be the standard.

&gt;For once I'd like to see an alternative that is not "hurr tax the rich".

For once I'd like to see an alternative that is "hurr reduce taxes on the rich". Besides, we don't tax the rich people, we tax money. And the rich have most of the money, so they should pay most of the taxes. That's only logical.&gt; Because they gave her the ability to make that choice, that's why.

She only has the ability because the law is that way. We are discussing whether the law should be changed.

&gt;Of course it isn't, and I never said it was.

So, give a sufficient argument then.

&gt;Single parenthood means someone left a child. Or died.

No, single parenthood can also mean that a single person voluntarily opted to create a child fully aware of the fact that the sperm donor was not going to take up parental responsibility.

&gt;I'm sure many are, but not all, and it's not the best option. 

So you think some women aren't capable of making decisions about their own life, and yet you want them to have the power to make decisions not only about their own life, but also about someone else's life?

&gt;Raising a child should be a two-parent deal.

Preferably: tell that to the woman who decided on her own to have a child. The man isn't going to be involved anyway, a child support check is not a parent (a significant part of which aren't paid, or only with delay anyway).

&gt; Single parenthood should not be incentivized

But you're doing exactly that by ensuring that the only person who decides about that is subsidized by someone else.

&gt;and I'm not paying for someone who decided he didn't want to be the father of his biological children.

You're paying for single mothers who decided they wanted a child as a single parent still, by the normal means of support for single mothers.

&gt;Yes I do. If a woman abandons her child to a single father, she has to pay child support. The non-custodial parent pays child support regardless of gender.

This is not child abandonment. There never is parental responsibility if it is refused in the prescribed timeframe, just like a woman who has an abortion doesn't start being responsible for murder or child abandonment six months after the abortion.

&gt;First of all, yes, men do, by not having sex with people they don't trust. 

So do women. That is not a sufficient reason to deny abortion rights.

&gt;Secondly, if there's a child, they both pay. It's not all him.

It's all her decision. Why should he pay for someone elses's decision?

&gt;I'm doing no such thing. This is immature name-calling, plain and simple.

You're constantly insisting that men should choose not to have sex as an alternative, and that having sex is a mistake. How is that not slutshaming?

&gt;I'd be willing to pay child support out of public funds for people who literally can't. I'm not in this to bankrupt people. But if you can and just don't want to, I'm not paying for your mistakes.

Then you would be paying for the mistake of the woman to have a child she can't pay properly for. Why do you tolerate that mistake of women - who did have the right to opt out and didn't even use that chance - and not that of a man - who doesn't even have the chance to opt out?

&gt;If they agreed to sex. Know your partner. It's not like we're springing this on a complete stranger who didn't do anything to deserve it.

Having sex is not a crime that deserves punishment, slutshamer.

&gt;You still don't understand the logic here. 

I disagree with it.

&gt;Four months are not a valid reason to scrap child support, which exists for other, compelling reasons.

Child support exists as an alternative, minimal way to fulfill parental duties when actual presence becomes impossible for some reason. People who never had parental duties also don't need to pay child support.

&gt;That he let her make

Only because the law leaves no alternative. We are debating to change the law.

&gt;Again, if he doesn't like the game, he can not play.

That's not a good reason to deny abortion to women either... slutshamer.&gt; Good, so you concede that to determine the moral acceptability of financial abortion, we also need to determine the moral responsibility of refusing care for a child one has conceived.

No, I don't concede that because I've never argued otherwise. In fact, I have been arguing that there is no absolute moral responsibility to care for genetic offspring right from the very start in this debate because it's a logical necessity for the whole proposition of financial abortion. Stop wasting time.

&gt;Exactly, and you don't seem to understand what it means because you cannot understand the difference between refusing to care for a child one has conceived and refusing to care for a fetus one has conceived.

You cannot seem to understand the difference between someone not understanding and not agreeing with your position.

&gt;Even if we agree that "it is not necessarily morally unacceptable to refuse care for a child one has conceived", we still need to determine when it is morally unacceptable or acceptable.

Stop wanking and get on with it then.

&gt;bortion does not result in refusal to care for a living child one has conceived.

There is no absolute duty to care for genetic offspring.

&gt; In the case of financial abortion, there are actual living children that do not receieve care from at least one parent.

Wrong. In that case they just have one parent, the mother.

&gt; If financial abortion were acceptable, then it should be easy to show that its a morally acceptable instance of refusing to care for a child one has conceived.

As I've been doing all the time. So go back a comment or ten when you started your exercise in narcissism and finally start answering my arguments that you keep ignoring.&gt; Which ones? 

[Graph for comparison](http://interactive.guim.co.uk/2015/apr/krugman-3/assets-1430318426541/imgs/chart-2.svg)

&gt;Personally I prefer the extent of austerity to be something that we discuss in our elections, not something that is now effectively off the table (as it is in the eurozone). Perhaps you prefer the latter.

The illusion of choice is strong. Austerity is an idea that has taken root in the political class as a whole somehow. Take for example Denmark, where both the left-oriented and the right-oriented governments applied austerity. This is more fundamental than party choice: it's an ideological bias that is present across the whole continent, starting from the fall of the Iron Curtain.&gt; And that is far more complex, harder to achieve and more of a problem in an EU context. It is vastly easier to do at a national level.

But you can still do so at national level, and also enjoy support and the experience of other groups in other nations. For example, you can exchange information with other groups instead of reinventing the wheel in every nation again.

&gt;They don't have to compromise on the international stage on the vast majority of things.

Please wake up to reality. At the very least a simple minor treaty would require 28 countries to agree rather than a simple parliamentary decision, with or without qualified majority.

&gt; If anything the EU seems to push for pan-EU compromise where it is unnecessary... It isn't relevant to the Polish or German governments whether someone in the UK is seen by a doctor or a nurse...

About as relevant to London whether someone in Bristol is seen by a doctor or a nurse.

Besides, the Polish and German governments are only involved because we still use the clunky and indirect decisionmaking of involving national governments in too many policy areas of the EU. They wouldn't be involved if the EU became less a gathering of national states and more a mature political government level.

&gt;Which is a good thing, not a bad thing. There isn't any need for the whole world to come to the same point... There is value in diversity and showing that things work and that things don't have to be shit..

Europe is not the world, it's projected to fall back to 6% of world population.

&gt;The UK has multiple levels of government, if there was demand for it to be split up it would (but there isn't at present..).

That's circular reasoning. If you want to bring government closer to the people and political division is the way to do it, then you should support political division in your own country too. If not, then you're inconsistent and opportunistic and I can't take that argument seriously then.

&gt;No, it isn't inevitable and frankly it is optional. 

A larger unit is better able to represent the interests of its citizens on the world stage.

&gt;Without the support of everyone in all of those regions it isn't possible, and would face significant political (and probably other..) opposition if it were pushed without that consent..

It's not going to be pushed without consent. Stop that rape fantasy.
&gt;We live longer and healthier while working easier and safer jobs, it's only more than logical we increase the pension age.

It's only logical if you think it's a bad thing that social standards increase. I would agree if it was a rebalancing of the career across the whole lifetime, but as it is it will just mean squeezing more labor from the same workforce.

In addition, it doesn't take into account that a longer life expectancy doesn't necessarily mean a longer healthy life expectancy. People of 70 aren't capable of performing the same labor as those of 30, and they're sick and/or disabled more often to boot. At the very least we have to reduce the working hours for aging people if you want to keep them working for longer. 

&gt;In the current system there's no alternative.

The current system is very rigid, no miracle that it doesn't allow alternatives. Reason enough to change and adapt it.

&gt;You can also adopt my system of course, where everyone is responsible for his/her own pension. Then you can decide when you take up your own pension yourself.

Pff, then only people who didn't need it anyway will have a decent pension. That's just an intentional application of the mattheuseffect.

&gt;We didn't reduce taxes for the rich, we reduced them for lower and middle class. 

... and then reduced their wages and increased their cost of living, with as result that the spending power of most people is reduced. Half of the tax cut on wages went to company owners, mind that.

&gt;No, we tax wages and consumation. (Rich people indeed already pay the most taxes as they have the highest wages and consume the most.)

So by definition not the rich, because the rich have incomes from ownership concentrated into very few hands, so their consumption taxes are trivial - if they don't consume in their foreign villas to start with.

&gt;No need to invent new taxes.

We don't need to invent new taxes, we simply need to tax income from ownership at exactly the same rate as income from work. right now income from work is still much more severely taxed than other sources of income, especially ownership. Simply doing that as a tax shift while keeping total income stable would already create so much more jobs, and it would keep the living standards intact. This government missed the chance to tax every form of income equally, but it was to be expected that they would exempt the rich.

The university you'll attend most likely has some kind of social service to help people in situations like yours. Contact them and see what they can offer, be it a reduced fee for the education, cheap housing or a job that doesn't interfere with your lessons.

In capitalism, you are paid as much the person with the most money considers acceptable... because that person can outwait the others until they start to starve, ultimately.

The free market can only work if participation is really free, i.e. not compulsory to make a living.&gt;  I'm not going to be celebrating if it's just his turn to suffer instead.

His turn to suffer never really ended, did it?&gt;The popular opinion in the West is that chopsticks are primitive and inferior to the fork, but I believe it to be the complete opposite. In this post, I will be talking about Japanese chopsticks in particular; the only difference with their Chinese counterparts is that they are pointier, thus more precise. Flat heads on chopsticks just seem illogical and impractical. 

That's a lot of chopsticks though. At the very least most of China disagrees with you.

&gt;Chopsticks are harder to master but are more versatile than the fork when fully mastered. I believe that anybody who doesn't think so is most likely not skilful enough with chopsticks to see it, unless I get proven otherwise. Anybody who thinks that using chopsticks is tiring for the hand or for the mind, or who cannot use chopsticks as naturally as extensions of their fingers have not fully mastered their use yet and are thus not capable of accurately measuring the actual value of chopsticks compared to their primitive and easy-to-use cousins in an unbiased way. Please remember, failure to master something is not an argument to its inferiority. 

"Being harder to master", however, is.

&gt;I believe that forks are primitive mainly in the action of stabbing the food to eat it.

Clearly you haven't mastered the art of eating with knife and fork if you think the fork is limited to stabbing. The fork is quite versatile: it can be used to stab if you really need a good grip, but the most frequent use is to shove it under the food, bringing it where you want. It can be used for any size of food, as opposed to sticks. It can be used to flatten food or divide it into pieces, to precisely crush something if necessary (say, a lightly boiled egg) or open crustaceans and shellfish... Those possibilities are amplified when the knife is added. It's even easily possible to recover some of the sauce on a plate in a pinch.

&gt;As for cutting your food: though you can cut most foods relatively easily with chopsticks (if it's not easy for you then you haven't fully mastered the use of chopsticks, sorry), some harder foods such as red meat will require a knife. I do not see that as a problem in itself or as a proof of any kind of inferiority of the chopsticks: the chef just needs to cut the food in smaller pieces before serving it. It's just part of the preparation. In fact, why should you need to bother cutting your food while eating it when it can be done during preparation? You will never (Edit: relatively not very often) see a huge lump of meat on its own served in Asian dishes and I see nothing wrong with that fact. 

Alas, that means the use of chopsticks is much more limited... to cut up foods only. A moelleux, lightly boiled egg or delicately roasted juicy steak simply aren't the same when they appear cut up on the plate. Opening up these delightful foods and be confronted with a sudden surge of odor and taste and flowing juices is an essential part of the experience, which simply cannot be replicated with sticks.

On the other side of the food quality chain, it allows for more flexible dinner arrangements where food services are constrained - the absolutely necessary cooking happens in the kitchen, the final preparations on your plate, exactly tailored to your wishes.



I don't see how that would need banning - even if it was wrong. Link?Ceremonial monarchy/aristocracy is quite different from a real one. Fundamentally different, even. No monarchs spontaneously delegated their power before the Revolution, so that was necessary to arrive at that point IMO.The Lorelei actually, it's the German variant.No. Their self-interest.&gt; If a country guarantees a specific environment

They didn't. They're just changing laws. Naturally specific *contracts* have to be honoured, but a state is not legally allowed to put specific legislation up for sale in a contract.

&gt;That is why companies are reluctant to invest in places like Russia or Venezuela.

Indeed, and rightly so. If a state does that its reputation goes to the shitter quite quickly, so that's enough of an incentive... Are you telling me that the EU and USA have a reputation similar to Russia and Venezuela, so we need this ISDS to repair it?

&gt;This might not be an issue in the UK or Germany, but I am not sure a company would get a fair trial in some of the newer EU states or those looking into membership. The quality of the curt systems within the EU varies by quite a bit. 

That's why we have European courts. If those aren't good enough, ISDS isn't going to be an improvement.
&gt;Right, I'd like to listen to their view on how and why a flat head could possibly be better than a pointed one, I really can't find anything. 

I have no idea, but they seem to prefer it.

&gt;In the next episode of CMV: Being harder to master isn't a proof of inferiority when there are benefits to mastering the skill (exercising the brain, good manoeuvrability, etc.).

All else being equal, it's disadvantage. That may or may not be compensated by corresponding redeeming advantages.

&gt;Frequent when held in one hand of course, not when it is in its more frequent use, paired with a knife, since that goes against etiquette. Though maybe it's different in America? I don't know. Where I am you're supposed to keep the tines down and not shift the fork between your hands. Which is of course inconvenient when you want to eat peas, you have to squish the damn things on the tines with the help of your knife, lol.

Mmm, it seems the etiquette they taught you prevents you from employing the fork and knife combination to its full potential. Under that severe constraint, I can see where you're coming from. It's not inherent to the utensil, though.

&gt;Hmmmm, I can agree with a nice juicy steak... But wait, a soft boiled egg? How do you eat that with a fork? I always put it in an egg holder and eat it with a tea spoon, I thought everybody did that.

On occasion they are served peeled but gooey inside. Perhaps a humble sunny side up egg is a more common example: it's not possible to serve it cut up, as that would not be the same dish, and cutting up the gooey yolk right before it solidifies entirely is really part of the experience.&gt;...which they do, at an alarming rate. But sure, stick your head in the sand and practice what the left does best; ostrich politics.

It's not alarming, it will be a shift in expenses of a few percent of GDP. Signficant, but not a disaster. If we can find billions to cut taxes we can also find billions to handle the extra costs. Most of the extra costs of the demographic shift called the *vergrijzing* are healthcare costs, anyway: pensions and pension age realy don't have that much impact on it.

&gt;When the state doesn't need to pay pensions anymore, the taxes could be lowered drastic. This leaves more money for people to save up for their pension.

It only leaves more money for people who already have more money and were safe in their pension age already. The other ones will just become poor in their old age. It won't also make a damn difference on the state budget, as the state wouldn't receive pension contributions anymore either. Those would just be paid to private funds - who also need to profit from it, so they'll be more expensive... so the people will not gain anything, the differences between pensions will just increase, the people who already made a lot of money in their career will have fat pensions, the ones that didn't have the opportunity will get even poorer.

&gt;Nobody's wage got lowered, Pinocchio.

The index jump effectively lowered everyone's buying power with 2%.

&gt;Most of which can be evaded by changing one's lifestyle. But I have to admit, I myself am not happy with some of the increased costs. But you can't lower taxation on labour without compensating this with something else. 

They chose to take the money from all people by consumption taxes, which weigh most heavily on middle class and poor, and then gave half of it back to company owners by reducing the employer contributions, instead of reducing income tax for everyone. That came on top of the index jump, which also reduces the buying power of employees to reduce the cost for employers. So that's a transfer of wealth from everyone to company owners.

&gt;So it's either taxes on consumation, more budget cuts in social security or adding it with our already huge state debt. Since #2 is also a horror scenario for you, I assume you'd go for option 3 and fuck the future generations.

I'd tax all income at the same tax rate, whether it's income from work or from ownership or other sources. That would be an administrative simplification too.

&gt;Correction, it went to companies, there's a difference. 

Those profits don't go the employees, you know.

&gt;That's a necessairy measure to keep our economy competitive and create new jobs.

No, it isn't. Labor should not be disproportionally highly taxed, but they could just as well have reduced the income tax for everyone rather than the contributions of employers. That was a deliberate choice.

&gt;If you want to trash your economy, that's indeed the best thing you can do. Taxing stocks and (real) estate at 40%+ rates, that's how you'll get every company that has the means to move, out of the country, and I'd probably migrate as well. Good luck funding your pensions in the People's Republic of Belgium.

The total revenue of the government wouldn't need to increase, so for working people it would result in a huge tax cut on their income tax. That's going to make it much easier to hire people. Are the real estate owners going to move their real estate out of the country? &gt; And I haven't heard a good argument yet.

Naysaying is not a counterargument.

&gt;All I've heard is whining about four months.

That's not a good argument to deny women abortion either.

&gt;Children need support, 

From their parents, not their gamete donors.

&gt;women should control their own bodies,

They still do. They still have 100% control of their own body... they just won't have control over the man's reproductive choices anymore.

&gt;and I shouldn't have to pay for someone who knew what he was getting into.

So let me get this straight: you don't want to pay for the person who recognizes that he can't take care of a child properly and acts accordingly, but do want to pay (or make someone else pay) for a person that stubbornly chooses to put a partly unwanted child on the world, even though she can't support it on her own?

&gt;A lousy four months of minor inequality that you have to sign up for is a price I'll take.

It's not 4 months, it's 18 years. For example, not having the right to vote is not an inequality for one day (election day), it's a permanent inequality.

Of course it's a price you'll take... you don't have to pay it.

&gt;In that case, they should contract it before they have sex.

Women don't have to commit to abortion or not either before they have sex. If that were True, there wouldn't be a problem and both parties would simply execute what they agreed beforehand.

&gt;That's going to happen either way. 

A nonzero amount of them will reconsider if they are clearly confronted with the fact that they're going to be a single parent and have an abortion too. If a future child is unwanted, abortion is probably the preferable option.

&gt;In your world, she's subsidized by the taxpayer. 

Isn't that more sensible? The taxpayer has a vested interest to prevent child poverty, while the man hasn't. Society is also better able and reliable to pay it, and unwilling fathers usually aren't either.

&gt;That's True, and I don't expect it to be a substitute. But in the case that a biological father decides he doesn't want to be a parent to a potential child, I'd much rather he paid than me. I'm not subsidizing the decisions he made that led to a single-parent child.

But if he actually did decide, there won't be a child at all! So you're blaming him for something that he's desperately trying to prevent, and has no power to stop, while there is someone else who *does* have the power to stop it, and you want that person to have the power to force someone else to go along.

Ultimately, if *you* think a child should have child support no matter what, then *you* should at least accept that public funds are used to provide it. You want a child to have support, but you don't want to pay for it; that's not a good reason to maintain an inequality.

&gt;Barring outside, unavoidable situations, every child that comes into the world should have two parents caring for it. If you decide not to care for your biological child I'm not willing to pay for you.

You do pay for women who don't know the father, who use donated sperm, who don't try to get child support, have a child from a partner that is terminally ill, have a child from insolvent men, etc. In all these cases women voluntarily have children from men that will not fulfill parental duty. That child does not have two parents due to the decision of the woman, and yet you pay for them.

&gt;No, it's not, and I never said it was. Once again, your logic on this point is crap. Come back when you understand the difference between a point and a counterpoint. 

It's very simple: if "not having sex" is a sufficient method to avoid the unwanted consequences of a pregnancy, then I don't see why that would apply differently to different genders, and then abortion for women is unnecessary too.

&gt;I beg to differ. She couldn't have done it without him.

Women most certainly can decide independently to have an abortion or not. There's nothing the man can do to stop or enforce an abortion, and rightly so of course.

&gt;Saying that people should take responsibility for their actions that have consequences is shaming? That's ridiculous. 

If someone would say "women don't need abortion, they should have though about the consequences before having sex", isn't that slutshaming?

If you think that people should take responsibility for their decisions, why don't you think women should take resonsibility for their decision to not have an abortion, and why should men take responsibility for a decision they didn't make (not having an abortion)?

&gt;What? I was saying that if you're the non-custodial biological parent you should be paying child support unless you literally can't afford it. That's a gender-neutral rule.

It would be gender neutral if there wasn't an opt-out for women and not one for men in the abortion time window. If that is, then it's gender neutral. Right now it's not.

&gt;Not at all. But if it creates consequences, you should take responsibility. That is what you deserve.

Women get an opt-out for those consequences. So should men then.

&gt;Not having sex is still an alternative.

Women have the same option, and yet they still get an extra opt-out. Men should have one too.

&gt;Abortion and child support are two controversial procedures. Both of them are allowed for a specific reason. Your proposal to remove child support in some instances

I don't support removing the existing responsibility for child support. I do support allowing men to decide to forego the entire parental rights and responsibilities to reduce the inequality in reproductive choices that currently exists. The origin of that inequality is not important; the intention of abortion rights was never to put men in a subordinate position or to create inequality. It's no more than normal that we rectify the unintended inequality caused by abortion rights.

&gt;Your application of that claim to say I would logically have to support banning abortion makes no sense because it wasn't meant to be a strong enough imperative to overpower the status quo on that issue, just a dismissal of your own attempt to change the status quo on another.

If you consider that a sufficient argument to deny one person the right to opt out of parenthood, then I don't see why it wouldn't apply to another person of a different gender. If you accept the validity of an argument, then you can't just uses on occasions where it suits your position and ignore it when it contradicts your position.

&gt;I used it specifically to show that your reason for removing child support was insufficient compared to the benefits of keeping it around.

The benefits of child support and who should pay it are two unrelated elements. If child support is beneficial - I tend to agree - we should find another way to pay it, if it's unacceptable for other reasons to force people to do so. Here the principle of equality necessitates that the man should get an opportunity to opt out of parenthood similar to the woman's. In addition it would be good policy because people who willingly choose to accept a responsibility are better in dealing with it.

&gt;In the situation of abortion that is not the case. The reasons for keeping abortion around are much stronger than the reasons for scrapping child support for fathers who don't want kids, which is why I didn't use this argument in that case.

Again, child support is never scrapped: the duty to pay it just never comes into existence, just as if an actual abortion happened.

&gt;And take your name-calling back to the schoolyard. 

If you stop implying that men don't deserve equal rights because they want sex.Woops, let's skip the index a few more times to make up for the lost tax income!It takes a while to pick up steam, but once you're through with the initial tribal intro it starts moving again and the metaplot develops as well.&gt;She is not allowed to discuss the clients private life with her employer.

Any orders he gives her are part of the professional transaction and therefore not private. He can't demand her to suck his dick and claim it's his private life either.Nurse roleplay.Upper left, upper right, lower left, lower right. IMO it's more a matter of personal handwriting than nationality.Pagan originally, the Christians just came afterwards and said "You know that thing you've been doing since forever? That's actually Christian, so you're actually members of our club. Now pay your membership fees.".Both the [CD](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Compact_disc#Digital_audio_laser-disc_prototypes) and the [compact cassette](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Compact_Cassette#History) were developed by a mixed Belgian-Dutch team in the Philips laboratory in Hasselt, headed by Lou Ottens.[Ferdinand Verbiest](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ferdinand_Verbiest#Verbiest.27s_.27car.27) would like to have a word with you.&gt; That ain't no invention son. It is simply the result of recognizing the fact that the person owns his own body and by extension the results of his labor.

Then why do capitalists insist that the factory owner owns the products of the labor, rather than the laborer?That surely will make them better able to repay debt! /sThe Greek state is under control of the Trojka. You can't dictate every tiny law and then blame *them* for doing it wrong.And how are those people going to make money without electricity? Deal with customers through the internet? Nope. Put a light in your store? Nope. Sell food? Nope, can't refrigerate it. Just shows how insane austerity is.I suppose most people don't bother to develop their own handwriting, that's True.That's enough to pay the OCMW handouts to 30000 people this month, i.e. *every single one* in the whole of Flanders.&gt; Fact is, Putin can do whatever he wants, while Obama is caught in a political grindlock, thus Putin has arguably more power than Obama.

That really is nonsensical: Putin has to make sure his supporters keep supporting him. Why else the sabre-rattling, at a very very high cost to the Russian treasury and economy? To keep the population focused on an external enemy.Well, and *into* it.&gt;If it would be possible to create a Universal Healthcare system that would save money to the people directly and maybe even lower their taxes then Republicans would definitly support

Hahahahaha. Seriously? THAT'S SOCIALIST YOU DIRTY COMMIE&gt;The small cartoon appears on the magazine\u2019s back page and shows plane parts and a passenger falling from the sky onto a bearded, armed man in what appears to be an Islamic robe.
The commentary reads: Islamic State: Russian aviation intensifies its bombardments.

Hilarious.It's funny because bombardments imply a deliberate action, and a plane crashing is not! The analogy works because in both cases it's about Russian airplanes in the Middle East dropping stuff on those below.&gt;I was referring to the historic attitude of Greek politicians, Greece didn't get into unbearable debt in a couple of years. 

The debt wasn't unbearable, and it wasn't specifically a Greek problem. With adequate monetary policy Greece wouldn't have been in trouble. Conversely, had the monetary policy continued without change, then one by one most European states would have been forced into bankrupcy by the financial markets.

The Eurozone actually did several things they had sworn never to do: becoming responsible for each others' debt, QE (i.e. printing money) for economic stimulus and threatening the markets to print money if interest rates were threatening to get out of hand. If they had done that before, the Greek debt never would have formed an interest snowball.I've approached the problem in a different way. I made a simple spreadsheet: the input values on top, and two lines underneath that that copied the values, but one added one to total crit, and one added one to total damage bonus. Then I also added a formula for each of those two: (total damage done)/(sum of all modifiers). That way, I could always see how I would get the most added value out of increasing any modifier. I then incremented the most cost-effective value by one, and repeated.

Turns out it's always better to increase damage bonus by one rather than the crit bonus if you have the choice. They only break even when your damage bonus is no less than 50% points higher than your total crit rate!

If you have to choose, then 2% damage bonus is always better than any crit bonus. 4% crit is still better than 1% extra damage.

As an aside, the sharktooth necklaces' defense reduction is worth about 10% damage bonus or 20% crit bonus and greatly enhances the efficiency of both damage and crit modifiers.Water is gevaarlijk (*Water is dangerous*)

A collection of 50 short stories and poems about water, the sea, its dangers and fascinations, drownings and dangerous fantastic creatures, collected and illustrated by Tonke Dragt.Sure, and when a robber holds you up you enter into an agreement to give him all your money.

The market is not free if you are forced to participate for your survival. Consequently, you can't claim the results of what we see now are the result of free choices.Have a cracker.Nuke it from orbit, it's the only way to be sure.&gt; Damn nature is so oppressive. To think that you actually have to do something productive in order to continue living.

That's of no relevance. You claim that the results of the market are caused by *voluntary* transactions. They aren't. They're about as voluntary as handing over your money to a robber who points a gun at you - they would be if you were invulnerable to bullets, but we aren't. Regardless of the origin of the imbalance of power, the factory owner is using their position of power over natural circumstances to force others to work to their advantage just as much as a robber does.

The problem is that people assume everyone has a car and build and organise shit in the middle of nowhere, which is completely unreachable without car.[Belgium has a total fiscal pressure (percentage of income of total economic activity managed by the government) of 45%. Finland has 43%.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_tax_revenue_as_percentage_of_GDP) So the difference isn't that large.Definitely. And you don't have to spend time on exercising, or pay money to fitness centers..Inzoverre het om *inkomens*verzekeringen gaat is het basisinkomen gewoon een vervanging daarvan, die altijd gegarandeerd en niet voorwaardelijk is. De bijdrage aan de ziekteverzekering is nu verplicht voor iedereen met een beroepsinkomen, maar zou eigenlijk verplicht moeten zijn voor iedereen met een *inkomen*. Zo wordt een basisinkomen meteen ook een basisziekteverzekering.Met een basisinkomen kan ook een hypotheek betaald worden... Als die te zwaar is, moet het huis verkocht worden. Er is geen reden waarom dat anders zou zijn met een basisinkomen.&gt; But this is just an arbitrary claim you're making.

So is the opposite. The only thing we know certain is traditional polygamy.

&gt; If you know any people in ethical polyamorous relationships, you'll be hard pressed to find any evidence that it skews "decisively towards polygyny."

The traditional polygamists will skew it to polgyny anyway, regardless of what the progressive ones do.Then tell me how all these benefits (all 1138 of them) would apply to polygamists. When that is done you can move on to state benefits, and international acceptance.

http://www.nolo.com/legal-encyclopedia/marriage-rights-benefits-30190.html

http://www.gao.gov/products/GAO-04-353R

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rights_and_responsibilities_of_marriages_in_the_United_States#Rights_and_benefits&gt; To the same extent as everyone else.

That's impossible, for example it's possible for a couple to file a joint tax return. The calculation for a polygamy simply doesn't exist yet, so it's not a matter of allowing people to partake in it; we would be creating new legislation and procedures for them.

&gt;The same thing that happens when a the signature of a parent is needed to perform a medical procedure on someone unconscious, but the other parent disagrees. It's entirely interchangeable.

So, involving a court? You're setting up a situation where conflict is much more likely (it's exponentially harder to reach consensus with every person you add), and resolving those conflicts requires time and effort, and the result likely will dissatisfy some people anyway.

&gt;Like with gay marriage, we need to legalize it everywhere with a consistent federal definition.

That's besides the point: what if the states assume that marriage is limited to two people? They simply won't have the rules to deal with cases where more people are involved.

&gt;Yes, that's an argument against gay marriage, unless the goal is to make it legal in as many places as possible.

Gay marriage is being recognized internationally, as a trend. Polygamy not at all.

&gt;What other issues do you believe are not covered by current existing family or corporate law?

Child custody, already a source for stress for children of divorced parents, becomes a nightmare. 

Setting up schemes to use marriage to facilitate immigration just became a lot easier.

Various tax exemptions become abusable by making it possible to pass on assets in the marriage, as people can leave and enter, with the result that the marriage keeps existing while the people in it change. That is not possible now: a marriage exists between the same two people until it is dissolved.

Insurance benefits: if they're split you end up with people being insured *partially*, which doesnt make sense, or at the very least creates an administrative mess, with different eligibilities and requirements for different insurances. At the very least everything would have to be updated with every change in the marital agreement (eg. from 1/2 to 1/3 etc.), which will create a lot of extra administrative costs and rules for everyone involved.

What happens with personal rights like bereavement leave? Are those split too? Do the spouses each get 1/3 of the leave?&gt;I do think it's a violation of equality because you're refusing to recognize someone's lifestyle in favor of others.

Then why stop at polygamy? Why not give marriage benefits to football clubs, frat clubs, roommates, pet owners etc?

This was never about recognition of personal lifestyle choices, marriage benefits are a policy tool to support stable, long-term, committed nuclear families in order to stabilize society while retaining individual freedom and equality as much as possible. It's a political choice.&gt;Are you one of those people who thinks giving gay people the right to marry their own sex is giving them more rights?

If you give eg. bereavement leave to all spouses, you give double the amount of free days in total in a 3-person polygamy.

&gt;Excuses, excuses. I sure hope you're not about to use some old anti gay rhetoric like "this will change the institution of marriage!" Oh look, there it is. No, it allows a subset of the population to have the right to marry. Just as gay marriage didn't change the institution of straight marriage, poly marriage doesn't change the institution of mono marriage. You're literally using the old anti-gay marriage canard of "it will change the institution of marriage!"

Gay marriage just required us to ignore the sex of the couple, and required no other change. Giving polygamy marriage benefits would require extensive additional rules and revision of existing practices, which is a clear sign that it's *not* a simple discrimination issue.
It will require many organizational changes, whereas gay marriage not: the gender of some people involved changes, and nothing else.

&gt;Actually a lot of people are naturally poly, just as many people are naturally monogamous. Monogamy works for some, not for others, and the same is True of polyamory. And some people can do both. It's a lot more like the gay/bi/straight thing than most people realize.

A lot of people are naturally inclined to sleep late, and yet we don't have subsidies for evening people so they can start working later. Some people would be naturally inclined to marry their pets, or children, and we're not considering to allow that either.

Mind you, I'm not saying it *shouldn't* happen because of those reasons. Just that it isn't a straightforward equality issue, and would require significant organizational changes.But that's the crux of the issue! You need to be able to say how all the *public* benefits would apply to polygamy if you want it to become law. Especially since the law will provide a one-size-fits-all default case, so that has to be solid and versatile. The fact that marriage contracts between multiple persons require contractual tailor work is quite a good indication that it's rather complicated - and that includes just the domain of private law.That's great, but I found that I was often in as situation where I would either have to try to beat a boss again and again, or hang around and beat monsters again and again to get the last piece needed to upgrade gear. Either way, it's grinding.Of course you *can* (not easily), but the added content consists mostly of more bosses, harder monsters, and more items. Therefore the focus of the game has shifted. You could as well play Mario bros for the story of rescueing a princess, but it's clear that's not where the focus of the game lies.At least with hallowed bars you have the choice which one to grind. But with Skeletron, it's "Uch, *that* guy again".I wouldn't call that ironed out - rather, made the best of a shitty situation. It's still undesirable to create many more of such situations. Besides, that "solution" often involves court orders.. It's not a robust system, and requires much manual attention.Rinsing suffices in most cases, soap is only useful if your hands are grimy/sticky etc.There are more faecal bacteria on your kitchen table than on the toilet seat.Women's toilets are always dirtier than the man's toilets. Ask any janitor.If you've got Norse temperatures, you sweat significantly less. If you don't sweat and don't roll in the mud, it's not always necessary to shower.That would limit Electrabel's profits.I'll be sure to try it at the next occasion. Sounds not bad actually, judging from the description.&gt; 800000 is the lowest estimate, as mentioned in your source.

Of people who have fled Ukraine, not people who have fled to Eastern Europe.

&gt; As for the third source, obviously it's not going to be a million, as you mention it yourself that figure is for the first time applicants in that three months.

Sure, but it's about *dozens* per country. Even times four that still doesn't adds up to anything remarkable.

&gt;Also keep in mind that only a fraction take advantage of the refugee system, most of them integrate and seek employment as soon as they can, unlike the Syrians. That's the advantage when you don't "flee" half a continent away through several safe countries, and instead take refuge in geographically and culturally close nations.

Data please, properly corrected for education level, job experience etc.

&gt;And again, you are doing us no favors by taking in masses of immigrants from half a world away.

The distance between Syria and the EU is about 100 km. Estland is as far from Syria as from Portugal or Ireland.

&gt; In fact, thanks to this insane policy the transit countries are completely overwhelmed. Instead of support, what we got is demonisation for trying to protect our and Schengen's borders.

I completely support a joint EU policy on border management, including border protection and lower and upper limit on the number of people to accept. Right now it's everyone for themselves and that just results, predictably, in trying to shove off problems to each other - which, just as predictably, ends with everyone just having more problems than necessary.

&gt;As for Russia, it seems like the EU "helps" us whether we like it or not. Torpedoing the South Stream plans, and just last week the Paks II NPS deal, that is meant to replace our old nuclear power station, Paks I, which provides over 40% of our electricity. I guess now you can "help" us more selling your gas and electricity instead.

Ask Ukraine what it's like to be exclusively dependent on Russia for energy. No matter how you slice it, being part of a union gives you more bargaining power.

By the way, last time we had a Chancellor was more than 60 years ago.




&gt;Presumably

That will cost a lot more, and create more entitlements based on a single death.

&gt;Or split among the spouses.

Then it defeats its purpose as a way to allow those people to have an income to live off, since neither of them will have enough to be independent. It will lock them into the marriage, as they cannot leave without leaving their source of income.

&gt;Only if the system is set up marriages are independent entities that hold many people rather than just letting each individual marry multiple people. That'd be silly.

It's inevitable though, if only because A, B &amp; C can marry, C divorces, D marries in, B divorces, E marries, and finally A divorces. There's a continuous polygamy, but the people in it change. That doesn't happen with exclusive marriage, so there's no need safeguard against abuses.

&gt;Not hard to do, either way.

Making sure it interacts

&gt;I didn't bring them up.

... The thread is called "There's nothing wrong with polygamy".Now I'm hungry.Or wherever you eat or prepare food.http://www.foodandwine.com/articles/fyi-your-kitchen-is-probably-dirtier-than-a-toilet-seatIt seemed to me that the intention was to discuss the practices and forms rather than the content.&gt; Really? So should I just go steal a porsche? 

It's clumsily worded, but I suppose the spirit of the argument is that nobody should be denied something just because they can't afford it *if the good or service is effectively costless to provide*. No. Taking implies a transfer of possession. No one else loses any other property when something is copied.&gt;The downloader is not providing labor or materials towards the creation of the game.

Most copyright owners don't either.&gt;  but games like gta, skyrim, counter strike? No point in putring in the effort. Thats like the point of capitalism, people tend to put effort into things when rhey know theyll get money and goods for it. If they got nothing, theyd do nothing. If they got money whether they put any real effort into it or not, wed get lazily made games that dont even work.

Then find superior ways to raise money. For example, kickstarter campaigns, preordering new albums. Of course that requires paying attention to your user base rather than producing something generic and ramming in through by the use of commercials.&gt; Russia macro-economic terms, I meant. It's actually advantageous to replace more efficient external production with less efficient internal production because that creates internal jobs and economic activity that you would otherwise not have.

It's not, you just have to dedicate more resources and manpower to produce something that you could have gotten by producing something cheaper and trading it on the world market... and if you're producing cheaper than the world market, you don't need protection to start with.&gt; In the restaurant example, you did not invent the idea of the restaurant.

Neither did copyright holders invent the idea of writing books or record music.

&gt; In the fancy house example, you profit from your work by owning a nice house.

Just like game producers profit from selling games, even if some other people copy it without paying.

&gt;For the child, their own effort was additive to yours; no significant effort goes into pirating a game or stealing a design.

Then why is it so hard to provide a proper digital distribution, if pirates can do it for free?

&gt; If you play a song in the street, you're doing it freely in a public space, a space owner by others; if you want to have a private space and charge for performance, that's your right.

The market is a public place; if you want to sell goods, you have to allow potential customers to inspect them, for example by looking at them (that's not theft, just data transfer; just like piracy).

&gt;I expect people to be able to control and sell the products of their own work.

Copyright actually hinders that, as you can be sued if you unconsciously copy a part of another work.&gt; You CAN privatize portions of the internet for profit. But you can;t just steal from others; opening a shop doesn;t mean you can just steal product from someone else. A passerby can;t just take a hotdog from a vendor.

He can, however, go home and make a similar hotdog with ingredients he has in his kitchen.

&gt;You're really saying it's as hard to not pirate a game as it is to not look at fireworks?

The more well-known a game, the more appropriate that reasoning is.

Well no, you were called a nazi when you said anything to the tune that refugees are intrinsically terrorist and would never be able to function in society.Janitors generally testify in favor of the former. "Men are dirtier than women" seems like a stereotype.Cutting out the middle man, right?&gt; Fool's on you, I wipe it down with Dettol and a clean tissue before I use those. 

I, for one, welcome the new master race of bacteria that will inevitably rise from those harsh artificial selection procedures. Only the nastiest bacteria can survive that onslaught.Well, not an impossible interpretation if only judging the title.&gt;That, does not make sense. Why would selling more electricity reduce their profits?

Supply and demand. I addition, wind undercuts nuclear from time to time on the spot market, and it's their policy to use their nuclear plants first to support the idea that those are indispensable.

If nuclear energy was easy to throttle, we'd pick up free wind energy first, right?&gt; Again, only if the system is setup in the incredibly stupid way of having the marriage be a multi-party entity rather than just pairs.

No, if they are entitled to 1/3 of the benefit if there are two other partners for example, then they only retain 1/3 if they would want to leave, even if it was a personal right.

&gt;Marriages (A,B), (A,C), (B,C) exist. Then only (B,C) and (A,C) divorce. Then (A,D) and (B,D) start. Then (A,E), (B,E), and (D,E) marry. Then (A,B), (A,D), and (A,E) divorce.

At no point there is continuity. A previous marriage has to be disbanded before a new one starts.

&gt;In this case the issue is with the existing monogamous system rather than the expansion. It's like how the lasting damage of gang rape isn't an issue of the gang part but the rape part.

That's like arguing "voting should be abolished" in a thread with the premise "voting should be extended to black people".There's bound to be a few AMA's.That's like arguing "voting should be abolished" in a thread with the premise "voting should be extended to black people".&gt; Human wants are limitless and as such when a human has to pay less for something (because the price of that thing dropped due to automation) then they will shift those savings and spend them on something that they didn't buy previously. 

You forget that their buying power will be eroded constantly by the reduced demand for labor.

&gt;The other point I will make is that as long as demand is more or less infinite

Demand is only relevant if it is backed up by buying power.Well, what would *you* do when a crazy axe murderer enters your house, kills your roommates and bashes down the door to your bedroom?&gt; It's weird to see this argument, considering it's directly opposed to the other Green argument that nuclear power is too expensive. 

It hinders investments in green energy because it sucks up all the investment capital (since you can't stop halfway, you have to go on even if there are delays and cost overruns). In addition, it ensures that the market is dominated by one or just a few big suppliers, so it won't work smoothly and discourage competition.I answered your points. If there's anything implicit, please explain it.&gt;It's getting abolished in the name of fundamental rights:

The fundamental right of censoring whatever you decide to take offense on?

&gt;tradition is tarnishing the ethnic identity of people.

Yes, we can't have a black person that is fun and capable. That would tarnish their identity. /sSinterklaas will be putting out new vacatures for Pieten: minorities need not apply due to discrimination concerns. Only blonde Aryans allowed!Either by gearing up to the hilt, or trying again and again because otherwise one good hit finishes you.That's impossible. If A and B share their assets, and B and C, then effectively A and C also share their assets. And custody, etc. etc.&gt;Buying power is not a function of labor demand.

Most people obtain their buying power by offering their labor on the market. Therefore, their buying power is a function of demand for their labor on the market.

Even today, there is plenty of things people want, but they are not buying it and it is not produced because they don't have the buying power to back it up. In addition, there *is* unemployment, plenty of it and in particular for low-skilled people that used to work in very labor-hungry sectors that are now largely automated, despite your claims. That is observable. Handwaving distribution and adjustment problems away belongs in /r/badeconomics, not anyone who happens to disagree with you.

&gt;If you believe that a single simplistic sentence debunks the work of economists who have spent tens of thousands of hours studying, modeling, and researching the effects of automation then it is possible that you are not aware of the complexities of the interactions at play in the labor market. I'd suggest you read the papers linked in the earlier comment, particularly the Autor papers, and gain a solid understanding of the SBTC effect. That should thoroughly answer your concern. If you still have questions I would suggest asking them in the daily discussion thread over in /r/badeconomics where you can directly converse with working, published economists. 

If you insist in making an argument of authority, look what other authorities say: "Based on our reading of the evidence, we believe it is time to reevaluate the case that SBTC offers a satisfactory explanation for the rise in U.S. wage inequality in the last quarter of the twentieth century."The souls are even acceptable, one just shouldn't need industrial quantities of them to progress. in the crafting tree of the emblems, for example: that's way too much.

People could be rewarded in other ways for beating the bosses more times, or faster, or with taking less damage: perhaps note the time taken or the kill count on the trophy. Or make the weapon dealing the final blow legendary.Abortion is a valid way to make sure your parenthood remains planned, for example in the case of malfunctioning contraception. It's a natural, inseparable part of the service.

&gt;Obviously that's not a violation of the Hyde amendment, but wouldn't anti-abortion people then have a point ethically about Planned Parenthood being funded by their tax dollars? 

Even people who disagree with eg. the Iraq war have their tax dollars fund it. Or there are Church subsidies/tax breaks, that other tax payers have to make up for. So I don't see why that would be a particular problem with abortion, but not all those other policies that people may not agree with individually.True, but let's not overstate it: it's safer than being pregnant and giving birth.

 I'm still against the forced abortion though - but also against forced parenthood.&gt;as of now sadly we have no other option but child-support

We do: since the woman decided unilaterally to have a child, it's her choice and her responsibility. Given that the man didn't want a child at any point, and presumably did what is possible to prevent it (contraception), it's just as if the woman used a sperm donor. Well, an unwilling sperm donor.That's not what he said. Look at the table: a woman unwilling to have a child would still result in an abortion. He requires mutual consent instead of the woman forcing her decision onto the man, as the current situation is.Mmm, time to try whether that court would accept you to steal from the rich and give it to the poor because religious reasons.Having strategical access of more territory - and denying it to your enemies -  is useful.Pascal's wager essentially means doing a risk analysis about believe: if God doesn't exist it makes no difference whether you believe in him or not, but if he does, you can lose an eternity in paradise by not believing in him. Therefore, believing is your best bet, with on average the best result, and nothing to lose.

However, Pascal lived in a time where only the Christian God was an option. This graph expands the analysis with all religions, and what they think happens to people of specific other religions in the afterlife. So now you can make a more informed gamble by comparing the horizontal rows, and picking the one that gives the best results on average.The tax shift, or the normal economic recovery?The tax shift as it is *reduces* the disposable income of a lot of people in Belgium, and therefore reduces jobs. So it's hardly straightforward.&gt; women can't NSA

Women can't national security agency?Economic recoveries are continental trends, typically.Sure it is. The public library budget is tiny already, take it from elsewhere.Well, I always wear a tinfoil hat against alien mind control. I haven't seen any aliens since, so it works!

All kidding aside, it's tricky to quantify both influences, that's one of the problems of economic research: you can't do isolated, controlled experiments. So claiming that the tax shift caused the job lift is unfounded. Claiming that it didn't can't be done for the same reason. &gt;Ethnic identity falls under the right to private life.

Celebrating Sinterklaas with Zwarte Piet is part of my ethnic identity. Now what?

&gt;Stereotyping of a certain severity infringes the right.

Zwarte Piet is not stereotyping Africans any more than Sinterklaas is stereotyping Turks or Spanish.

&gt;You see Zwarte Piet as fun and capable, others see Zwarte Piet as tarnishing their image. Maybe people don't want to be associated with some clowny stereotype.

They aren't associated with it. They are just projecting USA's historical sensitivities where they don't apply (mostly because there never was institutionalized racism on the territory of the Low Countries).

In addition, even children are very well capable of making the distinction between the character Zwarte Piet and someone with dark African looks on the street, or between Sinterklaas/de Kerstman and a random guy with a long white beard on the street... and even if they aren't, their parents tell them the difference. Simple.&gt;a pearly white candle in a silver holder. it has a pure white, ever burning flame. it emits a very dim light, about as much as a match. the holder can use the candle to mend wounds or cure disease, but in so doing the candle burns the equivalent of a half hour's wax per mortal wound healed. when it's burns out, all previous users die.

I'd say "all cured wounds return" instead. So you can't evade the drawback by only curing warts. You still can by only using it once per generation. Of course, power is tempting, and if people know you have it, they'll beg you to use it, and curse you if you refuse..Could be an adventure hook: race with their antagonists to get to the apple first, they want to eat it, you want to prevent it.Vertical channels?God was on his side.Or professors should have their course material/task ready at least two weeks before the date it's due... :/Ask your current Belgian health insurer.

You're making health insurance contributions in the Netherlands, so they'll cover the bill eventually, even if you use healthcare in another country, but keep your EHIC ready. Or S1 form.Why do fossil fuel companies not stop selling coal?Having more friends means having less enemies, or at the very least less bold enemies.- Talking hat that can destroy all light sources in sight
- Tiny fishing rod that can cast a flame once per day
- Gauntlet which renders the wielder unable to become drunk and that reminds you of your mother (why so cruel, man?)
- Hairy bar of soap that ensures safe passage from all masons and builders

Quite bizarre. Good that you also include nonmagical items. Not everything needs to be magical.

- Ever-glowing goggles that makes constables and law enforcement pay extra attention to the wielder and that makes all creatues the wielder rides happy

Refreshingly bizarre!

- Flamethrowing codpiece

*High five*[There are a lot of arguments in this article.](http://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2015/07/case-against-polygamy/397823/)

"The strongest argument against state-sanctioned group marriage is how poorly it has worked out for women and low-status men in most times and places it has been tried."

"

    ...when a high-status man takes two wives (and one man taking many wives, or polygyny, is almost invariably the real-world pattern), a lower-status man gets no wife. If the high-status man takes three wives, two lower-status men get no wives... This competitive, zero-sum dynamic sets off a competition among high-status men to hoard marriage opportunities, which leaves lower-status men out in the cold. Those men, denied access to life's most stabilizing and civilizing institution, are unfairly disadvantaged and often turn to behaviors like crime and violence.

    The situation is not good for women, either, because it places them in competition with other wives and can reduce them all to satellites of the man.
"The article is linked to as as source in the article I linked to. At least pretend you have read the arguments before dismissing it - you answered after half a minute.You get to talk to fruit. Who knows what use that has? Or perhaps they do believe it effectively will confer a more directly useful power for some reason. Or the PC's are geased to work on behalf of someone, and after obtaining the apple, still have to find a way to keep it out of the hands of their employer, etc.&gt;https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Olkiluoto_Nuclear_Power_Plant#Cost

[Costs are higher than that.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Olkiluoto_Nuclear_Power_Plant#Cost).

&gt;And really, the electricity market has never worked properly as private venture. This is due to the fact that all powerplants have high upfront costs, and unpredictable gain.

... Like any capital intensive industry. Markets work better if the threshold for entering is low, and the threshold for entering is a lot lower for renewables plants than for nuclear plants. We're quite a small country, there isn't much manoeuvering space on the market. This could potentiall be solved by increasin connectivity with the rest of the EU, something that should be done anyway for various reasons.The whole article is an answer to your reservation of " But I don't see any reason why legal polygamy would mean going back to income disparity and gender inequality in the western world." It's a paraphrasing of arguments and counterarguments, and very relevant to your concern. Please read it, and then you'll find the reference you want too.&gt;Then you should bring it up if you feel it's being infringed and the Court will be in charge of balancing it given the context and previous case law.

The court didn't even forbid it. The court just said that the City council should consider the decision again.

&gt;Sinterklaas is traditionally portrayed by a white guy. People hardly see him as a foreign type. Don't kid yourself.

The same goes for Zwarte Piet. It's clearly a white guy with black paint. Nobody thinks it's an actual African.

&gt;yeah sure. That's why we had the awareness campaign for retard hooligans shouting monkey at football players. We don't have the same historical context but that doesn't mean coloured folks, blacks in particular here, are treated amazingly in Belgium. If you deny that then there's no point to this conversation.

What has that to do with Zwarte Piet? Next you're going to say that Mega Mindy should be forbidden because women wearing pink is a stereotype.

&gt;Nope. Not so simple. Turn on your TV and browse a bit. Do you think the black minority is correctly represented? I'd be very suprised if you said yes. The representation of minorities in media/pop culture is very iffy.

And you're going to solve that by **removing** people that you recognize as black persons from an extremely popular local tradition? That will only result in even less representation.

I'm sure you're eager to do *something* for the good cause, but please pick something useful. For example, the fact that people with strange names are discriminated for invitations for job interviews. Try to hammer on that nail: it directly contradicts the "they're too lazy to work" narrative, and it would actually be a meaningful and useful change, whereas removing Zwarte Piet would just be a step backwards IMO and even in the most favourable interpretation just a cosmetic change (pun not intended).

Intriguing, thanks.The poison is in the dose. I'll drink to that.No, they created possession. Nobody else lost possession.I'm pretty sure people understand that, and make sure their favourite games are getting money. Even if they don't, only the games with a paying customer base will remain in time, so I don't see the problem. The market will correct itself.&gt;But they were sold the material in a mutually agreed upon transaction by those that were. 

They have money, and therefore power. Agreements between actors of vastly different power are not exactly free.

&gt;Just as the person who builds a house can sell it to someone who, though they didn't build it, is now the rightful owner.

That just illustrates our general problem with ownership.We could use more peope *that have proper education, civil rights and chance to develop themselves*. So if there were less people, we could divert those resources to lift up the people who lack those things.&gt;Sending out greeting cards is not specifically Christian. But doing kind acts and making friends and family know that they are loved is. 

So everyone that's not a fulltime dick is Christian? Gee. Call the pope, he'll like the news.&gt;A Historian is going to try to document, in as much detail as possible, what happened factually through documents and evidence. 

That view on history - a string of facts - was popular in the 19th century (see Leopold von Ranke). Time to update view on history.&gt;And they're not protecting those ideas. Just specific books and music.

Just like the person in the example was protecting a specific restaurant.

&gt;So they're only getting PART of their just profit.

There is no such thing as just profit. All profit indicates an imbalance between supply and demand.

&gt;If there really wasn't anything wrong with pirating, and everyone did it, they wouldn't even get that.

And at that point, they would use more modern financing mechanisms instead of being dependent on 19th century business practices.

&gt;It isn't. I've legitimately downloaded software easily many times.

Thanks to piracy, otherwise we'd still have to run to the stores to buy physical disks. Piracy is a valuable competitor on the marketplace.

&gt;No, you don't. It may be a good idea, but it's not required. If I have a shop and you come in and say "let me handle that gun before I buy it". I can say "No.". I probably won't make a sale, but that's my right.

Then don't be surprised that those customers are going to try out a copy of that gun elsewhere before actually buying it.

&gt;That's a necessary consequence; you can't expect your work to be protected if the work of another isn't.

The thing is, as an individual artist your work isn't very well protected. You neither have the resources to check on all media to see if they copy you, nor the resources to win the protracted legal battle. Copyright mostly benefits big business.&gt; But to entirely reject the latter, and actively argue that the current status quo has already reached equal opportunity, pretty inevitably implies that you consider women to be quite apparently inferior in their ability to reach equal outcomes.

No, it can also mean that the historical discrimination still has lingering after-effects, that will only grow out of the system gradually. Just like you can't impose democracy on a country very well, you can't impose completely equality of outcome on a society. We already addressed the legal discrimination against women (not against men, unfortunately), so there won't be any drastic effects by flipping legal switches like for example abolishing slavery. For example, women still have motherhood as a large part of their identity, and therefore they claim the role of primary caregiver more often than men. But you can't force them to make particular choices on average... that would be rather authoritarian and patriarchal, ironically.&gt;Financially, it's a burden we don't need.

That goes for any place they would stay.

&gt;5000 is too much, because this is an act of charity! It's too much whenever we say it's too much! Does nobody understand this? Why is this being treated like paying tax, something we must do?

It's morally imperative, somebody has to do it, and we're better placed to do it than most. Conversely, if we don't do it, it will destabilize the geographical neighbourhood even more, and they'll try to come here illegally anyway, which gives even more problems. Bottom line: nor we nor the refugees get to choose whether there is a war in Syria, but we still have to deal with it: that's life.&gt; That's simply unTrue. Hell, many of the proposals made by environmental advocates, scientists, and political leaders will involve multiple generations of investment in new infrastructure and consumer goods. A world of "zero growth" in which we continue feeding the same amount of coal into the same number of electricity plants is not one that any climate change activist wants to live in. By contrast, we have numerous activists championing billions invested in new grid technologies to reduce wasted energy, new investment in renewable and nuclear power generation, and adoption of mass transit alternatives to our existing car-based infrastructure. This would amount to trillions of dollars in new spending, resulting in... a higher rate of economic growth over time.

Still, the consumption of resources has to stop growing, and shrink (both because of lack of inputs and lack of waste sinks). We can still get more utility out of them, but the planet simply isn't big enough to sustain this rate of resource consumption. We also will have to set up closed chains rather than the mining &gt; production &gt; consumption &gt; dumping practices we have now.&gt; You're not suggesting that constructing a bridge to nowhere is a viable economic plan, are you?

If the lack of buying power in much of the population is a problem and you're not allowed to give money to people without having them work for it, then yes, it can be.If not enough people are willing to pay for them, then those games will disappear from the market: working as intended. Keep in mind that those people don't *burn* their money instead of paying for access to content: they spend that on something else. If the supply of content drops and they want more, they'll find a way to get money to the producers. If not, then they simply value those other goods more and the market adapts to that fact by letting those content producers go bankrupt.&gt;So the perfect balance is zero profit?

Yes.

&gt;It's their choice to market their products how they want.

And our choice how to use our computers.

&gt;Regardless, it's just proof that digital distribution works fine.

It's proof that piracy is necessary to ensure that companies remain attentive to the needs of the customers. It's quite possible to have a succesful digital distribution platform, even when piracy exists, they just need to offer a good service. The existence of a cheaper alternative is the necessary incentive to ensure that the service remains good.

&gt;Which would be wrong, unless they could legitimately get it elsewhere.

Somebody printed a 3d copy of the one they bought.

&gt;All legal battles are skewed in favor of the rich. That doesn't change that it's wrong to steal from a small business or individual.

So, you acknowledge that piracy of big business is tolerable?[As you can see, there's plenty of room to interprete the verb](http://www.thefreedictionary.com/take).

Fact remains: if I take your book, you don't have the book anymore. If I copy your book, you still have the book. Two very different actions.

You seem to be focused on the ability of property to *deny* the use of something to others, even though that is only secondary and instrumental to its main use, to guarantee that someone can enjoy his property. With that focus, property becomes a negative right to exert power over others - to deny them things - rather than a positive right to safeguard one's own rights. Is that your intention?&gt;My gift to industry is the genetically engineered worker, or Genejack. Specially designed for labor, the Genejack's muscles and nerves are ideal for his task, and the cerebral cortex has been atrophied so that he can desire nothing except to perform his duties. Tyranny, you say? How can you tyrannize someone who cannot feel pain?

- Chairman Sheng-ji Yang, "Essays on Mind and Matter"
At that point just transplant your brain to the fresh body.Yet another reason to reduce the population. Environmental impact = Population * Resource use. If we want to keep environmental impact under the carrying capacity we have to reduce either one. Since we don't want to forbid the poor people of the world to better their circumstances, and aren't very likely to reduce our own impact very much, addressing the problem at the root by reducing the amount of births is the obvious angle to work on the problem.He goes home and makes a similar digital file structure using the data he has seen in other copies of the game, with aid of his computer, just like he saw the hotdog being made with aid of his glasses. In both cases, he only copies information. In both cases, he doesn't buy the product (hotdog/game) but make a copy himself. If we apply that interpretation of IP on hotdogs, it would be illegal to buy buns, sausages, sauerkraut and mustard: you'd have to grow the grain, mill the flour, bake the bread, raise the pig, slaughter it, make the sausage, grow the cabbage, process it, grow the mustard seed, grind it, and then make a hot dog.

If we apply the reasoning of the industry, then he would *still* be committing a crime: after all, they have copyright on the concept of hotdog and he's not allowed to copy it.You didn't say the refurbishment, but were talking about nuclear power in general. That will require buidling a new plant.&gt;No one is forced to buy a movie or game.

We're talking about content producers having no real choices but to sell their copyright, not about the consumer side.

&gt;How is that a problem?

If persons who don't actually build the house but just have ownership titles benefit more from it than the ones who actually build it, something is wrong with the incentive and reward structure of the economy: rent extraction is encouraged at the expense of productivity.Sure, and if you have less children to educate it's easier to pay for that education.Marriage implies that you are assumed to form a household, so that includes the children and responsibility for it. If you marry someone with children, you also become responsible for those children, and it gives rise to custody/child support claims afterwardsGood education requires teachers, one way or another. But essentially technological innovations aren't going to help: they just make stuff cheaper, and without brakes on consumption/population growth it will just result in either more consumption or more population. More consumption for the poor would be an improvement, but more population would make the problems worse.That excuses them stopping his car, but not what happened afterwards.&gt; Did you read the police version, at least?

I heard their representative on the radio. First he said: "The police did nothing wrong during the encounter!" A few sentences later he said: "I don't know, I haven't yet read the PV of the encounter." So whatever they say is just closing ranks towards critical questions so far.[It can happen.](http://rightsandremedies.blogspot.be/2009/04/when-does-step-parent-have-to-pay-child.html) Visitation rights are often awarded.

There also are plenty of cases of men ordered to pay child support for children that aren't theirs biologically already. Under those circumstances, yes.You missed to invest in Eastern Poland! That's why they're starving!Well, at the very least he didn't get disruptive viruses.On-off-on-off at random intervals is more frustrating.&gt;if you look at deaths per trillion KWh it's the safest means of energy production, even beating out solar and wind.

The full lifecycle of nuclear safety runs across a very long time, you're working from a tiny sample size. And one of the worst risks still has to be measured: how will people deal with waste that only costs money deal with and will not do anything in the future? The incentive to cut corners on waste disposal and hope nobody finds out soon, is very high.

Conversely, renewables require some initial preparation of the sites, which involves construction deaths, but that's a one-time investment. After that it's mostly infrastructure maintenance, which is inevitable for an industrial civilization.

&gt;I see policy makers and career politicians scrambling for a way to reduce CO2 emissions all the while completely overlooking or, worse, condemning nuclear power as radically unsafe and risky.

It's also costly, prone to cost overruns and delays, hard to scale, slow to ramp up production and a bad match for renewables on the grid, runs on fuel that relies on ores of dwindling quality, poses security risks and is out of reach for small and medium investors so it automatically gives big business a death grip on the electricity market, and relies heavily on subsidies.

And frankly, I'd rather save up our limited supply fissiles for interstellar space flight. Let's think ahead.Most buildings aren't at risk of contaminating the major industry or population hub where they're constructed...&gt; We like to talk about the famous nuclear events that have happened as reasons why nuclear power is unsafe, but in every single instance, the failsafes that were originally designed and put into place were ignored. The reactor that was damaged in Japan failed its inspections for years and years on end. If you looked at the data only you would say, "yeah, this is gonna go bad".

And what makes you believe that we're *magically* going to stop being negligent and lazy when it comes to nuclear safety? I could accept that it's *technically* possible to have safe nuclear technology, but it's going to be managed by *humans*. And those will cut corners on safety for various reasons, so sooner or later a plant will go wrong in the worst possible way. And then it doesn't matter whose fault it is.

&gt;I dream of a word were we built and maintained nuclear facilities to power the entire world. Where power wasn't something you fought over, bargained over, and haggled over, but instead was readily available to anyone who needs it.

We've heard the "too cheap to meter" fairytale for half a century now. Nuclear has had its chance, time to move on to modern energy sources instead of keeping to waste time with failed projects from the '70s that didn't live up to expectations. There simply aren't enough conventional fissile materials to power even one generation of plants to do that even if they were built instantly, and new designs are decades away from practical implementation, as they have been for most of the post-WW2 period.&gt;What we need to do is actually invest in a nuclear future

We've been doing so for half a century. We're still nowhere near practical new designs. Time to give other sources a chance: printable solar sounds nice, flexible, cheap and excellently suited for a free market economy.He claims that doing kind acts and making friends and family know that they are loved is something that distinguishes Christians from non-Christians, to that extent that you can recognize Christian activities by it. That's obviously False.

&gt;Squares are rectangles but not all rectangles are squares

Exactly: Christians may be kind to each other, but not all people who are kind to each other are Christians. Therefore, observing people to be kind to each other does not prove that they're Christians, and a holiday where people are supposed to be kind to each other is not necessarily Christian.Could you use the different biome patterns to generate ordinary rocky areas? So we get more variation in cave types without necessarily increasing the amount of specials or ores. For example, there could be a dungeon-shaped piece of cavern - just ordinary rock instead of dungeon bricks, and with the normal cavern stuff and traps instead of  dungeon items. Other biome patterns that would be nice to copy in stone form are marble, granite, pyramid, the corrupted cliffs!, crimson caverns, and even temples, living trees, beehives, the enchanted sword biome or whatever.

I also wonder if you could put a big empty cavern or big empty lake in there, as a kind of randomly placed biome - ordinary rock otherwise, just a big space.

Can you tweak the connectivity of the caves, so you could explore with minimal digging if desired? More connecting tunnels rather than random caves. Or cluster the caverns more, so there are areas that are actually mostly rock and areas that are mostly cavern.

Good work jopo, you're doing what this game really needed.Well, off the top of my head, there's Sam's rabbit stew in LOTR.&gt; I don't see how the world doesn't make sense to you, worldbuilding is not a common criticism amongst the hundreds that are usually directed towards Goodkind, he is an excellent worldbuilder.

I found "let's beat the evil empire that is about to enslave everyone!" a bit trite as a plot. I found it absurd when our noble hero just *took over the evil empire* as soon as he had the chance, without blinking. Well, at least I got a good laugh out of it.

&gt;but I feel extreme actions and characters are necessary to show extreme ideas.

When you only have two colors, however, they may just as well be slightly darker grey and slightly lighter gray. The only purpose of other characters in the book is to prove the moral superiority of the hero by contrast. I have to agree that that is second rate writing, at least where characterization is concerned.I don't think we can call it inequal opportunity - it's just that gender norms are culturally transmitted and are based on those of the previous generation, the changing opportunities nothwithstanding.

And then there is still room for some different biological dispositions and tendencies in making choices that *are* biologically determined, much like left- and righthanded people have some minor differences but neither are considered superior or inferior, nor is the issue considered very important. But frankly, if those differences do exist (and IMO they do, the only question is to which extent it's nature and not nurture) then I think it's quite sexist to consider the outcome of women's choices inferior, as feminists seem to imply.
He's pointing at the Americans to get some of their street cred when it comes to military effectiveness, and (probably correctly) assumes that most of the population never heard about the abuses of the Patriot Act.That's okay, anyone can stop being a football fan. You can't change the fact that you *look* Moroccan.I'll give the advice that nobody here is a lawyer. I think actual lawyers or lawyer offices are willing to inform you on that, because if you do, you're a potential customer to them.If he effectively had nothing else to go on but an unusual race, then yes, it was racial profiling - just a lucky shot. Even a broken clock is right twice a day.&gt; Also if you're in the right lane and you want to overtake, don't start indicating with someone still next to you in the left lane (I see this happening a lot abroad)... it scares the shit out of me/us since my assumption is that if you indicate, you're going to turn already (as many of us do)

If you only start indicating when you're already turning, it's too late. The only thing the people behind you can do is brake suddenly. If you indicate it earlier they can slow down and make room, avoiding the sudden brake.Slip roads aren't that long... before the it ends, naturally.&gt; First off, when you approach the roundabout figure out where you're supposed to go and indicate in that direction. Yes, you must indicate left when taking the roundabout \u00be of the way. 

That's not really helpful: that destination is different depending on where people enter the roundabout, so it doesn't help at all.&gt; The clash between styles is a bit to hard.

That's Belgium. Every building is different.It may be relevant for insurance if his mom was told officially to keep her shaking hands off the wheel. Still, I agree that the better course of action would be to simply move out.Government is many different organizations, and for some of them that is True at least some of the time. Law enforcement tends to have authoritarian tendencies though, unsurprisingly.I mean that stereotyping people of a certain behaviour is far less problematic than stereotyping people with a certain look: you can change one, but not the other.&gt;That's not as intended.

Yes, it is.

&gt;People have finite money and can therefore buy finite things; if you want more things, either get more money or...tough.

You're denying everyone goods and services that are free to produce. It's as if we are in a world with Star Trek replicators, and you deny people their use because they don't have money.Most of the money goes to middlemen, and if some of those middlemen obtained the copyright somehow, all of it. We should indeed try to get more money to the actual creators, instead of the middlemen.People use tools to enhance their perception and memory. Are you going to forbid glasses and hearing aids? Even without, it's perfectly possible to learn a poem or song text by heart that you heard at a performance, and recite it to your friends. Do you think it should be forbidden to recite poetry?&gt; The people who built the house benefit plenty; they get the money from the sale.

Not if they don't have the ownership.By being frugal? No, by making $6710.53 per month after taxes and living expenses.

On top of that he problably missed out on tax deductions by paying off his mortgage early, so he actually paid more than necessary.If you can put your life on hold for three years, you probably had none to start with. He has no friends worth speaking of, because he was at work all of the time. He has to call the television because he knows no one personally who would be happy for him.

Instead, he could have found some middle ground, and reduced his mortgage to easy mode while still having a life.&gt; How about no? How about Germany or Spain or wherever can prioritise their citizens for benefits and we can prioritise ours since a government's primary responsibility is to look after their citizens.

I don't see why you object then. What he proposes is that everyone builds up his own security fund, not that another state pays for benefits of citizens of other countries.

&gt; I would never support another European institution being created.

Just because.&gt; I see one benefit of the electoral college in forcing candidates to target more median voters, rather than trying to run up the score among their more fervent supporters.
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; This is something you see a lot in systems which use proportional representation as opposed to first past the post, where parties essentially don't need to cater to all voters, but can get enough support among particular factions to get the seats they want.
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; The electoral college means that the biggest gains come from targeting the middle though, and that's actually a healthy thing for a republic.

On the contrary; a first past the post system (which results automatically if you let the winner take all votes of the state), ensures that you only need a slight majority to get all power. So you can stimulate hostility against minorities and the other parties, as long as you have your majority they don't matter. In a proportional system, however, today's competitors can be tomorrow's coalition partner, and that ensures that you at least remain on talking terms. In proportional systems the moderate parties have a large competitive advantage, in that they can form coalitions with about anyone, while parties that are one-sided are much more restricted in their partner choices. Centrist parties are the most likely to end up in government in coalition systems.

&gt;The thing I think that is critical here is that (to me) the selection of a President isn't just about finding the True expression of the popular will. It is about having the structure that produces good governance and respect from the people of the legitimacy of that governance, even when it does something they dislike.

How does that support the EC?&gt;The problem with what your proposing (also known as a basic form of proportional representation) is that it ends up favouring urbanites over those living in rural areas, as well as favouring larger states over smaller ones

No; the current system ends up favouring the smaller states and rural areas over the urban centers, and thereby most people. How is that better?

&gt;which has the potential to be quite damaging to America's quite important agricultural communities/industry.

If those industries are of national importance, they'll get their due. If not, then why boycott the will off the people to safeguard the interest of a few companies?

&gt;A direct proportionate system would lead to an odd sort of tyranny by majority

Whereas now we have a tyranny of a minority, or most often tyranny of a handful of swing states.


Different Winners of Electoral and Popular Vote

The biggest criticism of the electoral vote system is that it is possible for a presidential candidate to win the popular vote and lose the electoral vote. That is, more Americans voted for the candidate but he or she still lost. While this is rare, it has happened 4 times:

- George Bush (electoral vote winner) vs. Al Gore in 2000: Al Gore won the popular vote by 543,816 votes
- Benjamin Harrison (electoral vote winner) vs. Grover Cleveland in 1888
- Rutherford B. Hayes (winner) vs. Samuel J. Tilden in 1876: Tiden won the popular vote by 264,292 votes
- John Quincy Adams won the electoral vote in 1824 but lost the popular vote to Andrew Jackson by 44,804 votes in 1824 Why *should* they? They should spend 1/26 of the time they spend in Texas.That would be True if the states were of equal geographic size, but they aren't.Low IQ is not disabled. In either case, that person is lucky enough to have well-meaning people to look after him. If he hadn't, he might as well be a homeless methhead somewhere.I would complain less if I didn't exist, so the latter please.

In any case, the choice is between "abort this body and make a better one for the chid" or "let this cell clump turn into a child, well knowing it will be painfully hard just to reach something resembling a normal life".&gt;How do you define which disabled people deserve to live?

The OP didn't use the word deserve - don't put words in his mouth.

&gt;Does Stephen Hawking "deserve" to live? 

Does Stephan Hawking deserve to have a healthy body?

&gt;I was born without any diseases, yet I've done jackshit with my life. Why do I deserve to live, but amazing people like Hawking should never have been born?

Without crystall ball, we can't tell. It's a success for most handicapped people to live something resembling a normal life already, the chance to contribute anything is far lower than for people in normal bodies. So I'd rather gamble on the normal bodies.&gt; It's sort of like a celebrity athlete, or astronaut questioning your life, because you're not living to their standard.

I'd draw a line somewhere at the point where you can't even take care of yourself. That's the minimum threshold.a&gt; We don't have to get into whether or not a fetus is a baby in this CMV. Sidestepping that issue, the point is that life with disability may be preferable to no life at all. If that's the case, then even if it's cruel to have a disabled baby, it's crueller to terminate the pregnancy. 

But the only one who can judge that is the person that is alive, and by then it's too late to change. But, if the outcome necessarily involves a living person, then we simply have to ask people: would you rather be handicapped or not handicapped? And then the answer is clear. So abort that faulty body, and obtain a better body for your child.&gt; Can't I point to adult humans with Down's Syndrome instead? I can say that, with respect to those actually existing persons, it would have been crueller for them to have been terminated in utero than to have been born with their condition.

It would be, but they don't exist at the time of a potential abortion. So there would be no cruelty, anymore than scrambling an egg is cruel to the chicken it could have become. We're not killing persons, we're flushing a cell clump. And given that people typically create a limited number of children, the choice is not between having a Down child or not, it's between having a Down child or a healthy child.

I'm not taking a free $50 if I can try again and have the same chance to win $100. 

&gt; Child A would have existed if not for your actions.

So you think that using contraception is mass murder, or at least violates some interest of all the people who potentially could have been born?That's besides the point. He's questioning the ethicality of that decision, not who should be making it.It's not because abortion is legal that murder will be legal.&gt;The thing is, what may seem like an undesirable life to you is precious to someone else. 

They would still prefer to have an unhandicapped body instead. So refuse that body, and make a better one.

&gt;In fact using that support and facing those challenges is what makes life the sweetest.

Well, I could use some support... tell me by what channels you can make a donation the quickest way.I think all you have to do is to spend some time with a non-disable person and ask them whether they want to be disable. It can easily be concluded that a non-disabled life is preferable.

Therefore, if you're going to make a child, it's better to discard a foetus that will become a disabled body, and try again.Well, if the third world focused their limited means on a few children rather than playing the lottery, their lives would be a lot better.&gt; A mother, after carrying a living human for six months, who has heard his heartbeat, felt him kicking, and seen pictures of his face, will find it hard or even impossible to make the choice that they will not bring this baby into the world alive, when essentially, he's already alive inside her. 

That's after the abortion period, so by that time it's a moot point.

&gt;She has to make this decision to end this life for the possibility that his disability will cause him to live a lesser life than others. She must choose between being just cruel and aborting the baby, or being possibly cruel, possibly grateful if the baby is born and ends up living a good quality life. Is it not fair that the baby deserves a chance at life?

There's no baby, just a cell clump. The mother is going to have one child. Does that child not deserve a healthy, capable body?

That's a relatively limited birth defect, and not one that is grounds for abortion IMO. It's the severely debilitating conditions that ensure you'll never be independent that should be avoided. Because then you're never going to be more than your parents' pet, let's face it.Yeah, I was aware it was *technically* a rule violation.&gt;The point is that they won't spend any time there, for starters.

Now they don't spend any time in Texas. If the votes are propotional, they're worth 1/26 of the time of Texas as whole - but they're smaller, so they're easier to reach. Candidates will pay attention to them, because in a direct vote *every vote matters*. If no candidates go to state x, then the only candidate that goes there has a big leg up over any other candidate: that's a big incentive to distribute your efforts over the population.

&gt;For another thing, the particular challenge of being a representative democracy in one of the largest countries on earth means that if you don't spread the attention around and address each region with at least reasonably equal levels of support then you have even less coherence as a society; that would generally be bad.

Why is it more important to spread attention to each region equally than to every citizen equally?

And it doesn't do even that: the states are not the same size, so that distorts the attention even further. And in practice, most of the attention goes to the swing states, not even the small states, so it doesn't even work as intended.It's not a black and white issue. You can tailor the size of the debt to a comfortable level, and enjoy the benefits of credit.

The point of frugality and financial independence is to prevent that money matters take over your life: this guy is putting the cart before the horse.You're not saving people by wasting time of the order services with panic stories every time you see a Moroccan in your street - on the contrary.It depends on your local tax laws. He can fiscally optimize the size of the debt and the pace of repayment. A debt is not all or nothing, and frankly, a mortgage debt usually gets better rates than investment credit. He could have used the equity to fund his pension investments instead, for example.I'm currently paying less than I would have to pay in rent for appartment (after paying health insurance - only owner, fixed mortgage payments) and still have a sizable savings buffer, I'm fine. I see no reason to sacrifice my after-work life to pay it off more quickly.

I don't have a crippling mortgage, and I don't need to sacrifice three years of my life - or my life after work - to get rid of it. He still needs to go to work now just like me. I don't quit the supermarket job because I didn't need one to start with, and I can do exactly what he can do now, I actually still have maintained friendships all the time. He has to rebuild all that, so I pity him: he's worse off than me. He just sacrificed three years of his life for slightly more consumption in the coming 20 years. Not a very good deal, IMO.I endorse the right to make jokes.Well, I'm a Nigerian prince and due to some administrative problems I can't access my heritage...Crime rates are higher in the USA.You do need time to spend with them. He didn't have that during  those three years.I don't think it matters at all. You might give me your wallet, but I have nothing to complain about if you don't, even though I would be better off if you did.Well, it depends on your job security I guess. But if he can have three jobs at once, it seems that isn't a problem. Personally I think having a loan actually protects me from the negative effects of inflation: my debt gets smaller relative to my income.Assuming a normal distribution, I would abort the worst 2,5% (spina bifida, etc.), consider to abort the next 15% (Down etc.), and accept the rest. For me an important element to consider is: will the child ever be able to take care for itself and live independently? If not, I see little reason to go through with it. The child has to be able to make its own decisions rather than being my pet project.Sure, and it's hard to draw a sharp line. I think the potential for an independent life is an important threshold.&gt;IMO this is the biggest issue with the op. Everybody is to some extent disabled compared to their peers. Attempting to quantify the point at which it becomes cruel to let them live is incredibly difficult. 

Absolutely. It's not possible to draw an objective line.

&gt;And to be fair, the op said "enjoy life to the fullest". Does anybody fall under that umbrella? I live a pretty good life, but mild depression insures I don't live life to the fullest. Should I have been terminated?

Well, you had a decent chance to do so. Somebody with spina bifida certainly hasn't.&gt; Is this really how you view disabled people? As their caregiver's pet? Just because they need some help their life is no less valuable than another's. 

There's a difference between needing some help and being guaranteed to need personal attention to perform even simply daily routines for the rest of their lives.

&gt;I can't do everything to be independend. I need an electrician for repairs on the electric .. things? in my home. I'm dependent on the grocery store to gather what I need for my cooking and sell it to me. I need my wife against psychological distress (=lonelyness) and physiological release. How is having a household help different? Or staff to help a person who needs a wheelchair shower? It's more personal than the electrician digging through my wall, but that's all. 

You potentially could do all that, albeit perhaps less capably, if you put your mind to it. We just live in a specialized society.Phd's require sustained attention for number of years, there's no way around that. Paying off a mortgage can be paced in many ways. He could have achieved the same result with less cost (to his personal life)... and isn't that the essence of frugality?That's a border case. Those people typically also need supervision before making life decisions like big purchases, taking jobs etc. At that point you're effectively a child for the rest of your life.&gt;If profit is bad, what is the incentive to make goods or perform services if you only do it at cost?

Profit is an indication of a market imbalance. In a perfect market, profit dwindles to zero, and prices are at the lowest possible.

&gt;Not to steal from someone else. You might as well say it's my right to use my computer as I choose to hack into a bank and take your money.

No, because that means I have less money. You can't say that every copy of digital data prevents a sale. If they would *sell* those copies, then yes, it's proof that they denied an income to the original owner. But not if it's for personal use.

&gt;Hardly. "Useful" (which is a shaky claim in this instance) is not the same as "necessary".

I didn't use "useful", what do you intend to say?

&gt;Is the design controlled by patent or copyright?

We're discussing the morality of the practice, not the legality.

&gt;Of course not. Two wrongs don't make a right.

So you won't allow people to fight back against the imbalance in favour of the rich?

As long as you're having fun with it, it's ok. :)The value of the loan dwindles as inflation accrues, but my wage rises with the cost of living; so the mortgage payments will be getting smaller in relation to my wage. If I were to be saving up instead until I had enough to buy a house, then my savings would lose value instead of my loan, but that's to my disadvantage; the loan using value is to the bank's disadvantage.&gt;  "He died for us! He went through all of that for us! Oh God!" I thought that was a bit of an overreaction, to say the least.

Yes, we didn't ask for it. God wanted it. I wish they would keep us out of their family feud.I saw someone else walk out during Ralph Fiennes' "Spider". It's a slow-paced film.I'd recommend that you work a bit and force yourself to imagine the characters, how they look like and how they behave based on the info you get in the first scene where you encounter them. Read more slowly.

Malazan is not a neatly packaged Hollywood story that wraps itself up without loose ends in one big happy ending after two hours. It's a messy world in evolution, and the characters simply aren't always sure what is happening and what it signifies either. So you're not alone in that regard. Some puzzle pieces will only fall into place in later books, or not. That's just a reminder that the world is big and you don't know everything.That's risk management, it's the choice of the parents how much certainty they want. If it's Down syndrome it's pretty sure what the expectable range of possibilities is. Personally I wouldn't bet on the child being the exceptional Down syndromer that can actually live independently.The problem is, as the parent, you *are* judging that beforehand. You are making the choice to say "a spina bifida body is good enough for you: get born" or "nope, that's not good enough for my child, let's try again".If you try to save up instead of taking a mortgage, you're paying rent instead. That's just another form of interest. And rent is gone forever the moment you pay it. With a mortgage, you have ownership of a house.

Credit allows you to invest, and it makes sense or not depending on how wisely you invest... and the inflation rate.

If you save and the inflation is higher than the interest you get, you lose buying power, not to mention the cost of deferring your purchases. Again, it's not black and white.We're not choosing between "does this disabled person get to live or not?" We're choosing between "do we delay the birth of the child with a year so it may have a normal body, or do we let it be born now with the certainty it will have a disability?"Unlike money, you can't get a life more quickly by working harder. He lost the opportunities he would have gotten during those years.Exactly, that's the word for it.That's the base comparison, but there's also the tax returns and the utility you get out of getting your house early: more time to make friends in the area your live, to get your garden going etc.

For housing, you typically also can't choose to forgo that cost: if you rent instead, it's 100% money that is never coming back in any form. For the mortgage at least you have the ownership of the house.Is that frugal? He spent a lot of money on paying off his house fast. IMO that is a frivolous purpose. He could have achieved the same result at much less cost to his personal life.Wouldn't your dad have been better off with a fully functional body? That's the choice here, not between him existing or not. If his parents supposedly aborted the pregnancy, they would have had another one instead. Now they didn't.

Additionally, if someone can parent kids, he can take care of himself, IMO.The threshold is debateable. IMO, not being able to find the way home on your own even from a familiar place qualifies as not being able to take care of yourself. YMMV.The choice is not between a disabled person existing or not. The choice is most likely between the next child of a couple being certainly disabled or not...Nobody is perfect, that is True. But we can with reasonable certainty say that someone who will be clinically retarded will depend on the goodwill and efforts of others to stay alive, and will not be able to realize even trivial ambitions.

Besides, it's not a choice between that person existing or not. It's the choice between trying again by creating a better body. Then you still have a person, that would not have existed otherwise because the handicapped body would take up all the parental investment, and it's not handicapped.&gt;But any place is not my concern.

They will stay somewhere. It's not an argument to take them away from us and put them elsewhere, because that argument applies equally strong to any place... probably even more to most other places.

&gt;Actually, no one has to do it - someone chooses to do it.

No, somebody has to do it. If nobody does it it means they would need to be shot in the neck, because they're always going to be somewhere..

&gt;Being 'better placed' is meaningless, my neighbour is better placed to pay my bills than I am, that doesn't mean he should or will do such a thing. We aren't a charity.

If you ever happen to be in need, we can and will give you support to get back on your feet.

&gt;That's True - but keeping them safe or even them being alive is not my priority if it will negatively affect the economy or our infrastructure. My country's interest is more important to me than their wellbeing.

That's not a black and white issue. If we could save a billion lives by paying 0,01 ct of tax money, then your reason is not good enough not to do it. If we could spend all of our GDP to make a randon person smile briefly, it wouldn't be worth it. That's why we have stuff like human rights conventions: they define what we ought to do, and what we don't need to do. And those say that we ought to assist people who are fleeing a war zone.

&gt; Sometimes they just want to hurt people. Then you put people like my 110-pound little sister in college or 87-year old grandma at a severe disadvantage. Having a gun really helps put them on equal footing.

"Hey little girl/grandma, I'm declaring my intention to hurt you. You better get your purse, get the gun, load it and point it at me without trembling."&gt;None of that makes sense. Why would a robber announce their intention?

That's the point: if they're intending to hurt you you won't get a warning.That's where women keep their stuff. And it's unloaded because otherwise you'd risk triggering it while rummaging through it.I never claimed to speak the absolute truth, nor did I say what he did should be forbidden. &gt; Of course he'd prefer to be without disability but, no, that's not the choice here. When a fetus is aborted, the next pregnancy, if there is one, isn't just genetically identical minus the disability. It's a different fetus.

And? If one other sperm of the millions in the running made it it would have been somebody else too.

And one that wouldn't have been born either if the previous one was kept. So you're going to deny either of those existence. Why not the one that is destined to have a crappy body?

One doesn't exclude the other. Besides "one try after another" isn't going to happen, especially at that age. People who routinely make handicapped foetuses ought to reconsider making them anyway.There is no child yet; otherwise abortion would be murder.&gt; Yes it is. It is a cognitive impairment. If you have never spent a lot of time with someone with a low IQ, then you haven't really experienced what this is like. People with low IQ have a hard time planning ahead and thinking through all the consequences of their decisions. The reason the guy at the grocery store works at the grocery store, is likely because he didn't graduate high school and/or didn't qualify for a better job because those jobs are too difficult.

Low IQ can mean anything from 9 to 99, and it's impossible to draw a hard line where it becomes unacceptable, that's why I sad it.Well, there is human DNA is your hair, so going to the barber would be mutilation then... but we'll leave that discussion for another time.So, run around doing groceries as if you're in a zombie shooter? That's just wildly impractical, and then the people who actually intend to harm you will just wait until you have both hands full or are distracted (when getting in the car for example).13 per card for a 100 card deck is too expensive. It's a freaking piece of cardboard.Brothers of fire and Sisters of the flame also were red.Relax, there's a breeding pair.&gt;And? It didnt.

In both cases it's just one sperm out of a million, and the next available egg that make the next foetus. A cell clump made out of a sperm and an egg isn't particularly more valuable than both of these separately, and yet you have no qualms ditching those by the millions.

&gt;Remember we're not talking about Gattaca-style prenatal genetic manipulation here. We're talking about an existing pregnancy, in which parents already have significant investment in the baby.

There is no baby yet. This all happens before the legally agreed upon limit for abortion is past.

&gt;Concerning a pregnancy that's already underway, knowing the fetus has a disability that doesn't stop them from having a fulfilling and impactful life can be reason enough not to abort.

If you're a pathological gambler perhaps. The disability is certain, the impact and fulfillment is highly unlikely, even much less likely than with a healthy body.

&gt; Nah, sorry. That's a pretty elitist point of view: "You just haven't read it proper" and "Your dumb because you cannot get along with something more intellectual than Hollywood brings you".

No, that's just a description of what genre and setup it is. Hollywood films are made to be unambiguous and easy to get into. That has certain tradeoffs. I like Malazan because it's so much less predictable than Hollywood, and I gladly take a few hundred pages of puzzlement for it. YMMV.

It's like enjoying the view from a mountain peak. Sure, it's a pain to get there, but it's definitely a view you cannot get otherwise. Whether you think that effort is worth it is up to you.

The perfect work of art of course has appeal to any public of any background, education and effort... but perfect works of art are rare.

&gt;The question is, is this book typical aka does it behave the rest of the book like it does in the beginning, or will there some change later on which makes it better?

The main storyline regularly adds mysterious characters and events that seem incomprehensible, but become clearer later. Well, some of them. The second book is very linear with a clear goal and a good cause to identify with - you'll like it better. The third is very gripping if you're sufficiently invested. The fourth is a subversion of a typical fantasy plot, in a sense, with an intro that you probably won't appreciate.

&gt;Example: The first couple of hundred pages on Lord of the Rings are horrible boring*, but it starts to get interesting when Bilbo has left the Shire and Gandalf tells Frodo about the Ring.

I thought it was good illustration of the transition between the normal boring life in the Shire and the grand events later. I suppose the foreshadowing could have been a bit more emphatic.&gt;There is no "market" without respect for property rights.

Market forces still apply: products that aren't getting enough money to sustain themselves will be removed from the market. So the people that *want* these pirated products will find a way to pay for them.

&gt;Copyright is indisputably a form of property

No, it's a monopoly on ideas and a restriction on what information other people can access or disseminate. It's more like censorship-for-profit than property.

&gt;You're just picking and choosing which property rights to adhere to.

The law is not divinely ordained. It's a work in progress.

&gt;Copyright infringement is no more of a natural market force than shoplifting.

Every economist will tell you that protection against theft is a natural cost of doing business. That being said, copyright infringement is not theft.&gt; They exist now.

Nobody is argue for postnatal abortion.

&gt;In light of their being a person now, is it cruel to terminate them when they (arguably) weren't? 

No, just like it isn't cruel to use a condom.

&gt; In the normal situation, you have an actual fetus, and a potential life. In this situation, you have an actual fetus, and an actual life. Viz. cruelty, is there a difference? I think there might be.

I don't see why there is a crucial difference between a cell clump and a sperm and egg. Neither are persons, both are a step on the way to generating a person.I would have picked Count's Hedge instead of Hedging, given that 's Gravenhage is the other form of the name. It makes sense with Duke's Forest on the same map.

You could also put the names of the seas and rivers on it.Besides the point. WOTC can easily print more to allow more people to enjoy it. They aren't entitled to cheap cards, sure, but what's the point of keeping prices high? We all benefit if more people can make the decks they want without being artifically constrained by high card prices. The people who want bragging rights can go nuts on the foil versions, or limited edition alternate art or whatever.If they were printing what the player base needed, there would be no such big price differences, at least not for a long time. 

If some cards are too powerful, there's an easy solution: a ban. There's no such card that is too powerful unless people pay a lot of money for it... Price is not determined by power level alone.&gt; No, it isn't. The market intends people to vote with their wallets: buy things they support, and if they don't want to support it, don't buy it. Live without it to make a point. Theft is not a part of that.

There is no theft here, just copyright infringement. And that does not prevent the market from working: people who produce things for paying customers will fare well, the others not. Traders on the market are only entitled to what people will freely give them for their products, not what they think they should get.

&gt;In what universe are video games and movies free to produce?

The additional copy is free to produce with the tools most people already own.

&gt;Do you think coders and actors work for free? That server time is free? And what services are free? Who is working for zero pay to provide these services?

*Caveat duplicator*. If people like the products of a certain company they'll make sure that company gets their money. If not, they'll have to do without. So if those people are *deliberately* taking the risk of the company going bankrupt (or not, in the case of the very popular titles that make up the bulk of the copied material anyway), then that's a market signal like any other. Despite all the doomsaying, the offer of digital titles or music increases every year: clearly piracy isn't making it harder for producers to keep existing.&gt; I would not forbid glasses and hearing aids.

Then why forbig memory aids?

&gt;I would ask that people not steal them.

They don't.

&gt;And if someone asks you not to recite their poem, that seems perfectly reasonable.

Of course not. I wouldn't even be able to say to my friends "I like this particular passage", because I wouldn't even be able to cite it. That's not how culture works: Shakespeare never was under copyright. Didn't hurt him.
You effectively had ownership.&gt; That doesn't answer my question. Without profit, what is the motivation to provide goods or services?

Making a living.

&gt;How does the end use matter? It should have been a sale and is not.

There should be no poor children, but as yet we don't hold all the people who aren't poor responsible.

&gt;You said pirating was a useful mechanism for encouraging digital distribution, then claimed it was necessary to encourage the same.

I didn't use the word "useful" literally AFAIAC, so please don't quote it as if I did. Hairsplitting about semantics aside, yes, piracy is part of a functioning market.

&gt;I believe compliance with just law is part of morality.

So if the law says that racism is ok, you think that racism is ok?

&gt;Sure, as long as they do so justly.

Givent that you think legal and just are the same, no, people don't win the fight for their rights by staying legal. Civil disobedience is necessary to change anything.That would be True if those creators were all independently wealthy. But they aren't. So them selling their rights "out of their own free will" in the same sense that a slave working for a slave owner to avoid the whip and get food is free will, or you giving up your wallet when faced with the choice "your money or your life" is a *free* choice.

So that practice is a compromise - it may or may not be the desire of the creator to have done so, they just felt it was necessary in order to obtain an income.Sure, the rent vs. inflation concern is usually to the advantage of saving. However, the opportunity costs of delaying a purchase are real too: rent is just one very visible example of that. It's of course rarely as clear as in that example, but it's always True. That's why credit usually is taken out to do investments: people expect to gain more than they lose.If it's too strong for standard they should ban it. If it's not they can print it.&gt; The environmental footprint of Facebook is miniscule relative to the footprint of GE or Exxon, and yet all three are hundred-billion dollar firms.

But Facebook can't exist without GE, and arguably not without Exxon either.&gt; Western European companies are using them.

And? Where I live the same happens: the highways are full of foreign trucks. You'd have a point if you were barred from those roads, but you enjoy them too. That's basically the deal.

&gt;About 10bn euro goes to Western Europe from Czechia in form of dividends every year.

And? The same happens here, but it's from companies and their workers to company owners, a wealthy minority. The exploitation is not geographical, but between classes. A Czech shareholder extracts just as much value per share from the company, the workers and the customers as a German one.

&gt;We opened our markets for EU funds.

To get people to invest at your place.&gt; Not really impractical at all. I keep a small pistol in my pocket or hidden in my waistband, secured with a holster, and I hardly know it's there, much less anyone else.

Doesn't help much if they've got a gun trained on you, or against your back. Unless you're some kind of gunslinger/sharpshooter.

&gt;As for people lying in wait for you, that's just basic situational awareness, whether you carry a gun or not. I always check my surroundings while entering and exiting the vehicle and lock the doors immediately, and I generally use a buggy when carrying groceries, or carry them in such a way that I can drop them and defend myself.

If people were sufficiently situationally aware, then most encounters could be prevented already. But now they aren't, and you have to account for the False positives that are escalated into gunfire by people who are paranoid or misinterprete some situation.If it's not standard legal why not do a reprint?&gt;Well, the description of the police version available in some articles is quite specific...

So, you think that civilians making pictures from their car (if we can believe HLN.Be) *deserve* to be brutalized by a seven man strong police squad, even though they already knew that he is a researcher? They were just looking for a fight, emboldened by the useless terror level bullshit.

&gt;Also, for the representative, maybe he simply did not (have the time yet to) read himself the PV, but was told by some control group of the police that everything was OK with the encounter.

Which makes his testimony utterly useless.Then ban it from standard.Have you read what I wrote? Facebook *cannot exist* without the likes of Exxon and GE to deliver and power the computers it runs on.Magic is more than just standard. Or let the set never enter standard, suits me fine. &gt; We have practical new designs and have now for a while, but no one wants to build them because of public opinion. The EBRII (the one with the non-powered non-human shutdown mechanisms) was tested successfully in the 80's!

Liquid sodium reactors like the EBR II have plenty of problems still, including the price tag, maintenance and corrosion problems. And then it's highly doubtful the breeding is actually economical.

&gt;And as nice as solar is you either have photo-voltaic or thermal solar. Photo-voltaic is still too inefficient for practical use and involves toxic heavy metals in production.

China reigns that market, presently. Production in OECD countries significantly cuts that production pollution of those. Efficiency will matter less as the advantages of mass production are realized, something that is much easier to do with small solar units rather than big nuclear plants. It's easier to mobilize capital on the market for that. The normal panels still will drop in price because of that, but if the panels designed for mass production are there, they will simply become the standard roof covering - very cost-effective, even if the effect is not that much due to the bad latitude.

&gt;Thermal (my personal choice for solar) still requires large, flat, high elevation land mass with sun for the majority of the year - there's only so many places that meet those requirements. And when they don't meet those requirements (night or cloudy) you still need a backup source of energy (eg. coal or oil or nuclear) because we don't have the technology to store that volume of energy yet.

A heat storage solution is included, typically, in these plants. Nuclear can't deal very well with fluctuations either, so they need fossil backup too.

&gt;Granted the Tesla power wall is trying to fill this niche but then you have batteries that go bad and need to be recycled causing more waste. There are physical batteries like pumped storage hydro-electric but these add significant cost and further increase land-mass usage.

Nuclear needs backup too, and all these solutions help us to get more use out of any given power source that doesn't perfectly match up with consumption, which is about any but gas... Those storage options are here to stay no matter which main energy source we ultimately choose, if they won't just be in the electric cars sooner or later.

&gt;Plus solar can be prohibitively expensive for developing countries which have some of the fastest growing use of carbon-based energy.

Developing countries, as a general rule, are closer to the equator (increasing solar production) and have trouble providing the networks needed to transport current produced in a central plant. Solar panels and other renewables are very attractive propositions for remote African villages.

&gt;On top of all of that solar provides an absolutely minuscule amount of power compared to the energy put into producing the plant in the first place.

They pay themselves back in energy terms after a few years, more and less depending on placement.

&gt;I'm not saying solar is impossible, and I think it is prudent to always explore new energy sources, but if you compare nuclear options that we have RIGHT NOW to solar options that we have RIGHT NOW nuclear will win every time.

Actually no, it takes a decade to construct a nuclear plant, and it's likely to be over time and over budget. By that time solar panels have been producing for years already, and you can replace and upgrade them as the economic developments allow - they're within reach of small businesses and private persons, nuclear plants are not. Renewables are much better adapted to a free market.

So nuclear could have its uses if it effectively replaced coal plants, or for very northern/wind-poor countries. For others it's probably best not to bother.

&gt;Some of these new nuclear reactors can be scaled down and a completely sealed, they just run until the fuel is used then you could send it off to be re-filled with fuel and you have a completely off the grid zero emission power source for consumers.

So, dirty bombs delivered at home? I don't think so. Not foolproof enough for human standards :)They can stick to their normal release schedule for standard. Unglued never was in standard either, for example. So, it's not about the tax shift as a whole, only a part of it, because changes in consumption taxes were included in the tax shift.How would you get money out of it?So, let's censor it? Learn to deal with viewpoints from other times, cultures and places instead of being intolerant.[That's all they said](http://www.scribd.com/doc/276683472/VN-rapport-CERD):

&gt; While the Committee understands that the tradition of Sinterklaas and Black Pete is enjoyed by many persons in Dutch society, the Committee notes with concern that the character of Black Pete is sometimes portrayed in a manner that reflects negative stereotypes of people of African descent and is experienced by many people of African descent as a vestige of slavery, which is injurious to the dignity and self-esteem of children and adults of African descent. The Committee is concerned about the discriminatory effect of such portrayals, which may convey a conception at odds with the Convention. The Committee is furthermore concerned at reports that citizens seeking to peacefully protest against such portrayals have been denied authorization to conduct such protests at a meaningful time and place and have been subjected to violent attacks and other forms of intimidation, which have not been adequately investigated. (arts. 2, 5 and 7). 18.
 
&gt;Considering that even a deeply-rooted cultural tradition does not justify discriminatory practices and stereotypes, the Committee recommends that the State party actively promote the elimination of **those features** of the character of Black Pete **which reflect negative stereotypes** and are experienced by many people of African descent as a vestige of slavery. The Committee recommends that the State party find a reasonable balance, such as a different portrayal of Black Pete and ensure respect of human dignity and human rights of all inhabitants of the State party. The Committee further recommends that the State party ensure non-discrimination in the enjoyment of freedom of expression and association, and that attacks on protesters be effectively investigated and duly prosecuted

Basically, they shouldn't give him a Surinamer accent. Which makes sense.&gt;1) Zwarte Piet hasn't been banned and isn't going to be banned. The tradition will evolve, like he once evolved from Krampus.

It could have evolved, but now that it's under attack, it's more likely that people will double down and preserve it. You should just have put your version of Zwarte Piet in practice, and if more people liked it, it would have crowded out the others after time. But forcing the issue rarely delivers the intended result.

&gt;2) Nobody makes people put on blackface in movies anymore to play slaves, that's exactly one of the reasons why in a globalizing world, you really can't be prancing around like that anymore. So yes, we have definitely changed our code for fictional movies, where the "greedy jew" and the "dumb, cowardly slave" are archtypes that aren't welcome anymore.

The blackness is an essential part of the costume and not a racial stereotype. Even an African playing Zwarte Piet should put pitch black paint on, or he's simply not Zwarte Piet.&gt; I held the same opinion for a long time until a mate told me a touching, and quite frankly hilarious, story about how he was the only black kid growing up in a very west-vloandren village, and while I'm sure everyone involved meant really well, they introduced him to the only other coloured person he'd ever seen around there, Davy the mildly retarted bakers son they'd painted black for the occasion. 

What has Zwarte Piet to do with that mildly retarded village?

&gt;I've dropped piet for the sake of the many lovely nigglets I see around me because they, in their part, will determine what we will become and we shouldn't hold them back because of what we once were.

Using the word nigglet is far more racist than Zwarte Piet... Why would they be held back by Zwarte Piet any more than by Mega Mindy or the Smurfs?
Then it's just taxed as a wage.I don't see who doesn't recognize that, it's quite obvious. The court case against the album actually tried to ban it.&gt; What I'm arguing is that prenatal abortion of actualized persons can be described as "cruel". 

There is no person at that point.

&gt;Right, but in light of you existing now, would it have been "cruel" for your parents to use a condom? 

No.

&gt;I'm pointing to a difference between the two situations. I.e.: In one situation, you have an actual fetus, and a potential life. In another situation, you have an actual fetus, and an actual life. Do you think that matters?

No, unless you think that skinning and boiling a live potato is cruel.&gt; Once again, crime isn't a "market force".

Of course it is.

&gt;This is just your personal opinion, which is diametrically opposed to the law.

If you only take the law as the final word, then why are we discussing at all?

&gt;This is laughable. You might as well say the ownership of buildings and vandalism laws are "censoring" graffiti artists or that the ownership of timber rights are "censoring" would-be furniture makers. 

Buildings and timber are rival goods: if person A takes them, person B loses them. Not so for digital copies.

&gt;Any two bit thief could use this same shitty excuse...

We're discussing what the law should be. If you don't accept anything but what the law is right now, the discussion is pointless.That's besides the point: as long as the "new" GDP depends on the previous big footprint GDP, they will never be able to replace the older GDP and thereby reduce total footprint.Actually because the Prussians didn't want to border Belgium.&gt; There is a person now. I'm pointing to an actualized person and asking, "What if they had been aborted?

That's n/a. Living persons don't get aborted, that's murder.I don't see why golden earrings are racist. White people wear golden earrings. Rich, famous black people wear golden earrings. It would be nice to put a page in front of it to notify the reader of the changed social norms, so it should be read as a historical document though. That wouldn't hinder.&gt; Good point and I misrepresented my thoughts.

Consider handing out a delta. They're not just for total opinion flips.&gt; Right, but in their personal history, there's the possibility that they could have.

No, there isn't: that would be murder.

&gt;Given that they're an actualized person now, standing before you, would that have been cruel? 

Not crueler than considering that a brother or sister of them might have been born instead if of them, if there just was a tiny random chance difference in which sperm would have arrived first at the egg.Most lethal accidents happen at home.An airplane can still crash on top of him.

You can't avoid getting an accident at home either.Until you need to brake suddenly. Then it increase fuel consumption in one big flash.&gt; It would be murder to have aborted an actualized person when they were a fetus?

The story of the foetus that became their body is not their personal history any more than the story of their dad's balls is.

&gt;That could be cruel too. 

Why? That's hard, even with good intentions.And why is that? Because the EU institutions are hamstrung by national interests, facing vetoes, national-appointed commissioners, a hamstrung parliament etc... all in the name of national sovereignty.&gt; If people like you don't understand that you are in the minority, then people like me will start voting parties like FN, because main political parties leave us no choice. You, leave me no choice.

Lol, you're going to vote for the parties that say "we have to get rid of that Eastern European beggar scum"?There already is a very simple solution: websites can notify which parts they open to be crawled and indexed in robots.txt. They're free to forbid all the content of their site to be indexed. Of course, that means a lot less google hits, but you can't have your cake and eat it too... They want to gather as much attention/customers for their product as possible, but also want to stop anyone to even refer to it without permission.

Apparently a lot of people think otherwise, and even if it is, it's a complete subversion: Zwarte Piet is cheered upon arrival, wears luxurious clothing, brings presents, is very active and welcome everywhere, about the polar opposite of the average racist stereotype.Nonsense, it's the basic free portions of basic necessities like water an electricity that are taxed - a guaranteed tax hike for those with the lowest incomes, who don't have much options to shift their expenses because they can barely afford the necessities as it stands.We're all just human resources as far as our business overlords are concerned. Welcome in the 21st century."Deployable".Then they can have an accident involving a CO-generating boiler in their airtight bunker. There is no such thing as absolute safety.&gt; It's their biological history. Making light of it doesn't change that fact. 

We'll decline to argue about the semantics - why does that even matter? There's a lot of coincidence involved in gamete selection. If you parents took a different position during coitus a brother or sister of yours would have been born instead of you. I don't think that fact is curel or offensive.

&gt;The fact that life requires much death isn't cruel? I think you can argue it either way.

There's a lot of unrealized potential in life, but that's inherent to the phenomenon of life and reality. It's not especially cruel, it's normal. And we try to make the best of it within those constraints.&gt;If you are honest with yourself you know that something just doesn't feel right. 

The thing is, the wrong things *already* are corrected slowly and without a fuzz. Zwarte Piet is no longer an obedient slave ready to mete out punishment with the rod, he's a fun companion of Sinterklaas, integral part of the tradition.

&gt;10 years ago this POV was ridiculed. Now there is resistance. And in another 20 years people will have moved on.

It wasn't ridiculed, it was absent.

&gt;ZP looking like this is hardly what makes or breaks Sinterklaas anyway.

I can't accept that precedent. I think people should essentially be able to dress up like anything they want unless there's a practical necessity to forbid it. That includes both hijabs and Zwarte Piet costumes. If you forbid the latter "because it reminds of slavery" you have no leg to stand on when people also forbid the former "because it reminds of inequality between sexes".&gt; Well, you can, but not by that method. Media would prefer, I presume, that aggregators index their articles and link to them, but not offer summaries, or at least not summaries that are sufficient in themselves.

Robots.txt gives that option.

&gt;Obviously, a web without aggregators would be highly inconvenient for most of us, but not, equally obviously, for the branded media, who would thereby resume their old position as news gatekeepers.

That alone illustrates in whose interests this legislation is proposed..

It's a small consolation that it has the potential to backfire spectacularly. Link aggregators will still be useful without all the commercial sites, but the commercial sites will be a lot less profitable - if at all - without traffic from the former.You could mod rules.txt to get that effect. For example, (drastically) increasing the cost of improvements (both build cost and upkeep) or the cost to maintain population (food) would discourage to spam bases in the early game because they're expensive to get going, and high upkeep of eg. high-end defense would ensure that you even want to dismantle small, not very productive bases because they would be a net loss in energy cost if you had to maintain and defend them properly, and not doing so risks revolts and is a military liability.

(Or drop down the difficultly level and do whatever the fuck you want with the map, including surgical removal of eyesore AI colony placement.)

Some flat bonuses per base are inevitable, but you can at least make satellites prohibitively expensive if you don't want a rush to singularity every time.
Playing with blind research helps too for a more "make do with what you've got" feeling.

I've also made a mod for the old Civ2 with a lot of tweaks, that effectively made it possible for cities to have a population that doesn't always automatically max out and is only constrained by aquaduct/sewer system - sometimes the terrain just doesn't support it.&gt; Nobody is "forbidding" anything? The basis of this free society we're so proud of, is that I have the right to criticize customs and beliefs I disagree with and that I can advocate change. I am not forcing you, this is a dialogue ...

It would have been nice if it was, but it has been quite a frontal attack rather than a dialogue with a reasoned point of view that was open for discussion. No, we got ZWARTE PIET IS RACIST BECAUSE IT MAKES ME FEEL BAD underbelly politics that come uncomfortably close to actually racist political slogans.

&gt;Frankly. The fact that people are this defensive about it is a tell tale sign that people feel there's something not completely kosher about the whole tradition from a rational viewpoint.

So, if people disagree with you it means you are right? I thought this was a dialogue?It's the dominant ideology, much like Christianity was in the Middle Ages.&gt;I am saying that there are RELATIVE amounts of safety, and a huge difference between one easily preventable danger (sharks-&gt;don't go to the beach) and a random danger that is not easily preventable (terror attacks).

There are 0,5 shark deaths every year. Yes, one death every two years. People worrying about shark attacks are just paranoid - we shouldn't take that as the standard.

&gt; Do you realize that the argument you are making is akin to saying, "There's no such thing as absolute safety, and purified bottle water probably has some contaminant in it anyway, so let's just fuck it all and drink urine and shit water instead!"
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; Do you now realize how retarded that sounds?

It sounds retarded because that's your straw man. I'm making a different argument: I'm saying that it's impossible to drink sterile water, so you might as well drink tap water instead of insisting on ever purer water, because there are a lot of diminishing returns on those safety efforts and they make an almost negligible difference anyway.&gt; Not that I'm aware of - you seem to be saying there's a capability in robots.txt for allowing crawlers access to only an article title but not the content, and I don't think that's the case. You can bar access to article pages entirely, certainly (depending on your site structure), but that's the level robots.txt operates at - the whole document level.

[You can choose which subdirectories you open to crawlers, and which not.](http://www.robotstxt.org/robotstxt.html)

&gt;The legislation doesn't propose a web without aggregators.

If every link is subject to a fee or permission, that might as well be the result. The more likely result is of course that they'll be delisted from Google and come back begging to be put on again.&gt; Any societal problem is going to have people yelling, what you're doing now is acting as if those voices are the only ones that spoke up, which is intellectually dishonest.

The problem is that the yelling came first and the rest is post-hoc rationalization. And not a sturdy one to boot.

&gt;Also, a dialogue does not entail me saying that I'm wrong, of course I think I'm right. It's not the fact that people disagree that I'm pointing at, but how (basically refusal to take the other seriously, which is some defensive shit cognitively speaking).

This just illustrates the weakness of the anti-Piet side. They can't give objective arguments why Zwarte Piet is racist, but instead rely on vague references to some undefined context, some people's feelings and the style of arguing of their opponents - carefully avoiding to actually say straight out what specifically it is that bothers them at any time. 

&gt; but how (basically refusal to take the other seriously, which is some defensive shit cognitively speaking).

Gee, that's exactly the impression I got whenever I brought up a cogent argument that they can't answer. They say something like "Well, yeah,right,... but it's still racist!".&gt; It matters because it's the topic of this CMV. 

No, the topic of this CMV is whether it's cruel to have a baby, knowing it will be disabled. Where exactly the biological history of a person started is not relevant, because at that point there's no choice to terminate the pregnancy anymore.Then why spoil the effect by saying otherwise in the bible?No, he put Jesus here because he wanted to torture him to death. That's his own family affairs, no need to involve us in it.Well, he did give a delta elsewhere.Flemish is just the collective noun for all the variations of Dutch spoken in the Northern parts of Belgium.You learn to see that the vocabularies are not that different. Speaking languages is like playing musical instruments, you have to get the hang of holding the instrument right, but in the end you're still playing music with any instrument.Try counting how many people India has while you're at it, and correct for size.&gt; En plus je change toujours tr\u00e8s vite vers le fran\u00e7ais quand je parle \u00e0 une personne francophone, m\u00eame quand je sais que la personne sait parler le n\u00e9\u00e9rlandais.

Plus que \u00e7a change, plus ce que \u00e7a reste la m\u00eame chose... De huidige standaard in meertalige omgevingen is toch al even dat iedereen zijn eigen moedertaal spreekt, en voldoende kennis heeft van de andere taal om passief te kunnen begrijpen - het is een relatief kleine en haalbare inspanning in vergelijking met actief een andere taal te leren spreken, terwijl ze toch gelijk verdeeld is.&gt; As an alternative they could have just talked at the entrance of the school

Not if the parents don't bring the kids themselves or just drop them off somewhere in the street

&gt;, organize a info session with some background, 

Doesn't work if they don't show up.

&gt;have some informal contacts with parents.

Teachers don't have time to spend an hour visiting the parents for every minor issue like this one.

&gt; You could talk to important figures in the community

Now *that* would reduce their identity to just one aspect: being allochtoon/muslim.

Fact of the matter is that this letter just stressed the importance for mutual respect, I'm sure the school has applied plenty of it while dealing with hungry and tired kids during Ramadan. 

What remains are some imperfections and clumsiness in the wording of the letter - well duh, you can't expect every local school to have a communication expert to avoid any and all fuckups. They should do better next time. It's not worth a newspaper article.They effectively are.Presumeably he wanted to elicit a discussion about the appropriateness of different countries being in the EU (though it just seems that being secular-rational is the defining trait of the EU). 

Feel free to download the picture, draw a line on it that includes the whole continent, and post it to the thread!&gt; With such thoughts you might directly want to remove people aged of 75+ year that pose 4x as much risk on the roads than a middle-aged man.

Worth considering to deny people from a certain age from driving 90/h or more - or perhaps just introduce a regular medical checkup for driving license holders that tests their reaction speed.

&gt; And to ban bicycles and motors who have respectively 20x and 50x more risk to die/be seriously injured than a median car driver... 

Bicycles and motors are radically different means of transport. Way to blame the victim, anyway: bicycles don't kill people by driving over them. The problem is that cars don't pay enough attention, and that traffic is mixed where it is inappropriate.

&gt; Four times as many deadly accidents happen on the 70-90 roads than on the motorways. Only 10% of serious injuries occurs on a motorway. http://www.hln.be/hln/nl/957/Binnenland/article/detail/1656441/2013/06/22/Meer-verkeersdoden-in-zone-70-en-90-dan-op-snelwegen.dhtml

That's exclusively due to the fact that zone 70 and 90 has crossroads and highways don't. If anything it's an argument to lower the speed even more where there are a lot of crossings.&gt; What? That seems like a terrible analogy. The vocabularies are different. Lots of different words for the same object you have to memorize. Even if I found a language that was a 1:1 in sentence structure to English, it would still be a monumental task to learn the words and speak it.

The vocabularies are very similar actually for most indo-European languages. In particular if you already know English or Dutch then you already have a set of words of both Latin and Germanic origin. It's not monumental. A three year old can do it :) Of course, you can't do it all at once before starting to speak. You have to start with a little and then expand your vocabulary... just like your primary language.&gt; It's not just about energy, it's about a combination of things. Energy, technology, and location. Imagine if our factories were predominantly based on the Moon. That would mean they can't pollute the landscape of earth, but could crank out even more goods nonetheless. It would mean we can go anywhere in the solar system almost as cheap as accessing LEO because our rockets can be refueled in space. It would mean that the factories can produce entirely new factories and always have a place to put these new factories. It is a very different paradigm than industrial growth on the planet's surface.

Where do you get all these resources? Regolith isn't that good of an ore for anything. Organic materials still need to come from earth. And there is no way we have enough resources to make rocket service to and from the moon as cheap as international ship transport.&gt; In a battle, the goal isn't to wipe out the oppenent, it's to remove the opponent from key areas until they eventually have to foothold.

So, in this case you're going to remove the Americans from the USA?&gt;Right, because that's how desertion works? It isn't. It is people saying that they are refusing that order and leaving. There would never be an organized effort to oust a regime from within the military ranks as that is treason and the penalty would be death.

And fighting as a rebel doesn't risk death? Military coups happen.

&gt;  In a end game scenario like we are discussing, there wouldn't even be a trial. No one is going to risk starting an underground within the military, they would leave an join the outside resistance.

[Wouldn't they?](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Assassination_attempts_on_Adolf_Hitler)What happens to people who resist arrest with a gun? Does the police say "My bad, you are obviously an upright citizen fighting for his freedom! We'll leave you alone and forget the charges."It is indeed very likely that a tyrannical regime in a society where gun ownership is common would encourage militias of loyal supporters, that would enforce conformity with the regime on the local level. Not only freedom fighters would have guns, the regime supporters would have too, and given that they're tyrannical supporters, they would be far less shy to use them oppressively.Assuming nothing ever goes wrong with the heavy metals and radioactivity in the nuclear waste..&gt; This is because there are monopolies on solid fuels. Each solid fuel reactor design is serviced by one proprietary source of solid fuel, for example most light water reactors in the USA can only get fuel from one company and one company alone: GE.
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; Yes, it is a regulatory problem.

Are you really proposing that we encourage people to produce nuclear materials as cheaply as possible? What could possibly go wrong?

&gt;Liquid fuel reactors can fit into the area of a small warehouse, 

If you ignore all the support infrastructure.

&gt;have zero meltdown risk (their failure state is completely inert), 

You have to take into account that an earthquake or fire destroys certain mechanisms and leaves others intact.

&gt;and each reactor can power a small city.

Not on its own, they're too inflexible and need peak support just like renewables would.

&gt;Literally not even solid fuel designs after 1960 and literally ZERO liquid reactor designs.

There's no guarantee that the structure of a reactor remains intact when it fails. On the contrary, even.

&gt;No. Liquid fuel actinides are dangerous on the scale of hundreds of years and can be reprocessed into more fuel.

What can happen in the best possible scenario is far less important than what will actually happen.

&gt;Fukushima is a 1960s reactor design, built on a major faultline, BUILT ON A COAST SUSCEPTIBLE TO TIDAL WAVES, and horrible mismanaged for over 30 years with the international community fully aware of their oversights and safety issues.
Educate yourself.

So? It was a nuclear plant, they promised all necessary safety precautions were taken... and then it turns out they were either incompetent or lying. Let's not risk that.Watch out with averages. It can hide a large divergence between completely unemployed and completely overworked people.&gt; Een van de grootste problemen voor Franstaligen bij voorbeeld is dat ze geen gelegenheid krijgen om Nederlands te spreken omdat Nederlandstaligen snel naar het Frans overschakelen.

Inderdaad, dat is \u00e9\u00e9n van de redenen waarom het niet altijd ideaal is om het volgende te doen: "En plus je change toujours tr\u00e8s vite vers le fran\u00e7ais quand je parle \u00e0 une personne francophone, m\u00eame quand je sais que la personne sait parler le n\u00e9\u00e9rlandais."

Het blijft een evenwicht zoeken natuurlijk.&gt; There really is a lot of expertise ready in terms of effective communication with parents and other stakeholders in an education context. The letter in the backpack has been proven ineffective. You could argue that it should be, but that doesn't change the fact it isn't. There's a difference in expected behavior and existing behavior. A school can expect that parents read letters all they want, if that isn't happening there's no point in continuing to do so.
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; 
&gt; You pointed out a few flaws in alternatives that I have offered. Rightfully so, no method is 100% effective. The most effective way is always to focus on multiple channels: do a letter, talk with parents at the school entrance, look for key figures in the local community.

Well, they already tried the letter. Presumeably they'll follow up with the next, more time-consuming, steps, if the previous ones don't solve the problem.

&gt; Again, you're not really on topic. My point was, and still is, that using the ability to "live independently" as a blanket criteria for abortion eliminates a lot of productive people from society

If they're productive they can sustain themselves... that's sufficient qualification for independent.

&gt;it's an uninformed way of looking at the huge range of severity within the label 'disability' and what various conditions say about quality of life. 

No, it's actually a way to focus on the real effects of the disability rather than the label by testing them against an observable criterium.

&gt;Your response has been to waffle on the requirements for "living independently" and to make incorrect statements about the nature of the argument.

I never said it was a strictly defined criterium, in particular because there's a matter of chance.

&gt;Then replace 'baby' with 'fetus' and read it again. It doesn't change anything.

There can not be a signficant parental investment in a foetus. At that point it's a cell clump, they're just aware of it and running tests to see what potential futures it offers. At that point abortion still is an option, for various reasons - not a fun or costless one, but definitely an option and it may very well be the lesser evil. It's a sunk cost.

&gt;Are you actually attributing the choice to keep a fetus with a disability to a gambling addiction? 

I think it's a similar example of bad decision making. It's like driving drunk because there is a reasonable chance that you'll arrive home without causing an accident.

&gt;Okay, prove it.

People with a disability do get specific support. That means they have it significantly harder to live than other people.

The relations weren't very different. When you wanted a place to live you'd have to ask the lord of the land, who would grant you a piece of land in exchange for rent. Now you ask the bank, who gives you a mortgage in exchange for interest. There also used to be more customary days off at some point... most of the advances are technological. It's of course better in other aspects too, but not very much. There is much work left to do.The variation within any population group far, far exceeds the variation between groups on average.No, it just means that you have to make sure meritocracy is applied correctly. The best ones, regardless of heritage, will end up on top then.Why is Apartheid a bad idea?There is no silver bullet one-size-fits-all solution to the energy crisis. We'll have to use the most appropriate source depending on local circumstances. And let's not forget demand management.&gt;Yes, that's possible. That doesn't allow you to allow crawlers access to article titles but not article content for summaries, which is the "having your cake and eating it" you were suggesting.

They can generate a page with only the titles that directly refers to the page they want the people to end up on.

&gt;There's no question of that. That version is either pure hysteria or cynical scaremongering.

It's the basic principle of the proposal.

They can generate a text-only title-only page that directly refers any visitors to the real page, and allow only that page for robots. It's an easy technical solution to achieve that, so I suspect that they have ulterior motives.&gt; Vague references? What? The bloated lips, the curled hair?

Heaven forbid we have non-Aryans in our children's activities! I see no problem with having Africans there. /s

Not to mention that as a general rule a Zwarte Piet wig is longer than the stereotypical African curl, and in costume the lips are accentuated with red, not bloated. Research indicates that children associate Zwarte Piet with [clowns](http://static5.businessinsider.com/image/51ffe7b66bb3f7221e000003/a-brief-history-of-clowns-and-why-theyre-so-darn-scary.jpg) rather than Africans. And that checks out: if the face paint were white and the wig orange, it would be obvious. So we shouldn't treat Zwarte Piet any different simply because he has unfamiliar colors.

&gt;The jewelry?

Tiger Woods, Oprah Winfrey, Michelle Obama and a legion of rappers have all been seen wearing golden earrings. Clearly black people don't see anything wrong with that.

&gt; The post-hoc "oh, that's the chimney?".

Do you really expect a children's tale to be logically sound? It's like complaining that Mega Mindy teaches the wrong physics because people don't fly, so it should be banned! Zwarte Piet is a clutter of influences, and the moor was picked at some point in time because of the colorful costume, the exotism and the fact that back then he was used to *scare* children: moors actually used to raid European coasts to gather slaves. So he's actually a slaver rather than a slave. Whoops, that doesn't fit the victim mentality.

Luckily we did away with the nasty elements and now he's just a fun companion.

&gt;He's not his servant, he just loves to walk and carry shit!

Children's figures have recognizable tasks and characters. [Zwarte Piet is not the only playful sidekick](http://www.raaskalderij.be/2013/02/filiberke-krijgt-gas-boete/). Lambik is clumsy and boastful. Flip is the smart parrot. Fanny always dumps her boyfriends. Kabouter lui is lazy. It's not different from Knutselsmurf always being the one that repairs stuff. It's no hidden anti-Polish stereotype or something.

The current negative stereotype about foreigners is that they're too lazy and incapable to work. If anything, Zwarte Piet conteracts that stereotype.

AFAIA concerned, abortion ceases to be an option after the legal term and then it's just living with the consequences of your decisions.No, this what happens:

[Edward Lewis Brown (born 1942) and his wife, Elaine Alice Brown (born c. 1940), residents of the state of New Hampshire, gained national news media attention as tax protesters in early 2007 for refusing to pay the U.S. federal income tax and subsequently refusing to surrender to federal government agents after having been convicted of tax crimes.[1] After the conviction and sentencing, a long, armed standoff with federal law enforcement authorities at their New Hampshire residence ended with the arrest of Edward and Elaine Brown on October 4, 2007.[2][3][4] In July 2009, while serving their sentences for the tax crimes, the Browns were found guilty by a federal district court jury of additional criminal charges arising from their conduct during the standoff.]
(https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Edward_and_Elaine_Brown)Some people claim it's necessary for it. I take neither of that position, but let's not get into that debate at this time.&gt; Be that True or not, it doesn't negate the fact that there are significant differences between the races on average.

The differences aren't significant in the sense that they don't warrant different civil rights.

&gt; It also doesn't negate the human concept of race or tribalism.

That happens regardless of any real ground for it.

&gt;It also doesn't negate the fact that homogenous societies are much more simple and peaceful than multicultural heterogenous ones. 

It's also easier to stay dry in dry weather rather than in rain. But it's not a good idea to try to live in the desert.Yes, very good: http://www.vacature.com/carriere/salaris/Hoeveel-Belgen-verdienen-meer-dan-2-100-euro-netto

Especially if you're likely to increase that during the rest of your career (besides inflation adaptations, of course).

&gt;We were not including benefits like company car. 

You should, it's an integral part of your wage package.

The top 30% skews the average.At any time, a large part of these gun toting Americans will be on the side of the dictators.Go to the playground if you think calling other people childish is meaningful conversation.Well, neither has the market, nor are single analysts failproof...No, it isn't, not in a game where you can play with multiples of the same card, where opponents can have the same card and numerous options for creating tokens and even copying abilities exist.

They could say "this creature" or "this permanent", and then it would work perfectly and unambiguously when the ability is copied somehow.Tiny *rock* umbrellas, menacing with spikes of hematite.Nuclear launch sequence initiated. This is not a drill.&gt; More speci\ufb01cally, Woodley asserts that individuals with higher cognitive ability are more likely to be aware of the advantages of adhering to norms and beliefs dominant in one\u2019s society and hence will shift their own attitudes and beliefs towards this normative centre. As a result, and in line with the present \ufb01ndings, in societies with rather liberal norms (such as most Western societies), individuals with greater cognitive skills are predicted to be generally more left-wing. However, in societies characterized by more conservative and rightist norms and belief systems, one could expect those individuals to shift to the right side of the spectrum. 

Mmmm... adherence to authority is more a right-wing characteristic. IMO the link is there because the left wing is about invest in people/causes now to see the benefits later and elsewhere, and that requires some predictive ability. In addition, compromising and negotiation requires more solid analytical skills to be certain you're not screwed rather than "these are our rules, our money and our country, obey or GTFO" - it's easier to avoid feeling threatened when you know what's going on.What is noninterference? If a pedestrian crossed the road, should the AI not interfere and not brake the vehicle it's driving? Or not interfere and not run over the pedestrian? But at that point the traffic will slow down, slowing the delivery of life-saving goods and services... and so on. The outcome of these large-scale balancing acts is unintuitive.

That's why we shouldn't let AI make those balancing decisions on the fly, merely give it an informative function. Politics and ethics should remain human decisions.... By pretending that the laws in both countries are equivalent, guaranteeing that our products are made in the cheapest way that either legislation allows... likely giving us the worst of both sets of legislations in every area.No, because it transfers power from democratically mandated governments to international capital.It's the same like Britons and British.Between Austrian German and German German. Or between North German and South German for that matter.The nuclear lobby is getting really desperate now: "it's better than coal!". Well duh, *anything* is.No, coal use is rising because it's quick and dirty and people can work with it. Nuclear energy is a big dinosaur that takes decades and billions, and then you're left with a bunch of crap that keeps costing money and keeps causing problems afterwards. For all its faults renewable energy can be installed piece by piece, making it a much better fit for humans.&gt;Real enough that the deaths per unit energy generated is the lowest for nuclear?

If you discount any future cost and ignore low-risk big-impact events.

&gt;The problem with those is that the energy is intermittent and storage is nowhere near up to the task of compensating for that.

That's a solvable problem, by things we should do anyway like upgrading the network, demand management and improved storage in the long run.

&gt;The truth is that nuclear can and should support renewables, both by providing a baseline source of energy, and by making the EROEI of a nuclear plus renewables system high enough to support a modern civilization. Renewables need nuclear. You're just going to have to come to terms with that. 

Actually nuclear doesn't have much to offer to renewables: the only thing they need is a way to make up for the gaps, and nuclear is the worst possible candidate for that, because it's not very flexible in production. In fact, nuclear needs flexible capacity itself to be able to cope with peaks... so they're competing with renewables in that regard. They're also competing for money - no nuclear plant has ever been built without subsidies, but plenty of renewables have. Wind electricity often undercuts nuclear electricity on the spot market. Nuclear energy requires huge capital commitments, while renewables can be built piece by piece if need be. Lastly, renewables are advancing much faster technologically. It'll be a clear case of a small and nimble challenger outmanoeuvering the big old dinosaur, in hindsight.

Call us when they're ready. I'll be on my roof, installing solar panels.It used to be more expensive, but the price has dropped.&gt;  So what's "neoliberal" about a "strongly regulated housing market"?

The neoliberal part is that the state stopped building appartments to fill the demand. So, the worst of both worlds.The stereotypical Irish hair is reddish though.As it stands, the regulation in the USA is even stricter than that in the EU right now... In any case it won't end up being to the advantage of lower or middle class people.Right wingers often base themselves on tradition, homogeneity of their in-group and deference to the instruments of authority, like police and the army or any hierarchy in general. Leftwingers on the other hand practice strikes, civil disobedience, questioning authority, prefer an egalitarian society rather than a hierarchical one and generally aim to change society rather than keeping it static.&gt;So in markets with exceptional prices and exceptional geography.

Perhaps you need to reevaluate what is normal in geography: [most people in the world live on a latitude where they get at least as much sun as in the Mediterranan](http://bigthink.com/strange-maps/563-pop-by-lat-and-pop-by-long). And where people live, that's where the consumption is. Right above that latitude you have a zone with [strong winds](http://www.artinaid.com/wp-content/uploads/2013/03/Mapa-de-Velocidad-del-Viento-en-el-Mundo.jpg). So geography will not be the limiting factor in the long run. 

&gt;In a normal market its simply impossible to build renewable energy projects without subsides. 

Which subsidies? I just gave you an article that explicitly deals with examples of the lack of subsidies. I'll repeat: no nuclear plant has ever been constructed without significant state support.

&gt;It is, but its still twice the capacity factor of our wind turbines on the sea. Three times that of our land based turbines and 7 times that of our solar energy. 

Windmills are actually put on non-active when there is an oversupply, because they're easier to throttle than nuclear. So that's a measure of the actual production, not the potential.

Capacity factor is a non-problem, really. What matters is actual supply delivered. Whether that is achieved by one plant delivering at 100% or 10 plants delivering at 10% of capacity doesn't really matter - it's just a different construction price to build either the excess capacity or some other way to balance supply and demand over space and time.

&gt;Once D3 &amp; T2 are restarted next year capacity factors of 90% will return.

Doesn't really matter, does it? We need the backup from other sources, no matter if we only need it once every ten years or once every ten days. The capacity has to be there.

&gt;Well they are simply the cheapest plants to run

... After a bunch of implicit and explicit subsidies in the past and in the future.

&gt;why would you choose to use power plants like gas plants which are 3 times more expensive to run?

The point is that observed use cannot be equated with actual production potential: you have to account for the policy choices of energy companies.&gt; Evaluate and research? You are already in the supermarket. All you need to do is use you arm to pick up the product and then use your eyes to read. If that is too much work for you then we have bigger problems lol.

The contents of the product are one thing, its production practices, production chain and corporate structure another. They can hide their dirty practices in a subsidiary, that's not something you can find out in five minutes on your smartphone, and really, five minutes per product that you *could* buy? You'd be in the supermarket all day just to get groceries.

&gt;But seriously, if it is a brand you don't recognize then don't buy it. Fairly simply if you want to avoid researching. Not signing TTIP seems more of like it being an inconvenience to you more than anything

That's nonsense, brands change all the time, and the market can't function without innovation. Ensuring that a product that reaches the shelves abides by certain minimal standards, at least those that I can't evaluate then and there without making a day job out of it, is a core task of government and as essential for the functioning of a common market as *roads*.

&gt;Not signing TTIP seems more of like it being an inconvenience to you more than anything

Well, TTIP is only about the convenience of transnational capital, so what gives?How will you verify that a person has the right age, citizenship and lives in the right voting district? How will you prevent people from voting multiple times?

&gt;keeping millions from voting. 

How on earth does an ID requirement keep people from voting?

If anything, it's the silly exercise in red tape that is voter registration that keeps people from voting. With a permanent ID you don't need to waste time on that bullshit. Or hold elections on an off-day, so people who need to work can actually vote. That's both much more taxing for time-pressed people than ID.You have to account for one simple fact: I can rechargy my electric vehicle at home, with at most a one-time investment to change the wiring, which probably comes with the car.

But nobody can charge their combustion vehicle at home. The only reason they're more convenient is the existing network of fuel stations. So, ICE's are actually at a disadvantage compared to EV's, and only the benefit of historical infrastructure keeps in business. With only a small improvement in either battery size, weight or charging times, it will become more affordable for more people to have an EV, and at some point the fuel stations will do the relatively small investment to make it possible to recharge there... the fact that it could still take 20-30 minutes will only stimulate them to do it faster, since those people will likely buy a drink at their charging station. In fact, even the more fancy restaurant might do it, to attract customers - charge while you eat, and then others will imitate. And once EV's have a better network than now, the ball starts rolling and EV's take over.

But I agree that significant investment by someone with deep pockets would make it happen faster, be it in charging infrastructure, mass production or technology research.&gt; They said the same exact thing about cell phones in the '80s: "They're too expensive", "The batteries don't last", "They're too big and bulky", "Normal people will never use them"

Well, and that all is still True for 80's-style cellphones...For a fuel station owner 500$ of investment is almost negligible. Part of the investment comes right back through reduced taxes already, and the rest can easily be recouped by either charging fees or the extra profit by people buying a drink, snack and newspaper while charging... and that's ignoring the PR: they profile themselves as high-tech and attract wealthier customers, at least initially. And at some point it becomes expected standard equipment.&gt; Electric cars will likely gain prominence among suburban people, and then slowly move into cities.

Suburban people are the biggest car users, and there you'll find the ones who actually do have very long commutes. If anything small electric vehicles will be easier in the city than ICEs, and the smaller the vehicle the easier the battery problem - so I'd expect electric scooters.Most muslims don't wear scarves. It's a requirement for being muslim like wearing a [beguine's cap](http://img.ymlp.com/Heemkunde_Vlaanderen_GrootjufferVerhaegheIMG2824.jpg) is a requirement for being Christian. There are muslim countries who forbid the scarf in some places, there are muslim countries who mandate it but there the population tries to wear none.

Having established that it's not religious at all, we can see that it is a marker of identity and group membership more than anything else. So, if you change that, it's a clear message that you want to change which group to belong to.&gt;It matters what the person believes, not what their religion tells them to believe.

In that case they should call themselves a freethinker rather than endorsing the religion by calling themselves a follower.But that's the raison d'\u00eatre of Belgium, so business as usual..It's implicitly accepted that restaurants make a lot of profit on the drinks, while barely breaking even on the food. It all evens out. At least the owners don't outsource the personnel management by tipping like in the USA.I reckon there are quite a few people who have hard tech-boner for nuclear power in NASA. If you pit nuclear against coal and the game is "emit the least possible carbon dioxide", then we already know who the winner is. It's a rigged fight. And if you then see the conclusion: "We conclude that nuclear energy \u2014 despite posing several challenges, as do all energy sources (ref. 7) \u2014 needs to be retained and significantly expanded", it's pretty clear that's what they wanted from the start.&gt; Sure. Then don't buy the product if you're unsure.

Then I can't buy anything at all, because production practices change faster than a single person can research them.

&gt;Your making this so much more difficult than it needs to be.

Difficult for producers who want to sell crap to the masses perhaps.

&gt;How exactly is it nonsense?

Being able to trust that what you buy on the market probably won't kill you is a public good. It's not possible for individuals to compensate for its absence.

&gt;I am in a foreign country where I can barely read or understand the language. If I am unsure about the what exactly is in the product, what do you think I do? A) Get whiny, scared, and throw my hands up in frustration B) Don't buy it and buy what I know

I'm not in foreign country, and if I were I would have taken the absence of presence of minimal food and product standards into account before deciding to live there. If you want to sell your stuff in my country, you get checked at the door. If you don't like that, turn back. How complicated is that?&gt; What is Haley's huge secret?

"I'm not really what you would call" ... "honest" seems to fit easily into the scene and the arc without conspiracy theories.&gt; Forcing Brussels to make \u201can explicit statement\u201d that Britain will be kept out of any move towards a European superstate. This will require an exemption for the UK from the EU\u2019s founding principle of \u201cever closer union\u201d.

Who actually started this conspiracy theory about the "ever closer union"? That has never been used to force a law through, or to forbid one, not will it ever. Likewise any statement that Britain doesn't need to be part of it would be completely irrelevant.

... And the most obvious way to achieve that is staying in the EU.They also aren't any longer automatically eligible to receive healthcare as a Spanish citizen as with the EHIC.Coming from a country that had no meaningful spatial planning and did exactly that: please don't, you'll regret it.Well, the nice people who want Britain to stay out of the Euro have collected ample data that Britain is doing *just peachy* lately... apparently being in the EU isn't such a disaster after all. :pThey now fit in the EHIC framework. That work will need to be replicated by a separate treaty... for all 27 EU members. The result will just be that Britons in general need to go through a lot more red tape when dealing in the EU.Actually not.It's all relative. If the government stops funding housing from a neoliberal motivation that the government should do less, then the policy has become more neoliberal. If the neoliberals scrap a socialist element from the housing policy, and the housing situation gets worse, then neoliberalism is to blame, at the very least for misdiagnosing the problem and fucking up the situation with the wrong medicine.Well, for permanent residents it's the S1 document, for temporary stay it's the EHIC (if residency is not required, but for pensioners it's generally not, or a simple regular visit home suffices to keep it active). Both boil down to the same though: if you're legally entitled to healthcare in the UK, you're legally entitled to healthcare in Spain, *as if you were an insured Spanish citizen*. The Spanish national insurance will simply send on the bill. This seems simple, but it simply did not work that way before a solid, generally applicable arrangement was conceived and implemented on the EU level. Instead of 28\u00b2-28 sets of rules to make the different EU healthcare and insurance systems play nice with each other, we now just need 1.An AI that doesn't interfere with things outside his goals, doesn't help people in need, is precisely an AI that risks turning into a paperclipper - or an oracle in the best case scenario, because every action has consequences that would interfere with other people's choices.Could be that people who have invested years of education and half their careers in the nuclear sector are somewhat biased, despite their best efforts.

The reason is that nuclear might very well be *technically* possible and achievable, but beta scientists typically ignore how to realize it politically and socially. And that's the domain of alpha scientists, and those know that you can't give us monkeys toys that aren't foolproof or crookproof.&gt;No, that'd be some pensioners and non-permanent residents. It doesn't apply to anyone under 65's resident in Spain...

Residency requirements for insurance eligibility are a UK policy decision, it's been a few years since I was up to date with the matter.

 &gt;You are right though that the EU has simplified the system where the NHS is liable for costs, and that's great! But I'm also sure that if the UK leaves the EU I'm sure it'll be relatively simple to maintain, and happily since the EU already has something in place between EU and EEA members it'll be the UK working with one bloc, not 27 separate members, so it'll still be simple.

And that new deal will likely consist out of "follow our rules". Any change in either ruleset will disrupt it too, later on.It would be an organization similar to a hospital or university. Though in these cases, parts of the motivation is that we can allow free initiative and choice... prisoners don't have a choice where they end up anyway. So we'd only do it to leverage the benefits of free initiative, I don't know whether that's enough.Not necessarily, social security is funded by dedicated taxes and contributions. Although the last decades they tend to receive extra funding from the regular budget since it's easier to account for fluctuations in expenses there. Nevertheless, the money from social contributions cannot be used for other expenses.

[They actually do if they can use it as a way to sabotage alternative policies](http://www.gva.be/cnt/aid1058458/gevangenis-beveren-zou-pal-op-meccano-trace-komen-2).I have a limited income, but digital copies are unlimited. A market that doesn't allow people to make free digital copies when their income is exhausted, is a market failure because it doesn't distribute goods optimally.Go back to your play room, and shut up about things you don't understand.&gt; There is no point in putting barriers to movement or tourism in place as it harms everyone. 

Which is kinda the whole point of the "freedom of movement in the EU" concept.At that point it becomes useless to make one. &gt;Do you literally not buy anything now? Do you live on a farm and produce your own food?

For a significant part, yes. The things in the store I buy actually are subject to a significant number of quality controls and requirements done by organisations that are not me. So that's okay. It's not okay if I have to test every bite I take on poison.

&gt;Then don't buy it.

I repeat, we cannot research every food product in the stores. It's physically impossible, that's why we let a central agency do it instead.

&gt;This is not even relevant to my point. Not only that, but it doesn't even make sense. Thirdly, that is not a public good, sorry.

I suggest you try arguments instead of denial.

&gt;The sheer level ignorance you're displaying is mind boggling. 

Please tell me how.

&gt;My suggestion to you. Move out of your country. Find a private island, start your own farm. 

My suggestion to you: move to Somalia, where there is no functioning government and you can enjoy all the food free from regulation you want.
What has operating security to do with the long term risks?We simply have no effective method to calculate that risk because of the long time scale. That alone is enough to discount it.The concept is a bit broader than just walking wherever you want. Having smoothly integrated laws and public and government organizations also facilitates that.It's the price of the whole meal that matters.&gt; That isn't what it is about, this isn't about there being a legal mechanism that pushes integration, but rather that there isn't a current mandate in the UK for ever closer union between the EU and the UK. Essentially the UK doesn't want to be involved in further political integration, that's a fairly popular view in the UK - the EU is fine as it is, further integration goes too far. Hence why it is in the demands.

I always interpreted it as a natural consequence of cooperation, a description rather than a prescription.

&gt;It would be politically relevant and give a clear intent on the part of the UK in relation to the EU. Which might also mean there is less growling when the UK seeks to opt out of something rather than joining in or scuppering it, because it has made it clear it doesn't want closer union..

That's pretty clear by now. The growling is because opt-outs reduce the efficiency of EU policies and generates a lot of red tape... precisely the things the UK likes to complain about to justify the anti-EU stance.&gt; It is. It's used as a way to express their religion. If that is correct with theological discussions is interesting but irrelevant. If women choose to use a headscarf to express their devotion, even if that contradicts theological interpretations, it's a religious thing and wearing it is using your freedom of religion.

Well, in that case: paying taxes is against my religion, there. Clearly individual interpretations are irrelevant and certainly don't confer rights by freedom of religion. Freedom of religion doesn't mean that you can ignore the law as long as you say it's for your religion; it means that you're not obligated to take part in a religion, are not obligated to disclose your religion, and aren't allowed to be discriminated against based on your religion. That's all.

&gt;Of course the headscarf is more than just a religious thing and culture -and group dynamics- plays a huge role in it. But the fact that Muslims can't wear a headscarf in public buildings in Turkey doesn't change that a teenage girl in Antwerp can wear that same headscarf as a religious expression.

She can wear anything she want and call it religious expression. That doesn't contradict that it's generally viewed as switching her whole allegiance and lifestyle rather than just a religion.Carbon capture will cost more energy than burning fossil fuels delivers, so we'd still need another energy source. Solar shading requires such advances in material engineering that we'll be using dirt cheap solar panels as standard roof covering material long before that.&gt;That's an odd argument. I get what you're coming from, but how on earth does wearing a scarf compare to avoiding taxes? Religious freedom gives all citizens the right to express and practice their religion as long as you respect other freedoms and restrictions. Wearing a scarf in public doesn't harm others' freedoms nor restrictions and can express a certain belief. So how does religious freedom not apply here?

The point is that freedom of religion does not confer specific rights, especially not ones depending on your own interpretation. Wearing the scarf is her choice and is not dictated by the religion. By opting to choose an interpretation of the religion that is rather visible, she's deliberately baiting for reactions, so this is not doing any good at all.

How are her rights harmed by people having an opinion about her conversion and the way she expresses her religion, anyway?

&gt;In my opinion, there's no better image to represent Western Values than a picture of a parliament where a few people are wearing scarfs, a few suits and some other sandals. It shows that the parliament is a representation of the people and that different opinions can coexist and debate with each other. Something that only can happen when fundamental freedoms like freedom of religion is secured. 

I don't think keeping some pet religious people around to show how morally superior we are is a sign of openmindedness.
&gt; If you wear the scarve means you follow the koran very literally because altough nothing specific in the koran says you should wear the scarve

Read that again.And who decides about that? Women visit the cinema as often if not more than men, and even in mixed company or on dates it's not rare for them to pick the movie either. If there were an unfulfilled hankering for strong female roles, all of these films would be hits.It's a supply 